[Daily Discussion] Sunday, June 10, 2018 -- TITLE
#New post: [\[Daily Discussion\] Monday, June 11, 2018 →](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8q6lf4/daily_discussion_monday_june_11_2018/)
I wish I had sold my bitcoins at a higher price 
People cashing out to buy Father’s Day present in my opinion
As we descend into the second half of the bear market of 2018, some investors may be considering pulling their money out of 'crypto' entirely, thinking that *the bubble has popped* and that 'crypto' has seen better days.

Hi, I'm Troy McClure, you may remember me from such dips as *The Great China Divide*, *Mommy, What's This Red Thing?* and *It Came For Me At Night*.

Don't forget the reasons why Bitcoin gained traction to begin with and don't sell the bottom out of frustration. Don't buy into the hype of competing projects, especially other, lesser PoW chains. It's unlikely that there will be more than one major PoW coin and Bitcoin is best positioned to amass additional network effect and remain the most secure and decentralization blockchain. Anything's possible but it would be prudent to remain skeptical regarding almost every alt coin currently in existence. Most of those things have absolutely no value beyond speculation. At least Bitcoin has a purported use case and value proposition. 

[Comfort reading](https://s3.eu-west-2.amazonaws.com/john-pfeffer/An+Investor%27s+Take+on+Cryptoassets+v6.pdf)
I would be happy with a nice bike at this point.
Definitely a good amount of panic in this. People unloading with market sells.
Hodling: 🔥“This is fine” 🔥
[deleted]
We've officially retraced the Legendary Green Dildo.
Gonna panic sell my house
When Tether is the biggest gainer of the day you know it's not a good day 
Seeing a lot of panic sellers at market price. Trading with emotion is the #1 way to get royally fucked, especially in crypto. This was not the first BRD and it won't be the last. 


Relax, bitcoin won't be gone tomorrow. If you are bullish outside 6 months, I wouldn't unload now. (Not investment advice, just my perspective.)
Am I crazy?  Why is the CFTC probe a bad thing or being used as a sell signal?  For me it means we can finally escape this blatant manipulation around Futures close dates that has kept BTC stuck in quicksand since January.  I was glad to see they were looking into it.
I’m so numb to dumps at this point a giant red candle doesn’t even bring a tickle to my pickle.

My account is down several thousand dollars in the last 24 hours and I could care less. 

We in it for the long run aren’t we boys? 

##Esskieeeet 
I thought I'd be able to make a quick scalp from 7000 to 7050, boy was I wrong, my hands hurt from catching knives 5 times today
Going for that walk now gents.

This is goodbye for me.

Catch you guys on the flipside...

Edit: Goodbye as in Imma stop trading, not goodbye as in... you know. Not so dark homies ;)
We double bottomed, triple bottomed, now quadruple bottomed. How many more bottoms
Good morning, that was some ride yesterday. Reminded me of the days where +/-10% was the norm for BTC hehe. Too bad I was on the long side of the bet, losing a decent pack of USD. For the bears keeping their shorts all the way down; respect and congrats! My SL was hit and I have no open margin positions anymore, just a long term crypto stack. Now looking at the situation again, see if I want to change strategy :D 
at least volume is up amirite 
I've said it before, I'm an expert at selling the bottom. I haven't sold yet. Keep clenching those butt cheeks for now. Will update when I sell.
Point and Figure Chart https://i.imgur.com/WbsHRMV.png  We have moved into a long pole of 16 O's.  31 of the last 61 long poles of O's have been larger than 16.  This comes after we had resolved all long poles going back the last 8 months, and over two weeks of no new long poles.  This was a clear break downward from a small wedge.

Yesterday I pointed out we are in a small PnF range between 7,326 and 7,776.  We've broken out of that range and into a new larger range between 6,383 and 7,776.  A break of 6,383 would be a confirmation that our large wedge has broken per our PnF chart.

You might notice I used the words 'small wedge' and 'large wedge'.  My method of charting shows that we have still not broken the large wedge.

Here is my chart https://www.tradingview.com/x/JdEr06Ii/  The small wedge is labeled in pink, a color I use to signify weakness or <1 day timeframe.  The royal blue lines represent the large wedge, a color I use to signify strength or a 1 week timeframe.  We are currently testing the blue trendline.  For the large timeframe, a daily or weekly close below the trendline would be a confirmation of a break down.  A move below PnF range (below 6,383) would be a confirmation of a break down.

The risk:reward is currently in the bulls favor.  We are currently at trendline support.  A long could be taken here with a tight stop; more upside potential than downside.  In the above chart, I circled 3 daily red volume spikes.  As you can see, we have been trending downward on the daily.  Some traders believe that trends tend to occur in 3 cycles.  If they are correct, this was the third 'dump' and you should stop playing the downtrend.  

We are still in a downward trend on the weekly timeframe. Since this wedge is in the weekly timeframe, that means statistically the large wedge is more likely to break down.  We are on a downward trend on the 4 hour, the daily, and the weekly.  The large wedge is more likely to break down than up.  In other words, if you are longing you'll need your upside % to be much higher than your downside %, aka set a tight stop.  Be ready to take the loss.

By the way, I am /u/joyrider5, proof on my twitter: https://twitter.com/joyrider50/status/999774124259004416 Sadly I lost control over my account so will be posting on this one for now on.
So, I've been pretty absent the past week. I had very few top level analysis posts, mostly because the price action was very boring and basically useless to chart. I fully hedged my BTC at 7715 a couple days ago, added a little on the way down. Went to 2x short at 7350 yesterday. 

For the past several days especially, but really ever since the BGD on 4/12, many of us traders were scratching our heads at the market. As traders, we jumped on the longs as the market somewhat irrationally spiked, but even as I opened a long at 9600, I wasn't thinking "this is the new bull run" as much as "I wonder how much more FOMO can drive this." 

I've made my share of bad trades along the way here. Some were emotional, some were FOMO, some I held too long. I had one extremely good trade (short 8300-7300). I'm currently 2x short from 7505 on June, and I have another short of equal size from 6810 on swaps. Stops in both cases are over 7K. 

As for some TA, I'm sure everyone here is aware we broke the daily pennant: https://www.tradingview.com/x/ay7XqhFW/  

We're in a bear flag currently, which is also pretty obvious. I expect some more chop, but I think there's a compelling case to be made that we could find support underneath off some long-term lines and some historical ranges. I also just do not believe BTC will drop below $4K. As such, moving between the ATH log resistance line and long-term channel top as support, and the daily pennant we just broke as resistance seems likely. We may be in for an extended oscillation between 4500-7000. 

https://www.tradingview.com/x/rdASbYZL/

Obviously a long way to go before then. Technically we haven't even made a lower low yet, so I'm not convinced we're going there yet. If 6400 falls, I'd put the odds pretty high. I'm just really hoping we don't break back down under the ATH log line. 

Apologies if this feels like I'm posting a very positive hindsight trade. References to the position are in my post history. I've just been super busy.

Good luck everyone. 
Long 7105.  Stops 6976.
/u/_chewtoy_ hasn't posted in several days, chewy if you read this, did you get into a short with this breakdown? Last I checked you were OOP and waiting for the range to break
Thanks to all that the provide their TA and objective options here on this sub. Cheers and keep sane today 👍
With the price hovering at $6750, it seems [pretty clear that the multi-month pennant has broken to the downside.](https://www.tradingview.com/x/whedg88z/) It's difficult to interpret this as anything but a sell signal. I opened a short when the line broke and will hold this position for a bit.

In the very immediate term we may see a bounce or bear flag retrace half of this drop and put us around $6900, but I don't expect buyers to push this much higher.  

My assumption here is that we're heading to test the prior low at ~$6k before we see a proper bounce where bulls are likely to defend the narrative of a double bottom. 

Overall mid-term picture looks very bearish.  I would not be surprised to see another capitulation move in the next couple months to the $4300-$4900 range if $6k does not hold. I would expect large buys in this price range and this will be a profitable range for volatility traders. A return to mean would put us in the low $4k range by year's end.  

Right now it's difficult to see this mid-term trend changing without new capital in the form of renewed interest from retail buyers or the ingestion of institutional money if/when that happens.  This is all just market cycles.  In the interim, the crypto space will continue to mature behind the scenes - I still see this space in its infancy, and if/when the next bubble comes it will ride on the back of a more mature usability layer in the form of easy payment systems knit into the existing IOT framework which will go a long way in demystifying crypto and showcasing its practicality.  
got stopped out of my long from 7240. Triangle broke, 7000 broke, my asshole followed
Holy moly went away for a few hours just to see the largest blood bath in a long time. Could be capitulation. We did just break major support so sell off seems like panic and technical. A triple bottom with a higher low is still in play so I’ve got orders stacked down to $6,500 but I’m ready to bail any time. 

Edit: My scaled in long so far is at $6,730. I intend to close when and if we test the huge triangle we just dropped off from. This could very much be a huge bear trap and I wouldn’t feel bitter about closing it too soon. 
Lol shoulda closed that long from 7.5 when I had the chance at 7.7... Got lulled into a sense of security from how flat things have been so I just stopped paying attention and now here we are
http://isthisthebottom.com
Portfolio very down, but not selling the bottom. If I hold for a few weeks/months/years it is fine. Wish I had held my reentry for a few more days, but these things happen. Congrats to anyone shorting, this was some nice luck for you boys. 


Time to go to the gym.
The next critical is critical, we are 50 USD away from a support line that has formed over months!
This is what an overleveraged market looks like
Well shit, I did not expect this today. 
That was no BRD, that was a John Wick.
[deleted]
Been waiting for an entry this good for a while, long 7100 - stop 6899.
That was the largest one hour candle we've had since April 12th
I made many good trades the last two weeks, but today I was on the wrong side of the trade and all my gains were wiped out. As a bear I have been looking forward to this dump since April 12, but somehow I was unprepared when it occurred, and in the middle of a scalp. Failed to take precautions and realized too late that this was "the big one". I was busy with real life things at a critical juncture (at around 18:00 UTC), when I should have been at the screen but a friend's father was dying at the hospital and I had to go there. 

The most frequent commenters seem to have disappeared today, I hope they return. Let's hear all viewpoints. Not only those who feel they are on the winning side today. I personally expect the bottom to be around 5000 (based on long term trend), but I think we might bounce one more time first. Current plan is to wait for that bounce to get out of position, but I am also considering other options. It's such a paradox to be caught on the wrong side, when I knew this day would come.
I don't contribute a lot of my trades here and I also may be slightly drunk (unrelated to BTC) but my analysis is this: we are in a heavily manipulated market still. We are constantly hearing that this is bad for BTC, and I agree, but the opportunity to buy before the next whale pump is always present and I think that's mitigating an otherwise straight plunge downward to $3k. I'm in fiat for the time being waiting to see what the market decides, but when we hit $6.100 I'll be long again with stops below $5,800 because I'm just as untrusting of these dips at this point as I am the pumps.
Stops hit for my $500k long @ $7300 posted [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8pyf8i/z/e0f1u9c), at $6680 for a total loss of 8.5% or $43k. 
Can this get any more bullish? If this baby drops below $6000, I'll  have to be physically restrained to not buy more than is financially prudent.
Phew! Could finally exit my short that's been underwater since the 29th in the green (after adding to it a fair bit yesterday). Very happy day for me. 
Last attempt to break down the flag has been bought up pretty quickly. We're hovering the support of the daily triangle, RSI oversold or hot from the 1h to the 6h. Please correct me if I'm wrong but I also see a bulllish divergence on the 1h?
Opened a long at 7240, stop under 7100, looking for a temporary bounce, seems reasonable enough.... or does it?
[deleted]
Might be too soon but closing my short here, also taking a small long on sept futures at a discount. Will bail on that if 6200 breaks.

!short xbtusd close 6744 
How would one know the best time to try to go long.  Asking seriously, I was never here for a drop like this.

Thanks!
Added a small short on the bounce at $6744


Edit: closed at $6711. Going to a casino tonight, would rather gamble there 
So, do the opposite of this sub worked again for anyone who shorted the 6th :)
But it isn't even july 6th..
I think I'm officially bearish in the near to mid term future now that we've broken down from our symmetrical triangle of doom. I think we'll be very lucky to see over 10 - 12k by end of year.

Still bullish long term.
I am going to long some here, I think we get a nice bounce over the next few days.
This is not goblin town yet.
Im buying. Mike Novagratz said this was coming. BUY if you can!
Time for some impassioned speeches ~~from people still well into profit~~ about how solid the tech is and how we shouldn't care about the day\-to\-day price
Going long on Diaper stocks.
two months move are gone, now is the big question, will 6500 range hold ? 

https://www.tradingview.com/x/gNpTWZBl
BTCUSD weekly, RSI still at 45. Does this mean 3k? 

https://i.imgur.com/7FAkpqM.png

For a comparison in 2014 weekly RSI went down all the way to 30 before recovery 
So much volume, good to see so many people trading again.
I haven't paid any attention to bitcoin since I sold last year but I had to buy in a little as soon as I opened this thread.
Please tweet at Donald Trump to give us a bailout

edit: tweet faster please, before it goes below 7000
And suddenly this place gets crowded again! Nice to see it active again. At least one nice thing
On the bright side, 1 min chart is actually watchable now, after several months.
In this years market i wouldn’t be completely surprised to see a bart/marge back into the symmetrical triangle within 2-3 days. In the case that happens I think we can get a mini bullrun to test 8.5k and continue this consolidation.

More likely is to probably see sub 6k and potentially a test of 5k due to capitulation.

https://imgur.com/a/vM28BLG

If it drops below 5k here are my horizontal support lines going all the way back to that 2013 bullrun

https://imgur.com/a/qoYrczd

PS: I still like this video game even though we are playing in the hardest difficulty right now.
Going long. Heavy long

Stops at 6775.

It’s gut-check time
Looks like EU just woke up and thought why not test 7k
Where is the giant daily triangle support now? I am not on my charts currently :/
Bear flag on 5min, visible on 15min and 30min as well: https://www.tradingview.com/x/q3rpT8WR/ 

Currently holding a 3x short from 7650. I think I will hold for a bit and see if this bear flag breaks (further) down. Either way, I'm probably going to cash out in the next 12-18 hours to avoid the monday profit takers. I might end up going in a long if the stoch rsi 6h starts flipping before then. That indicator has treated me insanely well lately.


there goes $7K
Shorted several times in the 7.3-7.7 range and got knocked out of position and took big hits to my stack by taking overly large positions, not setting stops wide enough and just generally getting reckless. This is maximum pain for me. 
Stop-loss triggered at around USD 6980. Glad I didn’t add to this position ;)

!long xbteur close 5980 100%
Max pain for bitmex overleveraged longs. Look at that Bitmex rekt page goddamn.
June 10th is the new June 6th.
trading: stopped out of longs, not in any positions. bought some alts earlier today but theyve been surprisingly stable so holding onto those. would like to be playing in the sandpit with you guys but i had an edible between the second and third dump and i cant justify trading impaired... plus this might be safer to sit out

investing: bought some for cold storage today, still have plenty of fiat if we dump more

hindsight always 20/20 but tbh i feel kinda dumb for not seeing this coming, pretty much a triple top in 77xx.

question for you guys, (assuming we hold here, weekly block and still technically maintaining higher low) do you think we will move sideway/accumulate or vshape bounce?
Closed the rest of my short on Eth from 602 here. Best trade ever so i think i'll just wait and see now.
Will try and short a bounce also since down seems to be the direction for a while. 
[deleted]
https://www.tradingview.com/x/bqFZbWpz/

RSI on the weekly timeframe hasn't been oversold since January 2015, we're a long way off that yet.

I do wonder if - with BTC exposure and market conditions being so different to how they were back in '15 - that much downside is still realistic in the near future
My dear fellow noobs feeling rough after the boat starts pitching heavily: get onto the deck in the fresh air and try to walk in a straight line between two points. The physical interaction with those visual cues helps your brain orientate to the surface you're on.

Metaphor schmetaphor. Just get on the log scale and zoom way out, risk mitigate with stops, sleep better
If 6.4K breaks or even dips below then I have zero bullish vibes left in me. Then i am expecting doom and gloom into goblin town and REKT moonkids everywhere. Holding firmly onto my short from somewhere around 7.6K avg until things turn or I get BGD stopped out. Will add some if this bounces to 7K
hello downtrend, my old friend 

I've come to talk with you again

because of price that's slowly dripping

below support while I was sleeping... 
[It looks like the pennant just broke on Bitstamp.](https://www.tradingview.com/x/kcjGOUq6/)  

It's possible we crawl back in, but it's not looking good for bulls here.  A break below prior local low at $7030 would prove as further confirmation. 
You know what's batshit? Longs are up 700 BTC this hour, shorts are down about a 100 BTC. Everyone still wants to catch a falling knife.

Maybe they're right... maybe they'll get their fingers chopped off.
By no means am I capitulating.
Time to upload to the cold storage see ya in a few years
Added 20% to the short upon bear flag breakdown confirmation 
Ok, the triangle spanning from February is broken to the downside, so my multi-month silence is broken aswell as I have finally something to say other than "trade the triangle". There's still a chance, that this is a fakeout, however if this is not a fakeout, then 7k will fall quickly and there could be some support at 6-6.4 range, if 6k falls then it's 2014 all over again. I've taken a loss here as I was expecting bounce to 9k and the chop in these past weeks hasn't helped either as I was unnecessarily overtrading, but that's what happens when you're high on hopium. 

I'm mostly on sidelines here as my goal this bear market is to reduce my losses and spend more time with family & friends, not necessarily make money. Shorting here could be lucrative, but don't hesitate when things turn around (or set your stop-losses).
[deleted]
Will anyone be shorting a bounce? 
Nice fill of april BGD.
With the Daily RSI brushing 30, thinking a 4h bear flag/bounce to retest the support turned possible resistance of the big triangle is likely here up to 7k again. Will add more to my short at $6.9k
My gambling long got stopped out.

Still on gambling short. Missed completely this drop, was too busy. Thinking if I should add to this short to hedge right now or wait until RSI cools off. This triangle breaking down just means we're still far in the woods...

!long XBTU18 close 7025
Looks like we are getting a bit of a bounce. I'll be back when it's close to the daily/weekly close. Bulls really want to see the daily close over 6800 to get daily RSI bull div and also for the weekly to not close on a new low.
Next long term upward sloping trendline is this (lower red).  Upper red is the one we just broke.  Could reach it around $4K.  

https://imgur.com/a/hYOFV7I

Only other hope is to rally back up to the line we just broke.

Just one more long-term line is mathematically/graphically possible because in the early days you have these wicks that reach almost down to zero.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/7xfe8xvb/
https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/Hf2Vp2tX-Bitcoin-short-term-scalp-play/

Scalpy long. 
This is pretty telling, every short is in profit, only three longs are in green. 

https://www.anotherbot.info/index.php

Some of these positions are obviously outdated. But still.
Long $500k @ $7300. May add to this position. This drop seems to have run out of steam, expecting a short term bounce. 
News soon, Friday news came out about more subpoenas, next week should be more great news
Closed my 3x short from 7650 at 6710. ETH was being held down by a hidden buy wall at 505 and when it broke through I bailed. It's a short term decision but I want to sleep tonight and I can't babysit my position any longer. I think this is my most profitable trade to date, increased my stack value by 30+ percent. As is tradition, will take tomorrow off from trading to avoid losing it all again, and wait for the market to settle a bit.
Stopped out of my longs last night for a small loss.

Just re opened another one @ 7231 for 33% of position.

Adding another 33% around $7175 

Adding the last 33% around $7110 

I have my symmetrical triangle support around $6975, anyone have theirs higher? 
and all the bulls who opened longs last week are trapped.
Well <$300B aggregate crypto market cap.

Vladimir Putin's net worth vs. all digital money/assets?

Retain high level perspective.
Daily close above 6800, but barely, I have no confidence we won't continue grinding down / moving sideways for the next several months, particularly with the volume picture we have now continuing, although it could start recovering later in the year as the fundamentals of the space (regulation, custody solution infrastructure, etc.) improve.

Daily close below 6800, particularly if 6500 or less, I think we're going to start testing some historical lows like 5K and below, a 2014-type situation. Difficult to see how we pull out of a situation like that any time soon.

A drop below 6500-6800 with a strong bullish rebound above 7200-7500 with high volume, and I think this starts to look like a bullish triple bottom reversal.

This is not professional TA, just daily (at times almost hourly) market watching and frequently checking back into this sub.
Does anyone actually use Gartley patterns? Has it proven to be useful?

I honestly think it's bullcrap but maybe it could just be my ignorance.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/xkBkqnnw
We broke the 6 month triangle, I think we'll keep going down till around $5k and have some decent bounce there. 
Most of my alts that I bought today are actually gaining in terms of btc value right now. Thinking if it’s a good opportunity to sell and walk away for a while.

Don’t feel like selling though, and I don’t have much hope for any bounce any time soon. Have I become a hodler? 
Isn't this already like the largest daily drop since forever?
This has to hurt:

https://twitter.com/BitmexRekt/status/1005874865298030592

Over 30 million liquidated in 3 minutes.
6k is the most obvious next test for a double bottom to salvage the chart and stave off 5k and below levels.  It may find some reprieve at 6.5k test from April candle but it's only a local bottom and if that breaches then 6k test is guaranteed.
Wow, getting mixed reactions from all sides as to what’s the new low / support line.. if someone could do a poll for the next support line that would be great..
The price movements of the past week look so tiny now on tradingview...
ETH pulling BTC down. If ETH breaks 500 i'll short BTC
Anyone else think that instead of a multi month symmetrical triangle forming, it actually could have been a descending triangle instead?
Ah, god damn it.
I wonder if it is possible that retracing the April BGD today may have resulted in the completion of a crypto 'fill the gap' kind of event as it is known in traditional financial markets? I wonder if the crypto version filling the gap will allow it to rise having also still made a higher low (not breaching 6.4k - yet anyways). Weekly/Monthly RSI could still drag price down but this is in the back of my mind - a theory I am anxious to see play out or not with a small long. There are definitely symmetries at play here.  BGD in Apil, BRD today.
Imagine the complete carnage that would occur if this was all an elaborate Bart.  
All this blood is exciting. I'm adding a little btc, eth, and LTC to my stack. Tips fedora!
Slept through the first dump, bought the dip on the second dump now im long avg 7303. Currently picking up some alts ive been eyeing up. SL on all of this at 7k break.

Also picked some up with fiat for cold storage but still have fiat on the side.

EDIT: RIP lol, stopped out at 6944. on sidelines now

edit2: tempted to attempt some knife catching as daily RSI hits 30
Where is Bart when you need him. Not the hero we deserve but the hero we need! Sup everyone hows it going. I'm in a long lol.
hello 6k my old friend ....
Hear that sound?

That's the sound of major market structure in the process of being BROKEN.
Why is ETH stronger than BTC on this dip ? A few other alts are way above April levels when BTC was $6.6k. Any thoughts ?
I’m honestly laughing at everyone freaking out right now and have no fear of this market. Someone give me a reason why I should be
For those of you who are expecting a bounce here since everything is oversold, I wouldn't bet on it. We just broke through our trend support and horizontal support on a high volume breakdown, meaning that the symmetrical triangle we were in is possibly completing right now. And what's even worse is that this high volume breakdown isn't even that high in volume. Our daily volume is almost the same as it was two months ago. This can be pushed much lower.

However, we are down 12% in a day. From here, 6k is another 10% push down. Depending on how fast we get there that could be a good buy with a really nice bounce. 
**8 days ago**, I couldn't determine if BTC planned to rise or fall near-term. Both moves seemed equally likely, so, as an experiment, I opened both a long and a short for equal amounts at $7,525 with 2% limits [here](https://np.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8noyex/daily_discussion_friday_june_01_2018/dzyunq7/). The long closed if BTC rose 2% above $7,525 to $7,675, and the short closed if BTC fell 2% below $7,525 to $7,375. I gambled that we were swimming in the middle of a range and both sides would hit (within 48 hours). 
  
**Results:** 14 hours after opening the positions, BTC went the opposite way I thought, and rose to the upper range at $7,675. This closed my long for a 2% gain [here](https://np.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8ny3t2/daily_discussion_saturday_june_02_2018/dzzty33/). I doubled-down and added this 2% gain to my short. It took 8 days, but a few hours ago, BTC dropped back past the medien to the lower range to $7,375 and closed my short. All three trades are now closed for a ~7% gain.  

I went ranging like Benjen Stark north of the wall and returned alive and ahead, but I probably won't do this again. This looks like a good move now, but didn't feel like it most of the time then. I got lucky. After the long closed, I was out with the White Walkers for eight days. The trading landscape could have significantly shifted and left me snow-blind in empty space with my stack exposed. You could reduce this time by reducing the range to 1%, but then you have to increase your bet to make it worth it. There's no zero-sum edge. The more gain you want, the more you have to increase your time or stack exposure to try to get it. 

So for now, I'm back all-in long. 
Just took a look at some moving averages and noticed a few things.

Looks like we had a fairly weak bounce off the 400MA at 7k and are now testing it again.

The 100MA has crossed below the 200MA, 300MA, and is now beginning to converge towards the 400MA.

I'm not too certain what this means, but I assume this will eventually lead towards a pop in one direction or the other once the convergence tightens. (assuming the 400MA holds as support)

If we drop through the 400MA which is also right around where our symmetrical triangle has our support line, I don't see what would be stopping us from at least testing the 500MA which is sitting around $5,800.

I'm not really one for memes, but anything below that.... Goblintown?

Chart w/MA: https://imgur.com/NQ8NmWv

Chart w/MA, triangle: https://imgur.com/ApzAnuU

Edit: 

100MA - Blue

200MA - Green

300MA - Orange

400MA - Red

500MA - Pink


It's very possible I just sold the bottom but I've held this position for too long. Could have sold at break even twice but failed to do so. I usually scalp but I was trying to do something different and hodl through this but I decided to just cut my losses here. Even if this is the bottom, every time BTC bottoms out it stays in a certain range for months. So if we are still in 7k a month or so from now I'll buy back in but for now I'm going back to scalping.

Also my supports are all broken and the volume we are breaking it with isn't even that much so I feel like a bigger red candle is coming soon. I'm not gonna rage short this, though, as this could very well bounce here and I'm not gonna keep losing money. Just going to take a step back and relax for a bit.
I will buy all your coins when we have a *real* crypto panic this year. 
[https://imgur.com/a/PnhiIcm](https://imgur.com/a/PnhiIcm)

September resistance turned support in November that we've bounced off many times is trying to fall/at  the very least is currently being tested.

Yikes. Glad to be in fiat.

Edit: Bought in at 6865. Thinking this may have just been a fakeout wick. I don't really believe we're breaking down from here yet, too oversold and out of the daily BBands. Finger on the sell in case we don't, though. Not dying on this hill.... Got back out at break even minus fees. Oh well. Stupid me for trying to knife catch.
[removed]
Bought some back at $6700 what I sold at $9000. Have been waiting for this re-test but didn't think we'd see it this soon. My comment when I sold: https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8ikz1u/daily_discussion_friday_may_11_2018/dysvkpn/

I thought I was selling to take profits but it turns out I prefer my BTC than profits ;)
Get ready for the "told ya so" people coming out of their holes next week. 
we are starting to extend the lower 3D bband here on log scale
So any TA, indicators for the next support line in the 6k? Or 5k if we're going that far. But surely there should be some solid support level at about 6k. Let's not panic, stay calm and try to position the next entry point :)
should be support around here, so i closed part of my short, but it just doesnt want to stop lol
people who had there sl set as limit order and not as market order might got rekt in this move
I already asked earlier but got no answer (sub was too inactive), how does the long term trend line look like ? I am not able to draw it lol. And I have the feeling that we test it since it is a medium term bear trend
We're at the edge of the cliff one more time. Standing at 6684, bulls won't give up but keep being rejected stronger and stronger. Until it breaks.
From that insane low volume to this intense battle. Only crypto..
Decided to sleep with a long open at around 6454k, my alarms will interrupt my sleep below 6.25k. Hope I wake up with my order executed and without alarm. It feels like we do not bounce here and will go a bit lower, hope my order is not too low.
What I did not expect to see is the number of margin longs kept level at 32K. When I compare that against the short squeeze of 12/4, 14,000 shorts got stopped or liquidated. Not sure what that indicates... More than enough margin available, bulls keeping faith, something fundamental expected I don't know about?

[https://www.tradingview.com/x/fMFecYGz/](https://www.tradingview.com/x/fMFecYGz/)
If all major cryptocurrencies (CURRENCIES!) would be regarded as commodities and listed on exchanges the names would likely start with an X (XBT, XMR, XLM, etc), it would be hilarious if Litecoin were listed as XTC. 
[deleted]
“2018 is going to be a great year for crypto”
Getting ready to buy an oversold RSI 

Esketit
Looks like the asian whale is finally dumping on huobi.
Just when I thought things were going to be boring, they get slightly interesting.  Buy order at 7100 still hasn't executed, but I'm hopeful.
Hello volume my old friend, it's nice to see you once again
>I have been redeemed, at least I hope so. The BBand squueze 4H and under has broken HARD to the downside. This weekly could potentially close under 7k tomorrow

Got downvoted for this and downvoted hard for all my other bearish posts. GG boys
Two weeks of 'rest' and 'relaxation' are over, back to chart watching life
If you are a holder, this is no big deal if you believe in the value proposition of BTC -- this means the ebbs and flows of the current price mean absolutely nothing.  The race is a marathon and stomaching current price levels is easy when you remember the big picture from a fundamentals standpoint.  Painful now and may be painful tomorrow but if you believe in the technology - you should be not swayed as the fundamentals will take care of the price in time assuredly.  If you are truly trading, then recognize that the TA story is not good right now and as a trader you should not be afraid to see this otherwise you will not benefit from it and moreover, you will be pulled into a losing trade.   That said if you are a holder who is able to separate trading from investing, you just increased your stack big time today - hats off to you.
so whats the bottom guys?
Got to bet on a bounce here.  I will cover more of my short as the price drops to test the recent low, and then hopefully up to $6900.
[deleted]
i live for this

just kidding smh, i gave up on trading over a year ago, learned my lesson early
3D RSI hasn't been this low since 8/2015 (Stamp). Watching horizontal supports / resistances carefully but this could end up being a decent buy signal.
Bearish Kumo flip on the weekly with doubled settings will confirm in an hour. Price is still above the cloud, but cloud is thin and ascending. Also, bearish TK cross from last week. This is the second act of the bear market.
I don't think there was ever a 7.2k support at all. It crossed below it with no support coming and now 6.8k seems to have become the new resistance. 
  
This might just be the actual beginning of the bear market. With such low volume, bitcoin could slowly dip further down below 6k, and if it doesn't pick up any more volume, it could drop further down to 5k and below. It seems like general population has lost interest in bitcoin with all price crashes, so the only people who seem to be focused on bitcoin are early adopters/long term holders, traders, whales and perhaps wall street. If it doesn't pick up volume for a while, it could go sideways for sometime in the 4k range before it picks up again.   
   

it's like during mt gox times, except there's no gox. 
Last Sunday stopped out the bears on the cme open, this week get the bulls. Now the triangle can resolve its way up.  I may be the only one left but I’m bullish!
Bought in at 7050 back in april. Exited my position with my trading stack last night at 7350 for a small profit. I expected us to revisit the 8800 range before diving again, but the market and interest in it is just weak right now. 

I'm not sure what/when the next spark to regain interest in Bitcoin will be, but I'll be on the sidelines until something decisive happens. Jesus, it sounds like I'm capitulating already. Maybe it'll turn around soon.

Current mood: Bearish

Current 4H support is 7058 from the low on May 29th. Beyond that, we're looking at support of 6800.

Not gonna bother with resistance as this move still hasn't played out yet in my mind.

4H: https://www.tradingview.com/x/aVS338P5/

Weird 1D: https://www.tradingview.com/x/bYZtd0WV/

Not sure if this is even a legit TA charting method, but I found it interesting how the chart has curved somewhat over the past few weeks and months.
Fundamentals say buy here. I'm going in boys. wish me luck!
can someone explain why BINANCE is 'consistently' lower than Finex/Mex/Gdax and Stamp?
I’m trying to learn as much as I can about margin trading and specific terminology surrounding it as soon as possible. I’m looking longterm and would like to increase my stacks before the next bull run - however short or long that might be away. I’ve found a couple, but what resources did you all use when learning about margin trading? I’d like to be able to fully understand some of the things said in this sub so I can have an educated opinion to respond with at the very least 
all of the orders at 7k got yanked at the last second lololol
I thought BitMEX said it made upgrades to their engine... Guess not.
Sooo, the price targets on that 1D triangle breakdown are in goblin town (sub 3k)...anyone have any thoughts on a 6500 double bottom or we all just holding cash until the spirits are amongst us?

(Red line for targets on that triangle)
https://www.tradingview.com/x/piFK4ZzN/
its like the sell off from $8500. So if that one is any indicator, this is going down to $6K before a bounce to $6.5K
Is this blood in the streets?
Longs went up around 600 BTC during this move, shorts down 600 BTC. There is very little fresh money waiting to buy this dip it seems. 
There's no blood in the streets until it's almost universally reviled.  Doesn't mean you have to wait for this to profit from it, but it's how the smart money sweeps up and accumulates/buys everything for pennies on the dollar after things settle down eg. barons of the great depression.
I did not think my stop would hit but as Bitcoin likes to eat through trends and walls, I suppose I shouldn't be surprised. This one stings but oh well. That's Bitcoin for you I guess.

!long btcusd close 6999
Any idea where the next big support is??
500 BTC dump on Finex took it to 6618.
ETH/BTC is dropping like a rock, it was holding steady/ increasing for a lot of the drop.  Does that mean people are pushing funds back into BTC?  i.e. bottom?
Im watching around the 6200 level.  that was tested right before the nov/dec. bull run
Closed my spot long for $15 profit per coin, didn't get the bull div on the daily that would have kept me in (plus my entry was kind of meh). Closed my sep futures $180 in profit, so not a bad trade on that one.
How does the cost of bitcoin mining fit into this? I would assume that as the price gets lower then there are fewer miners making money at that price, so they would hold until the price increases. If the price gets too low then nobody is making money. 
Got drunk last night and cancelled all my profit targets/stop losses but forgot to close my position. Woke up still in a 10x short from 7670. Ayyyyye
[deleted]
!long xbteur 6200 3x 25%

Doesn’t seem to crazy to open a small long here at 7300 with stops under 7000. I may add at 7100 since it’s quite reasonable that we’ll test the big triangle again.

The buying pressure just above 7k has been decent, in my opinion. This is why it makes sense to long this, instead of shorting. Shorting has much better r/r below 7k.

While we did break down from both the channel and support line around 7550...

https://www.tradingview.com/x/jxw85Q4r/

... we also hit a nice target at the start of that previous channel. Further, the “bear flag” on the 30 min chart doesn’t really look like a bear flag as the price is sloping down:

https://www.tradingview.com/x/iOSQ2LWj/

In fact, when studying the recent Bart formations, many of them starts with an opposite flag pattern like this.

Either way, I’ve got stops below 7k and may add at 7.1k.

Edit 1: My position is in EUR (because Kraken has shit liquidity). But I obviously refer to the USD price in my comment.

Edit 2: Looking at that “bear flag” again, it could of course become a flag or pennant in one way or another. But that still does not change my opinion about my position.
hahah yall noticed it says 2.8 getting rekt above the subscribe button on the right side?
Before anyone comes in and tries to be a smart ass about why the market is down. No one knows! 
same shit different day 
https://twitter.com/cz_binance/status/1005689649493209090

Fear or despair? 
On bitmex we already touched the big triangle twice right ? On bitfinex we havnt touched it in the last two weeks at all
https://www.tradingview.com/x/csoKbPGv/

Oh wow. That’s lovely 

A formation actually played out! 

Edit: Binance broke below $7100 they seem to be leading the dump 
[deleted]
At least you can't complain on lack of volume and action today :)

Out of positions in BTC  and a bit annoyed I closed my short from 7640 at 7600 yesterday but whatever. Still have a nice EOSUSD mainnet dump open.
Futures closed at $7665, will this mean BTC lower tomorrow when they reopen?
Uh, guys, any news on that bailout?
OK so I'm glad I didn't buy at 7100. Setting buys at 6500 and 6000.
[deleted]
until (bitfinex) longs-shorts becomes more neutral, i'm not too optimistic on any major recovery:
https://i.imgur.com/e7uXhXJ.png

It seems like too many people are still in "buy the dip" mode while they watch their long positions grow more and more underwater. This by itself isn't inherently an issue, but I'm inclined to believe that at some point losses will be too big for these position holders and they'll start liquidating their positions--causing another drop in buying pressure.

As an example, here's the long-shorts chart compared with price: https://i.imgur.com/tbKVp3l.jpg
On the run-up to just below 10k, the net position reached 10k. As price dipped to 8.3k, the net position continued to **grow** to 12k, but a lack of recovery in price simply ended up creating bagholders.

At the time of writing, the net position has finally started dropping to 7.5k, likely from people selling the breach of the 4-month symmetrical triangle support (EDIT: upon inspection, it seems specifically to be caused by shorts opening). My belief is that a large number of the remaining position holders are grasping onto the hope of a successful retest of 6k. If that breaks, I think we can expect some sort of "capitulation" from these positions.
Some news:  Tezos Foundation is requiring KYC/AML checks for contributors to access tokens bought at ICO. WTF, they dont ask this before they made the ICO, they ask it now, and if you do not provide the information you do not get the tokens! 
It should break any moment from now. The price action is very intense, as the bulls don't wan't to give up. But I'm afraid it's going to be one more victory for the bears. 
These decisive moments are better than football.

Edit : I panic sodl the fake breakout at 6725. It's being dragged back in now.
well next mayor support is $6500, which may hold very short term, but cannot see it holding overall. Best entry that i can see atm would be $6000 for a real double bottom. I would place a buy there with stops at 5700, as if that breaks very likely we see 4k BTC.

 BTC bouncing off the 55EMA(Yellow) 1m chart. 

[https://www.tradingview.com/x/xKmOisaD/](https://www.tradingview.com/x/xKmOisaD/)
not sure there is any news here I think this is an attempt to kill bitcoin
RSI Extremely oversold. Like more oversold than anytime in bitcoin history.

Potential Big temporary opportunity.

EDIT: on the 4hr chart... and no its never been this low on this chart.
One thing is for sure. BCash is up $100 since the last time Bitcoin was around this price 😉
[deleted]
Planning to add more short at 7320ish here:

https://www.tradingview.com/x/H3aqXmkj/

I might not get that entry because this may fall hard without much retracement, like that time we dropped from 8600 to 7300. My rationale is that a bear flag might form, going up to 0.382 retracement at least.
We’re now below the symmetrical triangle support that I have drawn. 


That is my final sell signal.


Current strategy: Wait a couple days to make sure that it isn’t a bear trap, and then sell my holdings with the intention to buy lower. I’ll add a chart later when I’m not on mobile.
**the party has started!**
Wow, this really looks like a market vote of no\-confidence in bitcoin. We'll see if it can claw its way up back above 7k. If not, it seems like we're entering a new phase in the market.  Pretty surprising after all the buzz in the last few months over institutional investment, etc.
I don't know why bears are so excited , we had this many time , same shit over and over in this 7k range , it drops 300 $ then it pumps 300$ , possibly done by the same people just to fuck with us 
Well, we fought for the 1 year/365 day sma for over two weeks and finally smashed through. Also, we broke below the famous pennant from Feb 6th and finally, a major trendline that can be drawn from Aug 31st 2017's high through this year's Feb's and April's lows. 

It's hard to find anything bullish about this action. The big money is in and it's certainly not betting on Bitcoin. I see no reason why deep-pocketed 'old-schoolers' like Soros wouldn't spend the rest of their lives shorting the shit out of the current economy's arguably biggest enemy. Needless to say, these people (and cartels they've organized) will always act unpredictable, so this outlook may bite me in the ass. 

That being said, I'll wait for the Fed's announcement before (probably) unloading a small portion of my long-term stack into more precious metals, as I still remain certain that this debt-fueled mania can't last much longer. 

Good luck to everyone trading these micro-movements and congratulations to those, who've found a fruitful strategy. 
This will still look like just another little flat-as-a-pancake week a year from now. I lost on my last trade, but I'm looking for a good price to buy. Looking like 7100 at the moment but no order placed yet. I'm sure plenty of other people are bargain hunting too so I just don't see it going much lower than that.
We just extended extremly tight 12h Bbands, I would really think twice if it is worth to take the risk and to open a long here.

If you want to open one, the big triangle support is now 200 USD below us @ around 7040, this would be a good place with tight stopps.
Well according to this link:
https://www.coindesk.com/which-way-now-low-bitcoin-price-volatility-may-force-breakout/

A break below 7090 would open the possibility for price movements below 6k.


According to my Illuminati math skills, we might see some bounce at 6200

https://www.tradingview.com/x/VAZLXfJn/
If there is no bullish divergence on the RSI, do not buy. Currently long but am gonna close if we don't get above 6800 soon.
Alts are actually gaining btc despite this... whatever this move in BTC is. BTC chart looks like a shitcoin pump and dump. It seems someone is shitting BTC on purpose.
Major alts are holding or gaining their SAT values.. Hmmm
Long view prediction. 

[https://www.tradingview.com/x/41r1HUyW/](https://www.tradingview.com/x/41r1HUyW/)

Let's see...
[deleted]
I am used to 1500+ comments here, seems like people are taking a break or they loose interest 
Looking forward to the "no way it drops below 6k" posts
spend a few evenings in the pub, drink some beer and then come back end of june and grab some cheap coins! 
Bearflag on the 15min. 0 UTC just passed, ugly weekly and daily close below triangle trendline. Expect some chop before retesting 6K low at a minimum. What is shocking is that price fall with increasing volume and all it does it consolidate before dropping further the last 24 hours, a continuation pattern rather than a bottom.
looks like a decent enough support level at $7000-7100 (718 buyers at 7100, another 976 at 7000) 

versus not a lot of sellers(biggest grouping is 378 sellers at $7400 and then 395 at $7900)

similar situation to what happened last time before we got a BGD. 
Any idea what "participate do not initiate" means in a stop limit order on bitmex? 
Is there a tradeable ETN based on BTC volatility?
What's the long term trend line and how do you draw it ? It's a bit confusing over that long time frame lol
Possible horizontal support at 6.5k, 6k, and 5.5k? Could see bullwhales wanting to create a double bottom at 6.5
What caused this? There's got to be some bad news behind this.
Gonna try to time the bottom and harvest a big loss and jump back in. It’s the only wise financial decision I can make at this point short of capitulating. 
I posted this a couple days ago: [https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8pqakd/daily\_discussion\_saturday\_june\_09\_2018/e0dhzac/?context=3](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8pqakd/daily_discussion_saturday_june_09_2018/e0dhzac/?context=3) but didn't act on it.

Now I'm scared. So long BTC @ 6700. Medium position. This is a scalp trade and betting on a short term bounce. Will sell as soon as price recovers.
The old EUR kraken 2kBTC wall that held us at 6500$ is still there, now it's at around 6100$ because EUR dropped tho. It would be funny if we bounced there yet again.
that wick was a market selling short, would be careful adding any shorts here..
Not gonna lie, sellers are doing an impressive job. Bulls nowhere to found until we get lower. I think there'll be some buying power at $6k, but I'm thinking most are aiming to buy back lower.
paging u/sminem 

we need your help down here!
Tone Vays is proving to be right.
I think its time for a bear flag....
Dont get surprised by a marge simpson guys. we are oversold on every time scale except the weekly-- laddering in buys from here to 6k
Great entry point for a short given the recent triangle breakage. We can expect to explore the 6k levels quite a while.
Source : gravity
BGD reverse, BRD!
Descending triangle.

https://imgur.com/a/KY93Yi5

Could be the final formation to take us to the trendline dating back to Oct17 (in red).  Time frame is a bit short so still could be invalidated.
In the wise words of The Beatles... *Let It Be*.
Going long at [6.6](https://snag.gy/N2I7im.jpg), good r/r with a tight stop, seems we might get there quick lol. 
To being from underwater with high leverage from a shit opening for 2 weeks to being deep in green...thank you to MikeXBT for teaching me patience
Daily RSI is at 30.4, technical bounce here seems about right. Keeping my short from CA 7450 open
Oh hi dump, i didn't know it was you

This has happened so many times before. Every time it does, I hear people say when there’s blood in the streets time to buy. Is this time any different?
I’ve been stopped out twice so far trying to long. I had the stops tight so I didn’t lose too much (about 4%) I heard that 3rd time is the charm

Long @ 6700. Another tight stop at 6590. This is completely oversold atm & I’m expecting a bounce up into 6900, maybe even test 7000 before days end
I've been following the trend on the one minute chart for the last 3 hours. As I missed the previous fall today. I expect another leg down from the current bear flag. My target is 7130 which is right above the next horizontal support level.

PS : I'm a newbie
Can we please just hit bottom already and get this over with?!
Even though I'm a permabull, I'm very happy to see this dip after all the sideways action. The way I see it, this means a bull run is coming sooner rather than later. And my hard-earned dollars will go further than they would've before. 
Long at 7200

edit-Not much momentum left in this drop. We have been trading at the 7k-8k range for a while now. I expect this sideways action to continue until the charts show a sign of a breakout on either side.
What happened to the bulls? Did the matadors skewer them? 
I haven’t really followed the Bitmex UP or DOWN contracts, but isn’t this the first time their DOWN contract reaches its strike price (7250 for the current 7D contract)?

This is obviously not a significant event in any way, but buying that contract a few days ago would have been a great (and cheap) hedge should the market close below 7250 before expiry.

Am I right? I still need to wrap my head around these option contracts...
as scary as this drop is the volume is encouraging and am considering buying this dip
Short opened all-in at 6815.
Order at 7100 executed. ^Schweet* Orders placed at 6500 and 6000.  Fingers crossed!  

Love watching history happen! It's like watching the changing of the guard on an epic scale.  They might get it back down to 5000... like, Bitcoin ded, right?  lol Buy it up, smart folk.  Thank me in October.
Damn.. Seeing some groundless hopium/ new long positions.. 

I guess I will be keeping my short / adding at 7300~7400
[deleted]
Haven't seen it posted here yet, but Coinrail(Korean Exchange) is reporting an intrusion in their system with a number of coins having been effected. Could be a reason for the market to drop as it felt like it was hinging on a string anyways.
That summarizes it: [https://imgur.com/a/5iq9Jkv](https://imgur.com/a/5iq9Jkv)
9 is just a 6 upside down.
We see some sort of movement at the following times:

On the hour, 
20 minutes past, 
45-50 minutes past. 
getting rekt, any positive TA to make me feel positive on this evening ?
effecticly sold only 8k coins on finex with this drop, if 8k coins can lower the price that much where will this go?
[deleted]
Could it form an inverted bart?
South Korean crypto exchange Coinrail announced today it's encountered a hacking attempt, stating that "70% of its total coin/total reserves were safe. 
https://www.forbes.com/sites/chuckjones/2018/06/10/bitcoin-bitcoin-cash-ethereum-ripple-other-ccs-fall-5-or-more-as-south-korea-exchange-hacked/#38b0ea0e58a6
They said longs were hard to squeeze... This is turning into a stampede.


Going to average down on my long at 6700
Glad to see longs are still opening, need more liquidity to push this lower
In my opinion risky to long anything crypto right unless bitcoin moves above 7777 weekly top. Bitcoin still in uptrend until 5555 monthly breaks but looks like needs miracle to stop this right now! 

5555 monthly goes say hello to 3600 and if that goes say hello to 1000 (probably flash crash and reverse from there if it happens?).  So basically i'm short 7500 stop 7805 take profit at 6300 and wait and see if 5555 holds. If breaks above 7800 will go long with stop under 5555. 
I remember during the last big crash my IRL perma bear friend said "this isn't going to stop until 5k". I closed my short right then and there. And thank god because a few days later the BGC comes.

Anyways if you think the market moves 1 way you are deluded. Please be careful with leverage and Always keep hard stop losses.
Looks like we are heading back to 3000$ rather than 9$k in the short term. 
Anyone think this might be triggered by trumps retarded statements today?... i mean for sure his idiocy is going to be negative for the markets tomorrow
Seeing alot of shit posts without any substance. Waiting for the mods to clean it up.
[removed]
When does the weekly candle close?
Which exchange is leading the dump?
Time for a nice june futures long at 6580. They took some real heavy hits
Does Bitmex require KYC?
BTC continues to hold up well at many multiples above its valuation.
Almost closed my long (of nearly 2 weeks old) from 7100, but the small pump here woke up the permabull in me. Going to close below 6900 instead. Probably going to lose money going against to plan and not closing at breakeven, but I'd rather do that instead of seeing this shoot somewhere right after my close. 

The big green candle is going to happen at some point, and I want to have long open at that point in time. Playing time.
Serious question here. How much does MTGOx hold still and why dont they sell it to the institutions in september via OTC?
and just like that new lows
YEEEEHAWWWWW 

Watch out for bulltraps off previous lows ($6500, $6k). We're breaking $6k within a week because we broke a 5 month triangle to the downside.

Like I said when I got downvoted for posting a live bearish chart, the delusion is strong. Bulls have a lot of money to give back. Just liquidated about >MILLION DOLLARS OF COLLATERAL (100M contracts) on Bitmex.
surely this is just weekend dip, right?

/s
Long from 6750 on spot and 6600 on sept quarts (low leverage). I think there's not much more down side on this immediate impulse and a solid bounce could get us up to 7k. Oh, and *if* the daily holds these levels, we get a bullish div on the rsi, which has been a very solid entry.
Let's wait until all the Americans go to sleep with their shorts on then buy this shit up.
I'm bullish long term 100%. That's why I added to my stack today some more BTC/Ltc. So I'm grateful for this dip. In terms of selling any crypto, maybe in another 1-3 years. I see crypto as a unconventional savings account of sorts.

Fiat U.S. dollars have been depreciating 2% of its value for the last 30 years. That's a 60 percent decrease from 30 years ago. So these drops or "flash crashes" that the media are calling it don't bother me at all. I'd say we're on track for dollar collapsing before crypto does. Or maybe, crypto crashing once it's a mutil trillion dollar asset class will be the catalyst that crashes fiat? Either way, it'll be a interesting ride and I'm betting as much as I can in crypto as possible. 

It's moon or nothing for me! Either crypto does well and I do well, or crypto crashes, and I still don't care because it's only a loss if you sell. I'm prepared to see it go either way to the end. lol username checks out. I know.
[deleted]
Daily RSI double bottom, while price has lower low. Possible bullish divergence.
bear flag. hold on to your butts
God I wish I had a list of all the people who oh so confidently ridiculed those of us who said it could easily fall into the 6s again.

Zero confidence in the 6000s holding overall, that new low is approaching. I don't want it to but reality will be biting and biting hard soon.

Sooner we can get to bottom the better.

I expect downvotes... But fact is too many here have been living in dream land for the last 6weeks
Does anyone else agree that this is a triple bottom forming? 
Question: Can capitulation happen randomly during a sideways market? We've been going sideways for 2 weeks and then randomly had this dip, and I see some people saying that it could be capitulation. I thought capitulation usually came after days and days of pure downtrend?
What are your bets for a reversal (if any) - last low around $6.5k, log downtrend line from ATH at around $6.1k (which was broken at 8.6k on Apr 20), or first low of this downtrend at $5.9k?
Did anyone check if that whale who moved thousands of coins to Huobi sold them? Is that even something one can check?
sth wrong with eos ? Binance 11,50 USDT, BFX 10,90. 6% arbitrage opportunity ?
So is the bullish narrative now that, even with this drop, we are now even closer to breaking 7800?

Edit: Salty bulls lol
Do you guys really think there's not going to be a billion-dollar buy first thing tomorrow morning NY time?

[edit: come to think of it, banks in Tokyo and Seoul and Taipei and Hong Kong open pretty soon. Come on, Asia! Puss out! Leave the cheap coin to NYC, baby!]
Ugly 12h H&S confirmed

[https://imgur.com/a/8gizhZV](https://imgur.com/a/8gizhZV)
Here’s the thing - I literally wrote a post yesterday saying it’s about to dump. But I didn’t post it as I had already said I was going to shut up because this sub downvotes most of what I say and quite frankly most of you don’t deserve my insight. I was sleeping and woke up to check the price because somehow intuitively I knew it had dumped.

I’ve been saying this is going to 3000 for months. Check my post history - I even wrote a post right at the top of the last bull trap at 9,900 when everyone thought it was going above 10,000 telling you to sell or you will baghold for years. The long term movements of this market are really quite predictable if you’ve been around for some time. Some of you think I mean we are going straight to 3000 now in a one minute candle then mock me when it doesn’t happen. I don’t care if we bart right back up. I don’t care even if we BGD into the 8000s again. This is most likely, eventually going to the 3000s at which point it will either decide to make a recovery or die. Alts are going to fall even further.

I don’t think some of the newer people understand just how many millionaires crypto has made in one year. There are still so many people sitting on double digit millions or more. The vast majority of these people were not millionaires 12 months ago and have very little market experience. Only a tiny proportion have cashed out any significant portion. They will when their greed turns to panic. These people are not ‘true believers’ or smarter than you or whatever you might think just because they’re sitting on a large amount of crypto. They are mostly people just like you, who happened to get incredibly lucky on literally the fastest growing investment the world has ever seen. They are here for money, just like you. And they will panic, just like you.

Best of luck to the few people in here who don’t deserve to lose money.
We’re gonna make a big ol cup down to 1-2k, see y’all in 2020. 
Well it was reasonably inevitable really. I posted yesterday that once 7480 broke we were in the shit. Question now of course is do we test 7k and head back into the 6s.

I know the optimists here will still be optimistic even if/when we break into the 6s but I for one will not be.

Once that new lower low is posted we'll soon head towards the real bottom wherever that is. I'd rather it's done quickly then we can all move forwards.

So for now I'm short from 7465
[deleted]
BTC has buy walls sitting at $6,500 (3% down from here) and ETH has buy wall sitting at $500 (1.5% from here).  If I had to guess I would say these are put there buy people who aren't actively trading, since it seems like they haven't really changed much since all this started.  The fact that they are round numbers probably lends credence to that theory.

So, I'm wondering how hard it would be to get through those?  When you look at the order book IMO most of the cost to move that far will only apply if you are doing a market buy, a lot of the orders will get out of the way before they hit.  I think these won't.

What do you think?  If we get close I'm thinking about longing a portion of my stack just a bit above.


hoooly smokes. cheap coins!!
[deleted]
It looks like my inclination to stay out of the market and batten things down and wait for this to blow over was astute.

I think the price could possibly end up in the low $2ks or maybe below in the next 12 months, honestly. I will be buying there and I hate to say it but I think it may even be *probable* that this happens.

I say $4300s or high $3ks on this wave of the bear market is now *probable* in my mind.
I doubt we’ll see the 7s again until 2019. 
[deleted]
But on the serious tip: That was a no-shit 50,000-coin dump. 50,000 coins that will be bought back at a big loss. lol

Dumpy gon punch hissef out by the third round.
Can someone honestly look at the 6 months chart and pretend this will go up short term ? 
If you play the rebound here better don't fall asleep.
I'm not going to say I told you so. I'm just going to count all the money I've made shorting since $15k. You guys should keep buying though. Lightning network definitely going to start working any day now!
My limit order was triggered while I was asleep. A few alarms went unnoticed and here we are...
What was looking like relatively strong support when I was setting my limit order is not looking good now. RSI are pretty hot up to 4H but there is no bounce.

!short XBTUSD close 7362

Curious to know the direction once the US is fully awake. Thoughts? 
[deleted]
We aren’t gonna go lower than 5k to much support. Hell I doubt it’ll go to the low 6’s, just people spreading fud. None of you even know what’s gonna happen. I don’t even know but I know too much money is in this market to have any drastic changes from here on out
Have people been getting verified on Poloniex these past 2-3 days or so? I reluctantly submitted my ID to shady Poloniex, and I'm no longer legacy or awaiting review, but unverified. Sent in a ticket 2 days ago, and no response.
If I'm a bullwhale, I'm rooting for Short-bus to get it down as far as possible against the piranha horde buying this shit up.  Dumpy not getting anywhere near the best price. Pumpy kickin' back.

When the retail piranhas start overpowering Dumpy, moving the price up, Pumpy will make his move.  Who knows when that happens. Maybe 5K but I doubt it strongly. 
What carnage. I just posted yesterday that makes more sense to be short than long in this market, because bad news is always just around the corner.  Got 20 downvotes in seconds for saying that, but those who took my advice are wealthier, rather than much poorer today.
The market is down because of EOS mainnet and sell the news. EOS broke the market. The market will go up soon when the first batch of bears in EOS is extinguished. Most likely now. And EOS will continue going down during the next days. 
3k incoming 
Bitmex $50 discount to gdax ..  Manipulation or Short term outlook vs longer term outlook (spot)?
Short since $15k. Every day the lighting network doesn't work, I'm doing a happy dance to the bank! Keep that price going down I say! Not smoking the hopium. Price is bouncing down. Get out while you can!
Can the debils who shouted "This will not go under 8000$ anymore" kill themselves already? Seriously...I made repeated posts how this is a bubble that will correct 90&#37; until I was banned from sub. Well, well, well, look who was right now. Good luck bagholding a beanie babie market crash.
Someone sent me a prediction in my investor WhatsApp group, he says bitcoin will drop down to 6600, I thought it's bullshit so I didn't say it, now I regret it. He also said bitcoin will drop further down to 4k range... I sincerely hope that he was wrong.
According to Peter Brandt, LTC will soon drop to sub $30. Given the fact that BTC and LTC have never moved separately and are the closest linked pair of coins, this would mean BTC will/could drop to sub $2000. I personally don't see that happening, but that damned old man hasn't been wrong much since the bear market.
I'm so glad I sold my btc before people realized it was worthless.
[deleted]
Right. 
Things are definitely looking bearish now that we've broken down out of our 5 month symmetrical triangle. My question ( and everyone else's ) is where will we find support. I do think we've got some strong support between $5,800 and $6,800. 

More T.A. and thoughts here: https://steemit.com/crypto/@cryptoauthority/bsngie8v 
Laughed out loud at this 
Wait til that World Cup gambling money comes in
Bought my father a big red Dildo. 

It was bigger than he wanted. 
Ties are expensive man. 
Next up, Independence Day.
Bitcoin maximalism hasn't been the most profitable strategy for a very long time. 
It seems to me that pulling most of your money out of crypto right now is the smart move, so you can buy back when the real bear market hits.
Thanks for that article! 
I like the subtle suggestion that bear market is over somewhat soon with the "second half"
hop on over to r/bitcoin for some 🔥“fire sale!!”🔥 posts
My only wish is one day you can afford a van to live in... down by the river. 
Soylent for me tomorrow...
> thirty day water fast!

30d. seriously ?


its starting to get worse than the BGD in terms of &#37;
The one on April 11?
USDT are basically crypto treasuries
> Trading with emotion is the #1 way to get royally fucked,

Yes, but ignoring a "correct panic" may lead to you catching the falling knife if you're scalping when a major dump occurs. That's what I did today.
Everyone who sold today above $6750 are better off right now, whether they placed a market order or a limit order.

But yes, panic buying or selling and trading with emotion is never a good idea.
It is not being used a sell signal, this is a technical textbook breakdown.
It's very possible that bitcoin was manipulated before futures existed
I just pulled the latest lightning commit and have been routing thousands of payments on my lightning simnet cluster.

Lightning is so fucking awesome, I dont care about the dips, the price or anything

We’re building new new internet!!! 

I believe it’s pronounced Eskeetit
Yeah man I feel. Im down several thousand as well but ESKIETTTTT GUCCI GANG MOFO 
It's spelled "Esketit"
Your ok right? 
Your last post was great -  very transparent trading strategy and clear (conservative) stop-losses. Gut is a two-sided sword. Was thinking about going long like you - wasn't sure for myself and wanted to wait another couple of hours to "confirm" my guts. U are a great active (and qualified) member of this sub for very long - i'm sorry about your lose. Btw: Where is _chewtoy_?

didn't you walk away in like Jan?  


Stop trading fair but don't stop posting man, your posts are good, we enjoy reading them.
Hopefully not a forest hike...
There’s more to life than bitcoin and money in general. Always remember that.
Cya in a week buddy:)
We're officially butters now.
One can never have enough bottoms.
It's bottoms all the way down
Power is always the last remaining bottom
Where's the first/fourth bottom in this descending triangle? Is the wick after $20k the first?
watching this. Thanks for the update.
Glad to have you back posting regularly
Glad to see you posted man, it's been a crazy ride this few weeks. Specially last few days, were a lot of the traders who we all respect were kinda MIA. But that was a great opportunity to have to rely completely on my own instincts.

Let's see where the hell this thing goes from here.


rekt in 1 min
well that was fast

RIP
Rip
Didn't manage to hop into position before the breakdown, unfortunately.

Right now I'm just waiting for an opportunity to short a bounce. Will probably wait until sometime tomorrow. 
I think he has been short hedged 100% lately, so he probably didn't get hurt in the drop, but may not have profited from it.
lol, market will mature as in shitcoins start to pull the exit scam cause the music is about to stop and someone isn't going to have a chair.
[deleted]
this is more or less consistent with masterluke's latest chart: https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/pmV1uLC7-Bitcoin-Longterm-update/

although, he didn't account for another bounce forming off a second triangle (the one you linked, instead of the one from ATH).

Also, if the no-longer-cosy log channel from 2015 holds, then the EOY price should be a tad higher than 4k.
> it seems pretty clear that

hahahahaha

as clear as mud
www.isthisthetop.com 
No, you aren't selling the bottom today.  You won't be able to do that for about six more months....the medium term bottom.  The long-term bottom may not be for years.

And it isn't "lucky" that the price is at $6700 right now, instead of $20,000.   

Anyway I took some major hits on my altcoins today, so I feel your pain there and yes, better to go to the gym and clear your head and live to fight another day.  If you aren't liquidated, then there is always hope.
I have us about $100 below it so I hope I just have it drawn incorrectly 
Well you *did* eat them, should absolutely have expected as much. Cold storage is better for now my friend
Do you believe that crypto is the future? If you do just don't look at it and come back in 3 years... Don't get sick over it...
Stop eating so many :O.  Sorry yeah it's a tough market, crypto is not for faint of heart. It will beat you to your knees and keep you there permanently if you let it. Keep chin up and keep learning.
You have to take some moderate losses along with big gains. If you were short the last 24 hrs, your stomach is fine.  But if you only want to go long, then this market may not be for you, for quite awhile.
This is par for the course.  I don't trade much, I just accumulate.  For me, as someone who only occasionally sells a small portion of my stack in a bull run, these are the best days.

There is still a constrained supply and still there will likely be growing demand.  You have to expect big down days for any asset that moves up as quickly as bitcoin.  Just try to take advantage the lower this goes.  I have turned my lunch money into the largest asset I own.

It'll be OK.  There are great days ahead of you're willing to wait a year or two.
That's likely to get stopped by tomorrow. The pennant floor ranged from 7050-7120 depending how you drew it and we're dropping through that. We'll see if 7K holds, but I'm doubting it. 

Edit: or the next 10 minutes 
lol
There goes your stop
stop hunting is so much easier when people tell you their stops 
Yes I've done the same thing and tried to catch a bounce and ended up losing a big chunk of change.   I am trying it again right now and just a dangerous game for us to play in the middle of a bear market.

Long-term I am thinking we will see $3500 before we see $9000 again, if ever.


[deleted]
Any thoughts on Shorting at this price range? Was thinking of adding at any retest of 7k
Why are you posting your position size? Risky isn't it? 
https://twitter.com/parabolictrav/status/1005662206178889728

>Quit being such fucking pussies. 
[deleted]
I seriously LOLed. Don't ever change, Chad. ❤️
Catching falling knives is fun!
Still, those are pretty strong hands. I say well done, sometimes breaking even is the best outcome. And despite you closing the short before a drop, I still say good for not getting greedy.
Lines up with exactly what I'm doing. Closed my short from last night from 7335 for a small profit. I think we're going sideways for the forseeable future, but I still think we can get back to 7500 in the next couple days.
 
!Long BTC 7240 5x
THanks man, this is helpful. Def need to learn how to use these charts. To help me get started, what/how do you use the tensorcharts features?
I don't think 35k should constitute being a whale..
Nice play
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtusd

* Opening value: 7,440.00

* Average value: 7,390.00

* Closing value: 6,744.00

* Leverage: 5.00X

* Stack: 100.00%

* PnL: 8.49%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


I woulda rode that baby into the dirt. 

You had yourself a pot of gold 
when true believers begin to doubt themselves
Look at past support lines and trendlines, and make an educated guess.
At the bottom. 


/s


Try looking at the 4hr RSI and when that’s below 20 pay attention on shorter time frames and switch to the 5 minute and when it’s just non stop selling and begins to stall a little bit, jump in. 
You don't, 7000 looked good an hour ago and now we're down another $350
When you say to yourself: "Fuck it, I don't need the money"
always keep some money in the market. only than you know when you want to sell it all. then go long.

if you are all in one position (be it fiat or crypto) you lose some valuable information (feeling for the market).
You don't "know" the best time to go long.  It's always a calculated risk.
Seems like once the herd has noticed something purely coincidental like that, never pans out
Just sell any time Fundstrat or Mike Novogratz gets posted. 
Actually, to be correct, the pump last month started after the 12th, and before that, there was an end-of-weekend dump, from 7180 to 6650 or so. Kinda like today. I am *not* saying there is any credibility to the "6th" theory, but if you want to compare, it would be too early to tell. 

Don't some future close on the 13th, i.e. in 3 days? If there will be a pump, it will likely be after that. 
There was supposed to be a lower value set on the 6th before starting to recover. At least that was what i was "expecting" from that theory.

I was expecting a bounce from the triangle support so closed most of my short there.

Was getting used as doing just scalp trades instead of waiting for the big move, this time my greed actually helped me.
[deleted]
What is goblin town?  Sorry I keep seeing it mentioned. 
To be fair, Mike Novogratz likes to push speeches about how big things gonna get and how bullish he is while simultaneously selling off his positions. :p
wait
This month is gonna be pure comedy on crypto subs 
Still noise until lower low or 10k breach 
Already some of those today, and more and more as the price drops lower and lower.

I have been in utter and total denial many times before in life (including with investing), so I can relate to that delusion, but still good to call people out on it, for their own good.
The tech is all written by hacks...
Diversify with some rope stock
Pretty damn unlikely in my opinion. This is THE move, the lows will be broken and then all bets are off 
also the 3D RSI have not been one time reached oversold territory
You mean bots?
Maybe it's only a few people. Who knows...
Well Mcafee was right about that
Yes, I was barely checking this sub anymore, now the BRD has tickled many buttholes and people are out sharing the experience
Volatility of bitcoin's price is directly proportionate to the amount of activity at this sub. Which is no surprise, since it's a trading sub.

I know this is a meme now but the institutional money is coming. There is a lot of work going on now to make it possible. Custody problem is being worked on and the SEC have said it's not a security. Another ETF been filed. Honestly believe the second half of 2018 will be different to the first. We will then be 18 months away from the halving which is a bullish time looking back. Selling now honestly does feel like giving into fear. 
Yes, very entertaining! I'm watching what appear to be a cute little series of bear flags on the 1m right now, wheeee
breaking below a support line that has been touched 4 times over 8 months is pretty bearish. it will now be very strong resistance, so I actually would be quite surprised for it to play out the way you've described 
Damn that last chart of yours looks scary but exciting at the same time. Imagine getting the chance to buy at 2\-3k again.
+1 I'll match that, GLTA.
I deeply respect your timing. Fantastic position with a realistic and conservative stop.
Target: L14dy meme price?
You need a new pair of underpants, one befitting the current size of your balls. Hats off to you!
+1, much respect
I think it's a test we need. I went long at 7400 (and still holding) but felt a revisit was necessary. Just wasn't sure it would happen. A bounce off 7050 would be grand.
7040 USD 
$100 down for me. $7100

https://www.tradingview.com/x/J2kCVydp/

https://www.tradingview.com/x/Md3tFKib/
I have mine already broken on GDAX, 7280. Granted, last low at 7050 it had already broken through support and then popped back in so I just left my line where it was. Maybe if you adjust the line to include that low then it will be slightly lower.
have been waiting for a violent sell-off like in Feb to maybe spike up some action, finally.
Position closed with success



* Position: long xbteur

* Opening value: 6,200.00

* Average value: 6,200.00

* Closing value: 5,980.00

* Leverage: 3.00X

* Stack: 25.00%

* PnL: -3.80%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


So many 10 milli liquidations. insanity.
We will bounce, retest the triangle and drop down again. We'll probably see a small squeeze because of all the bottom shorters and people will think it's the bottom because they never learn. 
as an added note, 1/x will get you the reverse pairing chart; i.e. 1/(BTCUSD) will get you USDBTC (cost of $1 in BTC). In this light, an interpretation of the mathematical inverse could be correct **if that's what you want** (e.g. "I want to chart the cost of $1, which is inverse to the cost of 1 BTC in USD), which may sound like circular logic, but I agree that when most people talk about "eliminating bias" that's probably not what they're shooting for.

In general, it always amazes me how janky the math in crypto can be; often I'll see people charting **1**-BTCUSD instead of `0-BTCUSD`, or people with "strategies" of opening a long and a short at the same time.

>The only thing eliminated is the possibility that the person understands fractions..

this
What's the point of any of that though?
[Very bullish chart.](https://imgur.com/a/N1sZL4A)
[deleted]
Yeah this has been worrying me. 

Also worth looking the run up in 2013 (bitstamp) when the price rebounded of 45 RSI after a bearish few months ... but we have broken through 45 RSI resistance already 
Zooming out would terrify any reasonable holder, I would think.
SInce we are already down so low, a nice flush to 3k to remove all hype men will be appreciated by everyone in the long run. 
Ju
I still think it'll be 7050 then weeeee (upwards). If not now, in about 12 hours after a load of sideways trading.

Update \- well shut my mouth.
If we go below 6800, I’m gonna go for a long walk and then delete my BitMex account and move every coin I have yo OP_HODL, I think
Spoiler: They are not right.
Where do you check that
They will be punished.
Someone dumped into the spoofing bots who were probably spending on leverage. The spoofing bots are probably now underwater bagholding on leverage 
But are you capitalizing?
When I capitulate, I only remove the price widget from my phone :)
[deleted]
We're still far away from mass capitulation. Selling here wouldn't be capitulation - you're playing the break of a nice formation.
See ya Tuesday
Should there be a sudden $100~200 temporary bounce, don't panic. (like that bear trap yesterday to $7550, then bull trap to $7685, then crash)
good for the sub to have you back. not good for bitcoin tho
I'm willing to believe your target at $5k, but could you provide some TA to back that up? Certainly is a bottomless floor, now it does seem more realistic than ever.
what bounce? When bounce, sir?

Sir... SIR???
i'm thinking of adding to my short if 6800 falls and don't wait for a bounce
Yup...what a surprise, the market retraces a pump that was 99% a short squeeze smh 
Yes, that is called a 100% retrace.
Position closed with success



* Position: long xbtu18

* Opening value: 7,730.00

* Average value: 7,730.00

* Closing value: 7,025.00

* Leverage: 10.00X

* Stack: 1.00%

* PnL: -9.37%



**Price for xbtu18 should be between 0 and 6820.03**

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


[deleted]
One doesn't count ($588, HODLer) and the other two (I'm one of them) are less than 1% in the green.
F
Not gonna lie, that looks like a bear flag pennant forming on the 15min. A bounce at least from a technical pattern stand point is not probabilistic. On the daily, we are retesting support at 7300.
Not just upvoting: Long $50K @ 7305
Hey mike what exchange do you use for margin trading?
Sarcasm?
It's ok. I'm told in this sub that bad news is all FUD and doesn't hurt the price.   So it's Good for Bitcoin.
Smart man, congrats!
I should do the same, but i'm a gambler at heart... Already entered a small long, although in profit right now it will probably close in the red...
Good job man, I closed kinda early 6740 but it was impossible to handle bitmex, charts and a family at the same time. Now it's time to wait for a good entry again, maybe an attempt at 7000.
Don't use the triangle as support, look for a horizontal level that is near where the triangle is. I'm going to keep saying it but using diagonals to make trading decisions is bad. Everyone has their line somewhere else, it's too damn subjective. You could even make the argument that there is no triangle if you use the closing prices or a line chart. 
my thoughts exactly

and bail if that triangle breaks convincingly
7150 on Bitstmp
I have it around $7000 too. Bitfinex.
hmmm... [I have support at $7160 via Bitstamp](https://www.tradingview.com/x/tJc6cpS8/)

I have it around 7200 on Bitfinex but that’s because I cut a few wicks in April. The upside to that is that the bounce on May 29 was actually PERFECTLY off of my line
They aren't trapped.  Many of them already took a small loss and others are taking a moderate loss right now... and others will take a big loss later on.
Great time to buy, bad time to sell, as uaual.
Yeah but Putin just screwed up America's plans for the next 15 years in the last election.  Is that really someone we want to mess with?
>I have no confidence we won't continue grinding down

Confusing a bit... so you mean I have confidence the grinding down will continue right?
It's very unlikely there will be a major trend reversal without a major crash/capitulation first.  Or possibly trading sideways and down for many, many months, but that is unlikely in such a manipulated market.  But absolute no reason to think this will magically turn around anytime soon.
They worked remarkably well in 2017, but then again anything that pointed up skyhigh after whatever dip / dump worked in 2017, so ¯\\\_(ツ)_/¯
>bullcrap

If you mean bulltrap, why do you have a chart where it goes up? You mean bearcrap = beartrap?
EOSBTC and ETHBTC are interesting to watch right now...
"We're all Hodlers now..."
I'm fairly sure the 6th Feb was worse.

Edit \- 16th January was awful \- $13000 \- $9000
I salute thee, fallen one! 

F
I dont think that levels holds if we get down there again. When 6k breaks that's when the capitulation *starts.* That's the level where the new guys think bitcoin will never go below.
It's gonna break 6k. IF we were gonna double bottom it wouldve happened months ago.
If mid 6 holds the bulls will still have a case to make lol.
People were saying that about 7300 last week, what happened?
Start buying when the majority of this sub stops knife catching and thinks btc is donezo
Nobody knows...
at this point it basically has the same effect :p
Chart?
its in between, it is a pennant with with a bearish bias.
It does look that way, I also think that if this attempt at the bottom fails and we continue in this formation towards its apex it may have a good chance of breaking up strongly to the upside. 
Yes, this has been mentioned previously. 
You can keep dreaming about a "higher low" until $6000 is taken out.  
If you believe in the "fill the gap" theory, that is, price discovery, then we should visit $1300-5000 again. We spent very, very little time there.

I personally subscribe to this theory and that is the reason why I don't think it's crazy we go back there 
I believe the technical term for that is a Bartholomew...

> if this was all an elaborate Bart

It basically is. We're probably on our way to 6600, where bart was born.
None of this suggests it's a bart. Volume did not completely die off after each dump, in fact it's the most volatile it's been in weeks/maybe even months
>Imagine the complete carnage that would occur if this was all an elaborate Bart.

We'll know for sure 6 hours from now.
whats a bart ?

Not all heros wear capes 
I slept through the whole dump. Woke up 5% under water. I'm long from 7600 and didn't use stops to avoid wicks. This is not a good day for me.
I'm very short and doing fine but I do feel for the people who are long. This isn't just going to stop. 
ETH is more volatile. It rises harder and fall harder also. That's why i've been trading ETH but following BTC charts.

It's been getting more on sync so i'll switch to trading BTC now since there is always a probability of ETH going one way and BT the other and you get rekt
BTC got destroyed by the absurd amounts liquidations. I doubt it would have gone so low if that didn't happen. 
because this bubble included a very large amount of market participants who will likely not rejoin unless bitcoin sees some serious adoption. 

Adoption fundamentals are looking pretty weak so there's not a whole lot of reason to think adoption is going to save the price any time soon.

No hype = low prices, no/lower adoption = prices stay the same/bleed

Even I personally am considering being done after this. Not particularly interested in trading an extended bear market to be honest. I want my money now. I don't really want to hold open a large position to breakeven 4 more times before it finally dumps through $4-5k in November 
The only reason any responsible retail investor should be concerned is the lasting effect of dumb money getting smacked so hard that it never enters the space again
Well, hype has completely died off. Still no real business talking about using btc or really any of the current crypto coins. Gov’t regulation still likely. Exchanges being investigated. General public has been completely turned of by the collapse this year. No new money entering market. Not sure why you would be confident at all. 
You don’t have to hack an exchange or spread FUD to manipulate the price, you only need to control Tradingview. Think about it.
I covered half of my hedge short, so I am technically long for a bounce. It is dangerous, but BTC very rarely drops more than 10% in a day without a retrace, unless there is really bad news.  That exchange hack doesn't qualify and the news about investigating exchanges for manipulation is a week or two old.

Yes that trend line break was huge, but 12% is huge as well, or at least big enough to suggest ab ounce to $6900 is likely.   Although could easily test the lows once or twice before bouncing up there.
> Our daily volume is almost the same as it was two months ago. This can be pushed much lower.

Actually, daily volume right now is almost as low as last summer: https://image.ibb.co/jEX558/btc1d.png
TLDR: long
While there may/may not be a temporary bounce of a couple hundred bucks maybe, I think you will be happy with this decision after a week or so. There really aren't many bullish signs. The bounce/volume at low 7k was weak as hell. The current huge dump gives a higher chance of 7.5~7.7k having been distribution rather than accumulation
Looks like the weak hands are finally being shaken out! Time to buy boys.
Same here!
Congrats my dude. Have done that a few times, it has paid off every time on longer time-frames 
Good job, if true. That's a proper short then ;)
They are already here, and their posts are directed to those who arrogantly stated that it was stupid to sell at $7100.and $8100...and $9100..and $11100...you get the point.
Well we were at 6700ish for several weeks last time, I'm using that as support for now
mine went through fine with a $40 gap during the harshest drop.
https://www.tradingview.com/x/Jov0y5K2/

Arguably, the most solid one is at about $2200 right now, which is not a pleasant thought.  
Depends on how long you define "long term"...
No that's not something specifically for crypto. It's common for all markets. Low volatility breeds high volatility. 
Breaking below 6400 would not be good. I think I'd personally move both of those up $150-$200. But still, good luck to you man
So, if theoretically all longs HODLed and were 100% long, what would happen?  There would be nobody left to buy into a sell, so the price would drop to find that liquidity.  I think that is what is happening here.  As Chewy put it, ad-libbing supertroopers,  "We're already long, we can't get any longer". 
the fact you are looking at that chart and that ur dutch makes me think youre a smart dude but you are very wrong about something. The drop today wasn't from longs being liquidated or stopped, but from shorts taking profit(heavily shorted at higher prices). You can infer what that might mean.
Another thing is, during the big green dildo, very little of those shorts were liquidated. Don't forget that max leverage on bitfinex is only 3.33. Meaning liquidations may have been impossible (cant do the math right now but I dont think you can get liquidated shorting 6,5k and pumping btc to 8.3k. Rather they were mostly profit taking from people who had shorted at 8,9,10+k.

edit: i said from shorts opening but i meant shorts closing lol
It would be XLT most likely. Funny thought though
Spending too much time on this sub (and in part inspired by your post a few months ago about generating random numbers...), I've been thinking about the "x-axis effect." The trend lines/supports/resistances that everyone is looking at are created by choosing just one arbitrary representation (and anyway, some people use log for longer time frames, and some don't.) It's somewhat nonsensical, right? (Unless we talk about "everyone else is looking at the same chart" and "self-fulfilling prophecies.)

Representing the data in a very different way may yield other insights or biases.

What about even something as silly as an animated 1D plot, a single axis (price) with a dot that oscillates vertically according to the price, just a thermometer? The x-axis for time has been replaced with an animation of same. Just a thought experiment, though ... and I digress.

While everyone is looking at extrapolating as much data as they can from the price time series (and some from the order book), your posts show an entire other world of gathering information (e.g. classifying bots by their timing behavior, or aggregating exchange data to build a 1/4 second time machine.) And that sounds strictly superior because you're using some objective quantifiable data for your trading and not just astrology drawn on a chart. I'm actually very curious how much at all do you use common TA (or even something like these Renko charts) in your decision making :)

(Still parsing your VWMA post from the other day. Beautiful. Picked up two stats text books to work through.)
Great isn't just measured by price surely.
Yeah, it is great. I get to buy in at 3k for the last time in history
Is it really oversold though? 

https://imgur.com/a/VAPqPJ6  
evidence? eg did you see large sells on the huobi tape or large walls driving down the price, etc
Asian whale bans bitcoin, Asian country is dumping on huobi. what a surprise! honeybadger doesn't speak mandarin.
Same for me. Any post made with a bearish sentiment gets downvoted. Well let's see how many of the perma bulls get rekt right now.

The TA indicated a long bear market or a continuing bear market at the least. Now we're gonna see just how harsh it's going to be.

I'm going with very fucking harsh. 
> 'relaxation'

I found it more stressful within those two weeks than now!
>stomaching current price levels is easy 

Not easy for me. But I bought some more...
Spot on. If you want to be a hodler then learn to separate the fundamentals from price action. Reap the eventual tax benefits and sleep better at night.
Agreed,  this is still just noise until the next bubble.

15% in a day and everyone loses their minds.

Hope they've visualized a 30% day, because we'll have more of those in the future.


Either mid 4s or in the 1k range 
My buddy just told me the same thing. Lol
Ya - me too. Spent a week trading and it was like whack a mole. Just researched, picked projects I think are viable long term and hope for the best lol.
what about between 2014-2015. I find it a bit weird that people don't take into account that the market environment (the technicals, before you tell me that things are different this time) is significantly more like 2014-2015 than after that and then try to find patterns that cut off *after* 2014
I’d wait for the weekly to hit oversold before longing check 2014 data for a reference point.

3D went to 30 before a decent bounce. And then bounced again 3 more times at around 25-22.

If you’re scalping then ok, but good luck! This *could* go down a lot further.
Normal settings also paint a very grim picture on the weekly Ichi. It looks all kind of bad with the middle bband rejection and the 200MA rejection and now we have this monster candle towards the bottom of a range. We may retrace some of it but I'll take a small long here with tight stops on perps with a target of maybe the equiv of 7038 on BFX which is a 50% retrace of that 12 HR candle and it'll probably take a week to get there as well and it will probably do most of it in one 5 minute candle.... To me it really does feel like we're on the verge of some classic bitcoin trial by fire.
> This might just be the actual beginning of the bear market.

Yest most "bear markets" are preceded by a 65% drop in price.
The slower the drop, the more price discovery is happening, the harder it is to go bull mode again.
>This might just be the actual beginning of the bear market

Continuation of the bear market, imo. Today's breakdown pretty much solidifies the bear, for sure. Problem is, we're already down 70% from ATH for the world to finally see. The passed 6 months, there was always a new bullish argument to be made but I thought the bearish signs were stronger. I don't know how the bulls are gonna keep moving the goalposts after this triangle breakdown and us bears are very comfortable in our positions.
this is nothing like gox times
As long as the account /u/Crypto_Chad69 remains active, you are not the only one left bullish, trust me!
> Current mood: Bearish

What is this? Tinder?
What? We just fell out of a four month formation.
Try to compare binance/usd because you are probably comparing binance/usdt
It is not a big difference... maybe because the trading pair is BTC/USDT instead of BTC/USD?
curious if Binance BTC/USDT volume has gone down more than other exchanges now that TUSD/BTC is essentially an equivalent option for trading there.
Those exchanges all offer BTC/Fiat and traders probably don't trust Tether. 
And Mex offers uniquely high leverage. 
Edit: Disregard, misread OP's question.
[Investopedia](https://www.investopedia.com/university/margin/) is always a good source
> what resources did you all use when learning about margin trading?

Series 7 and Series 5 Learning material.

Seriously, that is not "learning". it is "look it up, takes half a day and you are done".
I think 3k is a reality at this point. Time to stock up for the next bubble.
a few drops
The resistance/support from the ATH is ~6100.  If we cross that, it gets bloody.  If not, really not too bad tbh.
Sadly, not even close to the real carnage that is likely later in the year.
This is a trader's market now and it's contracting.
That's because we all know that, best case scenario, we get a weak bounce here and the more down.  Even the most thickheaded are almost starting to understand the obvious reality of this market now.
Position closed with success



* Position: long btcusd

* Opening value: 7,601.00

* Average value: 7,601.00

* Closing value: 6,999.00

* Leverage: 1.00X

* Stack: 100.00%

* PnL: -8.17%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


Fully acknowledging this is somewhat of a knife-catching move, opened a long for at least a technical bounce.

!long btcusd 6690
Around $5500 based off Volume profile. The really big level is $4300.
5K I would say. We're sitting at a closing low from what I can see. Not much support underneath. I'm debating whether to take profit at around 5K or let my short run into sept settlement 5K has almost been tested once (well 5.4) so it may not be as strong this time around. Below that 4.65K weekly support but breaking that I can see a cascade of stops and liquidations that could take us lower quicker. Then your looking at 3K and under (IMO) which isn't as strong since it's been tested once on the bullrun. Under 1.4K for any length of time (say a weekly close below or two) could be a disaster but that's unlikely.

I say wait until 5K and see how that behaves there should at very least be a short term upside trade there and if we go lower it will probably be over a few weeks or months but bitcoin always surprises so be prepared for anything...
I would say the old low, so 6.4kish
6.6
We bounced off 6k pretty hard earlier this year. If we blow through that, I would peg support at 3k, which we bounced off last September/October when the Chinese exchanges were closing down. 
500MA could provide support. Currently sitting around $5800. 
Way too soon to call bottom
they could just be selling to btc to sell to fiat. you never really know their intentions
People are selling everything.
ETH is being sold to USD / USDT probably. On Ethtrader someone mentioned a 8000 ETH sell on finex
If you owned a restaurant that sold cakes and the price of cakes went down a lot would you stop selling your cakes until prices went up again?

Because that's basically what you're suggesting.

I'm fairly sure miners hedge with futures- this is literally the reason why futures exist (for example, with wheat, cotton, grains, etc)
I think the whole idea that bitcoin won't drop below a certain price because it becomes unprofitable to mine is a meme. Miners will continue to mine it unless they hear news that bitcoin becomes obsolete/unusable/won't ever reach new highs again. 
It's self-stabilizing. Less miners = lower difficulty = higher return per hashrate.
pretty sure they just remote toggle their rigs as needed.
username checks out
> The rumor about the 6th being the pivot point for the last 6 months

lol no. nobody cared about that shortlived meme.
More like the 6th actually signalled a local top and the beginning of another downtrend
I feel you, people got excited about another dip to buy. Ethereum didn't even retest previous lows. EOS, the coin that was leading the rally retested at 10.7 instead of the typical round number.
First time hearing about the "6th".  Assuming June 6th.  More likely we're going down because it's like 2014 and we went up 20x without building out much use cases.  See you at 3k.
My idea is similar except that whales probably USED that triangle meme and the 6th meme to offload on the unsuspecting buyers
This drop's happening because what goes up must come down. Apparently bitcoin didn't want to go up and up and up forever until the price of 1 bitcoin would be $250,000 next year (I must admit, I thought it could hit $15k but it's not happening).  
    
What's insane is its price going from $1000 to $20k in a matter of weeks, it was a pump and dump that lasted for months.       
   
    
The question is, if the price falls below the cost of mining, what will the miners do?
Here's my theory: some douchebag decided to sell a bunch of Bitcoin, as if he's the first douchebag to do so.
My only concern is I don't know how many more tests that support line can take before breaking. We've already hit it three times (four times if you count November) and support doesn't hold forever. I think Sloppy has said this before, if we keep hitting that support line, then eventually we're gonna just break through. 


My strategy hasn't changed for about 3 weeks. If we break underneath the triangle, I'm gonna wait a few days to make sure it isn't a fakeout, and then I will sell and hopefully buy back at a lower price months later.
on your graph what are the horizontal bars next to the price?
Everyone cashing it for Father’s Day coming up. Pretty obvious dude 
No one knows who knows.
Somebody dumped a bunch of coiins and buyers were like, "Meh, I'll let them sell cheap."
We don't know with 100% certainty, but we do know.
Sure, but we know why the market is not up.

And eventually, when there's no roi in sight, bids retreat.
Haha, by that you mean this post?
FUNDSU ARE SAIFU is what it means
a statement of reality?


It means my funds are safe as long as I keep holding.
MEX and GDAX too. 
> It can’t go straight down forever, can it?

Heard the same thing on the night on 22nd December 2017... and here we are 
if we go under 7k we will see a cascade of sl orders triggered and maybe also some liquidations already... I think if we go under this line we do it with a 150 USD candle and not with a 50 USD candle. 
You better quick specify it's purely rhetorical and not a challenge
which futures? CME closed at 7665
Yeah, we just bailed the BGD out of our collective asses...
Why does a Crypto Chad need a betacuck bailout from the FED ?
cope
I had triggers sells set, so i got a 6x short in over 7.5k while afk, pretty much the only trade i have taken in weeks. Closed too early at 7200 though, now attempting a foolish knife catch.
I did
I was x15 with my full stack CA around 7.6k on September futures


Even posted my analysis https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8ontzj/daily_discussion_tuesday_june_05_2018/e051n7a/
$7420. Holding til we break $6k.

instead people longed the first drop to 7.3k
nuh uh! not letting you discount my short from $7600 because it was incredibly painful to hold! 

I added before we ever hit $7750, too. Added at almost exactly $7600 
Over the past 2+ weeks I was underwater at 7400 and added to it at 7550ish 
I fall under that category. I keep catching the falling knife with eth and btc longs. There is no way I am selling now at a loss. I don't mind waiting a few more months or a year. As long as I have a goal. Which is my case is wait for mass adoption. I am betting my life savings, and my future house down payment on mass adoption.
During ICO - No one cared about KYC. "Who regulates crypto markets? Haha.  "  

Now - SEC, CFTC, DoJ breathing down everyone's neck. 

The risks are all well known when investing in an ICO.... 
lmao they for real now? what a shitshow
I also dont think it will hold. Based on absolutely nothing at all. 
Add another bullet point to Bitcoin obituaries
[deleted]
Funny how this "probe" happens right at the bottom of our long-term support.  I'm a believer news can only really affect the price really short-term and it will bounce back to where it's supposed to be, wherever that is we will see. 
The seed has sprouted and has set, more roots then ever. The powers to be will want a nice slice of the pie before they let it rain again. Fighting the tide is futile.
RSI weekly is not at all over sold (weekly): https://imgur.com/a/VAPqPJ6
On the weekly RSI we're just broken a level that we haven't seen since Sept 2015. Like when 70 didn't indicate the top when it was really bullish I wouldn't trust the daily just being oversold being a good entry when the market gets really bearish.
It has been lower, even this year.
The 4hr looks dirty but the 1D looks like many times in the past
Yeah but isn't RSI a lagging indicator? It just tells you prices are dropping but in no way does it indicate the bottom. And as far as we know, we're looking at a bottomless pit.
Oversold does not necessarily mean a bounce. There's also situations where the oversold bounce turns to be a dead cat bounce. I think it is still too early trying to guess the bottom. My estimation for what it's worth is at ~7550. The Bears are not fed.
Going side ways for a few days will make rsi really sensitive 
Up in price, down in hash rate. 🤔
i have never seen something like it ?^^

So pretty 
Not sure what I'm looking at here?
You mean some Blade-style slaughter party?
It goes to show what many have been saying.. The news of institutional investment and 'interest' basically means fuck all at the moment.

It has to be an earth shattering piece of good news right now to shift this bear market to bull
New phase seems right. That mega triangle breaking down everyone had their eyes on is gonna make it hard for Bitcoin to break back above its support.
Institutions are not dumb money.  They wouldn't be investing in BTC over the last few months.  If anything, they shorted it.
Correction: no confidence in this price level being right for bitcoin
here is one reason

https://imgur.com/a/rYo1WGG
> the current economy's arguably biggest enemy

They're in the process of turning it into an asset class and they're still early enough to buy up a large portion of it and feed it back to the little people at a vast mark up. 

All of the exchange regulation and noises about trading regulation means it's being lined up to be repackaged. The people in the shadows will remain there and recede deeper. Everyone else will pile in via the pre approved channels when they're told to. 

It's being neutered before it catches fire. 
Nicely said and exact my thoughts on this (metals/fed/uncertainty/trump). 
> https://www.tradingview.com/x/VAZLXfJn/

I'm hoping for a trip to high 6900s first though.
How do you spot a bullish divergence on the RSI?
I came to see if anybody noticed the same thing. Strange 
I doubt it. Once you get below a certain price a cascade of stop loss orders is triggered...
No? BTC dominance stayed the same.
Maybe people are just re-balancing into alts. If what you care about is gaining more BTC then selling BTC for an alt pair that you think will out preform BTC makes sense now. BTC/USD prices are low and taxes are in relation to fiat value so the tax implications of rebalacing a crypto portfolio right now are relatively minimal. 
As someone with terrible ta skills who only trades alts/btc and never btc/usd, and comes here to soak some btc movement predictions from you guys, when ever alts dont drop like stone I feel confident in btc bounce

This dip looks strange as f
>Alts are actually gaining btc despite this

fake news

https://i.imgur.com/e7fTytd.png
Except monero…we are getting rekt 
Demonstrably untrue. Bitcoin is 12th out of the top 100 in performance today. And one of those 11 is tether.

See: CMC
Which makes it seem like this is just a GIANT bear trap. 

Like beyond large. Like multiple bears penetrating at once 
I don't see that.  I see them down more than BTC.
No https://i.imgur.com/PnSodeW.png
at the moment it feels that this is wishful thinking. 
Iv set my buys in similar to this, happy to ride this out until 2020. Iv pulled out great profits and left in a small amount, same amount I initially invested. Hope your right in 4 years.
Should have kept your long.
Which is quite strange considering people here are still bullish af (looking at upvotes for opening longs).. I wonder what does it tell us
My vagina is almost as loose as my interest 
first we get the "fuck bitmex is lagging as fuck" posts.
But tomorrow is Monday
Never trust order books because spoofing is rampant, many orders may disappear
Don't get deluded by orderbooks. Iceberg orders, underwater ones, fake buy and sell walls, orders pulled. Price what should matter, not an orderbook. 
Not much change on shorts/longs. Seems to be some "real" selling going on. For me the support won't hold.
> BGD

Noob question, what is BGD?
removed because I am an idiot
Market was trading sideways for nearly a month. It needed to choose a direction, it's chosen one. Thats about it.
The bad news is 1 Bitcoin isn't worth $7000.
record low volume yesterday wasn't exactly confidence inspiring.
It doesn't sound like a wise financial decision to attempt to find a bottom where none is known. What it sounds like is you're trying to make a risky trade repay your lost value. That's being tilted, when you absolutely should not be trading.
[deleted]
That wick could make a good short-term bottom.   I covered a bit more of my hedge short here.
Market opened a 1k BTC short, damn
Look to the 28th of the month. Syzygy. Says Valerie Szczepanik, “Valerie syzygy panic”
He was close enough in the 2014 market, too, and everyone thought he was nuts. He had some good calls in 2017 and was a raging bull for like 98% of the entire run-up. I don't see why people bag on him - he's not even profiting from being bearish. He just calls it like he sees it and people don't like hearing they're gonna lose money I guess.

I like the guy.
What’s his call?
I was thinking 6.6 is going to be the bottom
Yeah we're almost 6.6 already, maybe adjust it a little lower?
Speaking of him, didn't he go long? I want to hear his thoughts on this current bloodbath.
I covered some of my short for a bounce, but a dangerous game that has backfired on me in the past.
I think it's more likely that we see the daily move under 30.  The 30 bounce was predictable in the continuation cycle... right now we're decidedly moving down in the medium term
Why dump, why, WHY!?
The blood comes when 6k breaks.
it's a vague statement that's used to justify knife catching. Yes it works buying the bottom of dumps but how do you know where the bottom is? How much "blood" does there need to be?

people were very confident $7040 was the bottom and look where we are now...

it just depends if you want to scalp or hold for a while
Every time we have been in the 6000 range it has proven to be a good time to buy. I just don’t see this as being any different. Unless, someone can give me a reason why
I'm regretting entering a small long @6710... ETH is playing games and messing BTC. 
Okay, I think you need to zoom out a bit to the 1HR, 4HR or DAY interval to spot a trend. What you are trying to do is catch falling knives, which can be interesting \- but you need to be prepared to get nasty cuts.
As a fellow newbie, I should advise you to get out of the 1 min chart. It's very unpredictable. The longer time frames are more accurate, 1hr, 4hr and 1 day. 
>one minute chart
we have not even started with finding a new bottom
Just come back in a year, we'll be in a nice bull market by then.
It’s funny you say this bc even though I went in pretty heavy last week at 7600 I saved 40% fiat to buy the dip but also said I would sell out at $6800. Now that both happened I’m hesitant to do either. I have no idea what’s going on. 
Ahh of course. This is good for Bitcoin™️
Please post your analysis or reasoning with a chart. Just posting your position is useless.
your donation is tax deductible.
They are curled up in a corner, shaking uncontrollably.
https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8noyex/comment/dzyb2qm?st=JI9PAL6O&sh=7824ef48
They have been the Walking Dead for weeks now.
Hey! Welcome back.

So you were probably right on the price, hope you held onto your short.

But honestly, aren't you just a little bit disappointed in how long this will set crypto back? Kind of similar to how Tesla would set back solar if/when it goes down? 
AFAIK, the options are exotic and very hard to price. I wouldn't trust that I'm paying a fair price for those options.
It completely depends at what price you buy them. The more you pay for it the lower your break even price is. Everything is there on their website to calculate the break even price.
I've been looking at them and I think it's the first time any of the contracts hit the strike price. There hardly no open interest on them or daily volume last time I checked. I bought the last 2 down contracts (only one or two to test them out) expecting the drop, it would hit the strike the one I didn't buy wouldn't it...
Isnt this volume from the coins being sold? 
It looks like the majority of the recent volume is from sales. If anything, I would say the heavy volume is bearish. 
Shorting the bump, good luck
Same. Target: $6,500


After we get there I will re evaluate. But I think we won't have much of a bounce. Especially because volume is declining as the price moves up, it indicates a bear flag.
Thank you for your sacrifice 
Dont the past weeks of price movement speak volumes to the current price action?

Long below 7500, short above

Until we go 7k breaks, there’s really no reason to assume things will be different.

Obviously, if 7k falls... things are very different 

But for now, a long here is a bit of a no brainer
>This is looking like a severe market overreaction to the news of some no-name brand South Korean exchange being hacked. The stolen funds sound like they’re in the process of being frozen.

I think this was more just a technical breakdown of a bear flag on the daily.
No, the drop was caused by an extended Chinese New Year.
coinrail who? GTFO lol.  It dropped to eat stops IMO we will chop for another 3\-4 months to blow out both bull and bear traders.
FUD, 2 shitcoins have been affected.

Really doubt that would have caused this dump.

There has been an cyber intrusion in our system. We're confirming it and some coins(Pundi X, NPXS) are confirmed.
I got downvoted for saying bad news could have contributed to the drop.   So not surprising that you are getting downvoted for actually contributing something to the discussio.
I don't get the downvotes, this is useful information 
11 is just a 1 with another 1 next to it
Okay, thanks... and what does that imply?
[deleted]
Get the fuck out before you get liquidated
Yes. There will be another bull run in the future. And it will be multiples of the current price.
A triple bottom is a bullish formation.
you only want good news, you aren't asking for the honest current state of affairs from a TA standpoint.  what the hell is the point?  look, sometimes you can't sugar coat shit and need to call a spade a spade.  prices go up and prices go down and TA will tell you the truth if you are willing to listen to it.  if you want to be lied to then might as well give your money away as it will be taken from you anyways.
Up to 12k ;)
I think it's probably mostly real liquidity, but there could be a lot of sellers. You're right, 5k to 4k is a lot thicker on gdax, so i think the big guys that want to liquidate will have have to take the price to those levels.
What is this order book you look at? 
derp... think so, Sherlock?
Yep and I said yesterday the drop could be from bad news and was mercilessly downvoted, which I will be now as well, but just speaks volumes about this sub.
squeeze didn't start yet
Too many digits. Why not 1 BTC = 1111^3333?
Hey guys if we downvote this it won’t be true! 
Is it finally happening?
Uncertainty in governments and true financials should be bullish for crypto 
[deleted]
Opposite, markets will roar this week agter North Korea peace treaty is framed 
Nope. He makes multiple stupid comments a day and it's done nothing to BTC before. His comments won't do anything in the future either.
Yeah. Mods please remove this useless post. 
7PM EST 
Mt. Gox
>Bitmex
Binance 100%
No, they don't.
no
I think that's a decent plan. I have the triangle bottom around 7050 right now. So 6900 should be a good stoploss, in case we break down from it. I think maaaany people are watching what happens if we touch it. Would also make for somewhat of a double bottom. 
never change the plan without a good reason to do so. IMO you don't have that. your fear of losing your entry is not a good reason. i'd close at breakeven.
so you might end up with a loss with this *old* beautriful entry... 
They haven't moved coins since 10 May.
Speculators have over 5m coins. This theory that the mtgox coins are responsible for the corrections is plain ridiculous. After a massive parabola, people need an excuse for corrections? 
18.4K tomorrow. Don't sweat it. 
Well you say that but I had a feeling as we didn't see a BGD yesterday early on it would lead to a tumble. Which it did. But usually this is followed by a BGD the next day.

Usually. Lol.
Shorts are not increasing on BTC, it's the longs deleveraging 
Yes, punish us. 
maybe we can pump it to 8k.. mon/tues they will all be doing 3 day bank transfers on cokebase then right when they fomo in.. DUMP the bitch back down to 73 hun.. rinse and repeat. They will go crying to CFTC .. pls big daddy save me from this mean free market.. pls big daddy where are my diapers.
fkenA it was a joke! now go back to sleep
Is this every single moonboy cliche in one comment?
Sure but I like making short term profits, isn't that why we're trading? 
"or crypto crashes, and I still don't care because it's only a loss if you sell"

Without doubt the most stupid line which is repeated in crypto 
> it's only a loss if you sell. 

Only to the tax man. In reality, you are losing value, not to mention opportunity cost, when bagholding. 

>Fiat U.S. dollars have been depreciating 2% of its value for the last 30 years. That's a 60 percent decrease from 30 years ago. 

Bitcoin dropped in value by 67% this year. That's a 67% decrease from six months ago... Pretty sure we all would have preferred hodling that depreciating fiat this year. 
Trump is definitely doing something to remove dollar as world reserve.. Looks promising on that front

What? Link?
On a side note, I'm fairly sure this is the first time 1d RSI has reversed at 30, bounced, and subsequently turned back down to 30 before surpassing 50 since...yeah...2014 

It's possible that this is the beginning of the *real* bear market. Not just the flash crash + ranging for months 


Also RSI needs to be higher for it to be divergence technically. Same level RSI is not really a divergence
I can confirm bear flag. It isn't a Penant. Either way, they behave similarly. 

As for the downvote, I believe we are experiencing similar sentiment in 2014 vs now. Downvotes for bearish comments; it makes me feel that crypto prices is affecting the wellbeing of traders and investors, so their incentive and Reddit votes is aligned. Unfortunately that means we have further down to go
Not really. A bear flag is usually pointed upwards.
You know we can see the time on your comment right?
Inverse bart?
Hope springs eternal I guess.
No
triple bottoms are pretty rare, I'm not counting on it. Has there ever been one in crypto (over a longer time frame)?
It's a double, triple, quadruple what ever bottom until it finally breaks. Then it's errr goblin town? 
I just don't know anymore... I'm holding and waiting at least 3 years... I think crypto is the future anyway...
Double/triple bottoms are only really valid if the volume is dropping off on the dumps. 

It looks like most volume has been picking up on this dump. I wouldn’t count on a triple bottom. 
The first line you are looking at isnt really a bottom at this price level.. It was more of a flash crash 
Hopium definitely does!
We're in months of downtrend
I imagine capitulation will happen should be break under 4k. The disbelief is the key really. Utter disbelief and denial. That ain't gonna happen unless we enter into the 3s is my guess
I could see us bear flagging from 6.5 to 6.7ish for a few hours but the more I think about it the more I don't think it will hold. It would be a triple bottom on the daily which are rare. 
Once they make it to an exchange, you can't track them anymore
They are launching their mainnet if i'm not mistaken. Tokens should be locked until all is done
Tokens are locked, and there are 13 million EOS longs on BFX. Ouchie.
I think that long or short, the general belief is that we're at the bottom of a very large triangle. So if it bounces, it's likely back to the top of that triangle. But if it falls, it's gonna fall haaaaarrrd...
Perma bulls are about to get a big serving of humble pie but of course they won't admit it..even when it happens.

We may bounce up to 7800 but it is likely to mean nothing in the medium term. I'm fully expecting the triangle to break down this summer. 
4 days ago you said it will never go to 5000. Today you admitted it might. Well done, you’re learning.
I'm still waiting. 
I don't know why people downvote you to oblivion, you make me laugh every day. You have my upvote. And I think you're about to make it!
Aren't we supposed to be in an uptrend for a H&S because it's supposed to serve as a trend reversal, not a trend continuation.  Vice versa for an IH&S.
That's not what an H&S looks like, and in any case, H&S is only ever considered valid as a *reversal* pattern. 
> quite frankly most of you don’t deserve my insight 

Arrogant. Stopped reading here.
This stuff while potentially correct long/medium term, are best posted before they happen and then re-iterated after the fact. Not before what you said has even come to fruition.
If thousands of people make these kind of predictions, someone is bound to be right. This is both true for bears and bulls. You calling for 3k when we were at 9900 is just as big of a guess as McAfee calling for 1 million in 2020. If it turns out to go to 3k you weren't actually right, just lucky. Nothing indicates that we're actually headed for 3k right now. 
Crypto genius predicts bitcoin crash before anyone else!! Traders hate him!! 
Cool. Let them panic. 

If people don’t see the future of crypto, don’t believe the price will ever reach 6-figures, or don’t even see all the good vibes coming out of the SEC *right now* then they don’t deserve to profit.

We’re still so early to crypto, yet people seem to think if the price dips then that’s the end of it forever lol

Edit: while we’re at it, I predict there will be a bounce in exactly 22 hours time. If I’m right then my predictions beat yours :)
And this reads like the inverse of some moon boy telling everyone Bitcoins going to $1000000 by 2020. I believe this scenario just as much. It could go to that $3,000 but it could also turn around right here at the local support. The truth is you don't know and neither do I and we won't know until 2020. So you can sit and wait for a Target that may or may not be reached but that feels an awful lot like gambling to me.
Nice fud. Ok so you were right about it dumping yesterday. Big deal. How does that mean that your $3000 prediction will come true? 
Upvoted, I like me some good reality check even if you come out as a toldyousoer, which is annoying.

At the very leat anybody should be aware of the possibility, and not burry their head in the sand.
I agree with you.  Evangelism and trading do not mix if trading is the mechanism for profit gains.  Eventually the party is over for a while for one side and head in the sand is so dangerous, bias needs to be overcome to look for and accept and importantly profit from sentiment changes.  This is why this is more of a hodl sub than most want to admit.
I’m genuinely curious - as someone seeking to learn as much as possible about the market - when you say that crypto is predictable if you’ve been around long enough, what exactly do you mean?
How long have you been "in crypto?"
Susan, we're not leaving 7k for at least a month
r.a.s. : random a$s sh#t
There is no liquidity on weekends. The 24-hour hit a low yesterday on gdax I never saw before. Moving this market wasn't hard. 
that's how you know the gox theory is bullshit. everyone here thinks there's like 20 bitcoins in existence...there's so much supply from OGs who've just been hoarding their coins for years
They are possibly traps which will disappear when the price approaches that region. Which is  how BTC fell through 7000 as well 
Thanks for your "astute" insight, armchair quarterback.
> It looks like my inclination to stay out of the market and batten things down and wait for this to blow over was astute.

You just missed a 12% move....not very astute.
Bullish.

>We can test $4500 this year and still be in a bull market.

what??  minus 11k and we stay in a bull market?
What? Bull market? Are you high? So right now we are currently down around 65% from our all time high and you want to claim a bull market? Delusional 
I kinda see what you're saying, but at that point the terms bear and bull market no longer serve any useful trading purpose unless you trade on 6 month timelines
Yeah price is only down 65% from ATH on nonexistent volume for months on end definitely not a sign of a bear market no sir
And this is the perma bull stuff that makes no sense and will ultimately destroy you 
Tell that to the people who bought in at $20,000 per btc.
Or they'll be bought back for a gain after the new strata of sellers (those who haven't been in the red for 9 months) start to shake out if 6400 falls.

We'll see. 
https://www.tradingview.com/x/FjWDDhXb/
[deleted]
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtusd

* Opening value: 7,545.00

* Average value: 7,545.00

* Closing value: 7,362.00

* Leverage: 1.00X

* Stack: 29.00%

* PnL: 2.18%



**Price for xbtusd should be between 0 and 7319.61**

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


I think we're going sideways for a few weeks until we break out of this pennant. 
I don't see any activity for the last month.
Out of interest, how can you tell?

None of the last transaction dates show today (or recently).
TLDR: he does not know
lol I hope you are being sarcastic. If you are gonna keep rationalizing, I dont know what you are trying to get out of this sub
Dumbest reddit post for the day. If we sink below 6k I'll be finding your post and reminding you oh wise one 
Yeah I did, took I think 4-5 days. This was 2-3 weeks ago
I have a couple friends that had their verification approved in the last week, so they seem to be working on it.
Price goes up = natural organic GMO-free bull market continues to inevitable $100K+ price target

Price goes down = one jerk dumping a bunch of coins and he's almost out, after which natural organic GMO-free bull market continues to inevitable $100K+ price target

Do I understand you correctly?

More importantly, is there any conceivable hypothetical scenario where you would consider admitting that we're in a bear market / heading further down / etc.?
Not being rude. But I really hope no one took some strangers advice off Reddit with their money. 
I’m sorry, but where is the bad news? Price isn’t crashing because of news... if you haven’t noticed. 
And? 
If btc was bullish this wouldn't have any impact.
Why do I keep hearing of EOS even trying not to. Based on the level of mentions, if we were in a bull market it would be a great bubble to short. Feels scammy as fuck
Now $60 discount.. When there is not SPOT market it's hard to trust as a true price discovery.
GDAX has had a premium over MEX pretty much since the beginning of the correction/crash.
Proof
I bought my first BTC at ~1 usd

I bought my last BTC at ~1750

I sold it all and bought back... And I can tell you.... This is never going back to 2k.... ever.

Why?

Because an army of people will buy at 3k. I dont care what anyone says... the entire world is salty they passed on BTC. They will all come flooding back in one day 
No one is right... To dismiss btc and call it a bubble is to be blind to the future of both tech and money... And decentralization is the logical next step in a civilized society... We'll see in time... Meantime everyone is right and wrong at different times...
Clearly, $20,000 > $6700 is a 90% correction. 
Wow, way to be a dick.

I don't wish financial ill will on anyone. Awful karma, man. 
it will take much longer to get to 4k but hes right on both counts
Better start soon because markets gonna bounce Monday morning. 
It won't drop below what it cost to mine because I don't believe miners would continue to turn new machines on without having real confidence that they will at least break even. The network is still growing and at an incredible pace, everyone knows this, it's public knowledge.  
According to me Peter Brandt and anyone else trying to predict anything in this market is full of shit.
According to aepler315, litecoin will hit 1k by July. You do the math on where that puts bitcoin. 
You mean never moved separately during this bubble? They got separated af back in 2014.
He uses classical models to predict targets (height of longest side of triangle iirc). I have the same target for ltc more or less if 109$ gives up, however it doesn't have to move hand in hand with btc that's bullshit.
He has been wrong hundreds of times. Thus why you are heavily downvoted. Including my down vote.
Oh boi, if that ever happens my LTC bags will get very heavy. It’s the only coin beside BTC that i give a fuck about
I see LTC dropping down very very low just based on fundamentals 
Never see these posts before a dip. Everyone’s a fucking future teller after the fact though.
Its worth $7000 tho
It's not that it's worthless (well it doesn't have much use for now, but it has the value the market gives it which can be anything), it's just that too much gains have been made in 3 years.
Neutral? 3H RSI is fucking 13. 1D RSI is 30. How is this neutral? This is as oversold as something can be. 
Daily RSI is already oversold.... 
sports gambling is legal now in the us. why would any world cup gambling money be crypto? I'm guessing that was a joke, right.
They didn’t used to be, a tie is worth 50% of my portfolio now tho.
You're right, investing in the most low value, scammy ICO's has been. Multiplier doesn't equal the best inventing decision. People have different goals and strategies with their investments and most people are pump-n-dump scheme-averse. 

Bitcoin is an actual product, the rest is a smokeshow. I implore you to name 3 other coins in existence with a reliable value case. 
Yeah but that's tantamount to saying that trading correctly is better than hodling. Yes, it is, but it's really beside the point here. 
April 12th, yes.
They are better off right now, but are they going to be better off in 5 minutes? Are they going to be better off in 3 days? Who knows. 
You are absolutely correct. Trading emotionally may pan out a few times in the short run, but pushed out for the long-term it is how you lose. Making +10%, +15%, +20%, +3% trading emotionally will eventually lead to a -60% or -40%, or -90%. 
People on this subject are always so polarized. Like movement is either news driven or technical. No. It's both. Everything in trading is a spectrum where signals are rarely 0 or 1, but rather some weight in between.

Stop treating things like they are either or. There is profit in the nuances between extremes. People on either extreme will be wrong eventually.
How do you know that?
Have any good blog posts/articles/summaries on lightning? I'd love to read more about the project from a high-level overview; my technical knowledge is not too advanced. 
I literally  have no clue what your referring to but fuck yea Li4Titty. 

Tits out for the new internet 
yes, of course...

I only lost 0.5 BTC, no biggie

I mean Imma stop trading
thanks bro

I think chewy is done trading cuz he thinks the market is boring... it has been until today 
lol aiight ;)
I am very much aware... I am not worried about the loss... I’m just saying Im done trading this insanity.
Mantequilla!
I've been pretty busy with work and life outside of crypto, but I'm just thankful I was paying enough attention to hedge. I would have added on the breakdown of 7450, but I was a bit late on my add. Today I was about to add at 7120 on the first little stall, but hesitated. Within 10 minutes we were under $6900. Crazy. I just wish I'd been 10x short on this drop like the last one. Oh well. 
Don't be so dramatic...it took 5 min for my stop to hit 

Good stop. 
Sucks to hear but you didn't get burned at least. What would you look for to go bullish again?
Which I feel extremely confidently the support will be turned resistance (Damon summarizes the climate well). I don't have data but anecdotally, crypto subreddit volumes are down week over week. Flat times are not met with optimism and excitement but boredom and unease.
I'm entirely amazed where people like you creep in from. 

You're nowhere to be found when there's positive price action.

You're nowhere to be found when it's sideways.

Shit, you're nowhere to be found even when price is dropping slightly.

But here you are now. How viable your comments do you think are in this general context?
Historically, the longest ever Bitcoin bear market was like 300 days.   "Years" is silly.
Make it 4 minutes...
Yeah, that was quick, lol.  Will be looking to buy again in the next few days after volatility cools down. 
Posting my stop had nothing to do with the price dumping, it was a stop run yes but the price ran 300$ lower than my stop. 
I'm not a trader. I'm trading BTC because I like the technology and just got involved with trading it. Conversely, I might ask you why you are spending time on BTC when there is so much else to trade?
Short if lower low happens 
>Why are you posting your position size? Risky isn't it? 

I don't see it as risky. My position size has always reflected my confidence in the trade. I have posted trades ranging from $500k to over $7mm this year. 
[deleted]
Jesus. Wow. 

Sloppy, you have been pretty spot on for awhile now on the trend. Nice work. 
Another LOL. That's 2 for me in the course of 2 minutes. This sub always seems to deliver, even when shit gets hairy.
You'll have to excuse Chad. He's our perma-bull mascot continually hopped up on overdose-levels of hopium.
I made a small profit, and also have a short on futures open from a much better entry, so I'm still riding the waves nicely :) 
Well that didn't go exactly as planned. I flipped my position at 7100 and am now currently long from 6760. Didn't catch the knife perfectly but so it goes

Lost a small amount but on the other hand I've got a good entry if this thing turns around. Stop loss just under 6500.
[deleted]
Good one.
yeah, happened at the worst possible time. Apparently family does not give a shit about bitcoin crashing.
so, buy 6th august
Is it possible crypto is seen as a safe haven for people bailing on stocks? (I am bearish short and medium term btw). 
That is total BS. So far crypto has followed the stock market when the market sold off. It is possible today's activity is due to Trump's BS.
It's some place in rural Ireland as far as I know. 
It basically means capitulation 
One of my favourites.

http://lotr.wikia.com/wiki/Down_in_Goblin_Town
stupid meme
This. People are just too silly not to realize all these billionaires have ulterior motives than simply share honest opinions.

Stock whales... They wouldnt be billionaires if others didnt lose money... 

One question everyone should ask Mike here: He had plans to start a crypto hedge fund in Nov 17, he shelved it in December citing bear trend. Has he started it again? No 
To be fair he's usually right. And anyone who is smart sells their positions from time to time.
The last btc bubble follows almost exactly the dot com crash but on faster timeline. Accumulate as much as possible in the next few months.  The price will eventually head upward again. Its orchestrated. Big players are grinding this market to make you sell. 
Sub $6k will be incredibly entertaining. Wish people didn't have to lose money though because it's genuinely very fun to watch otherwise. I just like when early adopters who couldn't fathom going lower are completely dumbfounded at their own greed when they realized they had 18 chances to sell high and took  none of them 
Don't touch your cold storage, uninstall your price\-checking apps, and come back in a few months!

In the meantime I'll be  ~~setting my stop losses around \+700\% ROI~~ researching the tech!  Revolution is coming!
Bitcoin is pretty great, so are blockchains.  I have no issues with that aspect.  I just hate the environment that the market has produced.  This whole pseudo\-community 'we're\-in\-this together' bullshit, which is usually peddled the hardest by people who are safely in profits.
Yup, posted this on the crypto sub and the delusion there is unbelievable

https://np.reddit.com/r/CryptoCurrency/comments/8q2qld/why_3k_is_a_strong_possibility_btcusd_weekly_rsi/

>  There are numerous firms heavily invested and they won't let it drop down so much. This is just another attempt of cleaning week hands and make quick profit.

Just LOL  
a couple of days like that and he can kiss his dick goodbye. 
World's sharpest investors are lining up to buy an asset they all knew about at 1k for a 700% premium.

They also like buying into bubbles on the way down with large investments the market has no where near enough liquidity to allow movement in.

Reddit is about the worst place to find understanding of how institutions actually view the world.
> the institutional money is coming.   

Literally been reading this here at least once a week since I started browsing 16 months ago.    
It might come sooner or later but not the next six months...the next six months are going to be spent in goblin town   
ETF is not coming anytime soon, not before most volume is on US regulated exchanges and the worst manipulation is gone...so years.   


the ETF that was filed was a complete joke and looked like it didn't even want to be taken seriously. someone who works in securities broke it down in a thread on here and the ETF makes almost 0 attempt to fix the issue that caused the other ones to get denied 

There is no reason to think an ETF is coming soon

It *should* be very strong resistance. 
It won't be fun to buy at $2K again after a slow bleed over several months/years to get to that point, along with crumbling fundamentals that push us down there as well.   

Yes if the price dropped to $2K tomorrow, as a result of a huge dump, across exchanges, I would buy at $2K.  But not when the price is there and is probably going lower.
lol, my limit orders never hit. Still sitting there.

Patience is a virtue
I may let this one ride.

Could be the last visit to sub 7500 if you ask me
I shorted 7640 yesterday with 15x but closed waaay too early at 7600. Ah well 
Thank you 
How much money is actually lost here?  I doubt there's this many people gambling millions of dollars and losing it all this often.
if you have a long/short bias it makes the chart a little more agnostic to you
The wave of "well I did bloody tell you didn't I?" from friends is worse than on-paper losses
Also, keep it at 3k for at least a couple months for the moon men to despair and capitulate.
Any reason to believe it wouldn't go any lower than 3k?
Not sure why you think this... it's possible we bounce to retest the pennant support and verify as resistance...  also possible this just slow bleeds to $7k then begins to drop more precipitously once breached

The pennant is a 5 month old formation.. breaking below it is a big sell signal
We are *really* close to breaking that threshold... I feel like it would take nothing short of a miracle for it to weeeeeeeee?
Absolutely, RSI on the daily looks like we could have a nice bounce.
I'm riding this horse down to goblin town.
C'mon man nobody knows what's going on, it's all conjecture and theories. No thanks, I stick with what I got and buy more on the way up.
I'm coolin, bro! Been sitting on my hands (well, surfboard) for a month waiting for this setup and it played out to the downside. 
[deleted]
Dad is that you? 

You left me in Popeyes 16 years ago.. I’m still holding onto the 12 piece and biscuit as it’s the last remaining memory of you. 

Come home. I miss the smell of your morning beer shits at 7am 
Just fell on binance. 
Unlikely to go that far today.  


EDIT: not charting finex
Hmmm.... the loss I haven't taken? Ok. 🤔
Exactly.
>F

Price is down a little over 1%. I suggest reducing leverage. 
Don’t worry he will just add to the position at $7200 and maybe even $7100
R/R is much better for long positions here than short. A further drop to 7.1 - 6.9 could offer decent opportunities to add to that long and stops can clearly be defined if we don't bounce.
The 15min flag broke down perfectly.
I think we are gonna move sideways for 12-24 hours with one more retest of bottom of this descending triangle 

https://www.tradingview.com/x/XZ73oIsh/

Then get a Bart boner back up to $7450-$7500 where I’ll most likely cream 
Finex has it so god damn low.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/zIlBeccZ/

Zoomed in: https://www.tradingview.com/x/qbUpZIkK/

Maybe I’ll swap to stamp as Finex seems pretty unreliable 
I’m somewhat trapped. I just dipped my toe in and converted some USD into bitcoin on coinbase a few days ago and I apparently don’t get access to my coin for roughly 10 days. Watching this is...trying. 
I for one welcome our new Russian overlord
Relation != mess with.
>I have ~~no~~ confidence we ~~won't~~ will continue grinding down


Its a double negative so i believe thats a yes.
bullcrap=bearshit=BS
I meant bullshit = bullcrap, lol

That chart is by someone on Tradingview who said a Bat pattern was a possibility
As a nov 17er, can confirm my angst at the possibility of breaking below that. Any other dip is laughable to me
The only bullish thing now is that this might be taken as double/triple bottom.

I think people will still have hope until new low is found.
Sure, I do post things here to follow up on my own ideas in after a period of time. I like to look at things from all possible angles and evaluate weeks from now.
Great point and of course no reason we should be back down to those levels, except that prices are "sticky" and takes awhile to correct down there.
Yes I usually look for gaps to fill in stocks, makes sense that a similar phenomenon is needed in crypto.  I do still subscribe for the record that 3.2k will likely be met at some point this year but I got there through pivot point level analysis which is my main study type.  Interesting.
BGDs, barts, it's all just bull hopium right now.
https://themerkle.com/what-is-the-bart-pattern/
A Simpson 
But volatility was low... you always need some hard stop in case things go bad. To my knowledge the weekly has not printed a new low (compared to last week), and there are some divergences, you may get out at a better price or who knows, even in profit eventually.Never trade without stops, unless if it's pocket money. Even then, good habits are important.  


Edit: ok, not so sure about the profit part.
Yeah, is it not possible to enjoy peaceful weekends as traders after all?
at this point, id either avg down or just hold with stops at 7100-7000.

in general always have a stop level. i dont use hard stops but i have levels with alarms set to be at the computer when shit goes tits up
It will pause again for another DCB, but agree that it isn't likely to stop until quite a bit below $5000.
Interesting to see the contrast between you and the OP. He’s right of course, and so are you - I just think you’re both operating on different time frames.

To me prices in November are noise still. Yes, adoption fundamentals are bad for this year, but I don’t really see why I should care. 
Valid point but the technology itself is inevitable and the money will come along with it. I believe we are still early in the phase, as most coins do not even have their main net out.
Remember 2014? This is a redux... Btc is the future...
Interesting. I don’t think we need hype actually but those are some strong objections nonetheless. 

I’d like to say that, though it does not have a large impact on my belief, the initial SEC meeting discussing crypto consisted of their prediction of a $5-20 trillion market. Once again, I don’t agree but that is bullish in itself. Markets are getting better, not worse. Regulation has presented itself already and I believe the current market is a representation of that. But you are right, there’s a lot more problems but I think they will be fixed with adoption and some regulations (such as removing scam ICO’s).
[deleted]
Those bags were getting kind of heavy. Thanks for taking them off my weak hands :)
comment may not age well...
To be fair, I don't even begrudge them it at this point.
Thanks, ja really not pleasant..
15,000 shorts closed in like 2 hours mate, doesn't really matter if it was liquidations, it was a short squeeze nonetheless. Stop losses are effectively the same thing as liquidations

Also longs have remained entirely stable this entire time. Shorts have gone up like ...2k. 

The volume on that drop was like 13k in an hour or two, there's no way 2k shorts tanked the price.

Go look at what longs did at $8.9k. They increased by 8k *at the top.* 

They're still not below 30k...there are an insane amount of longs underwater right now. There's nothing suggesting shorts are at risk of getting squeezed.

the longer these longs hold out the more likely it is we see a mass liquidation event 
> Another thing is, during the big green dildo, very little of those shorts were liquidated. 

Eh, on Finex, shorts went from 40k to 25k all on the BGD. 
When I zoom in on the chart, I can clearly see during the big drop \- number of shorts was stable at 23K. After the drop, shorts increased to 24K. I highly doubt shorts were the catalizator for this drop as you claim. To me it looks more like selling large batches of real BTC that triggered the drop, not so much leveraged BTC. The fact that longs are not much affected means strong bull hands IMO.
[deleted]
well said.
1KAt6STtisWMMVo5XGdos9P7DBNNsFfjx7 is the richest non-exchange BTC wallet. 8k coins were moved to Huobi the last days:
https://www.walletexplorer.com/wallet/01118876e81f14f6?from_address=1KAt6STtisWMMVo5XGdos9P7DBNNsFfjx7

And the recent dumps were started on huobi (you can analyze the trade timestamps for that)
Yawn. You say it will go down and then sometime in the future when it goes down you show up claiming omniscience. 
I was underwater in a short and yet the lack of movement let me just set alarms and mostly chill on chart obsession
What's with the downvotes? We broke the triangles. Broke expectations, and many people's portfolios. Anything's possible at this point.
Well if we look objectively at this time period using 2014 as a guideline, we have a lot father to fall.  So better to just not look and state it is different this time
I don't think it is the same. My main reason is because I'm fairly confident in saying that the 14/15 bear market was because of the seemingly endless sell pressure on the market from stolen Gox coins.

That said, however, I actually really appreciate you and the other logical bears in here helping fend off unchecked hopium consumption.
You're absolutely correct of course. Entered as at least a scalp but I'm willing to hold it longer depending on where things go. I entered it on the position bot though for everyone to see how badly I get rekt.
And most trading instruments don't jump $3500 or drop $1100 in one day.. 
I think it'll take some time. I don't think whales are the only ones shorting the coin, even wall street could also be shorting it. I'd think that they would want the price as low as possible before they start trading it.     
    
I think this is just the beginning of a sideways bear market where we'll probably see lower lows with occasional price spikes, squeezes and stuff, and it'll be a time of accumulation. General population will forget about this, they'll find a new toy, and in the meantime wall street and US regulators will figure out what to do with it and implement their regulations, other countries too, and then when it's the right time, they'll push it again, then people will fomo again and we'll have a new bull market. When? I don't know, probably not very soon. But we'll see, I might be wrong too. My guess is as good as anyone's.. 
this time it is different ^(tm)
looks more like a status you'd see on grindr
stamp is usd, so is gdax
Uncertainty in tether would make btc at a premium and its always at a slight discount. me confused.
Appreciate it, i’ll check it out
[deleted]
Yes it depends on how fast we get to $5K.  If tomorrow, then I would cover and ride a bounce up.  If it slowly bleeds down to $5K over the next couple of months, then no reason to cover there.
Yeah 4.9k is the next major level, but it could over shoot that to as low as 4.3k imo if there is a big capitualtion like in feb.
so TL;DR: Some support at 5k, another at 4.65k else to 3k. 1.4k-3k at the lowest, with under 1.4k being unlikely?
6.66 
I can't argue with that, just posing the question.
> If you owned a restaurant that sold cakes and the price of cakes went down a lot would you stop selling your cakes until prices went up again?

I'd continue selling cakes until the price of cakes was significantly lower than the cost to make cakes (flour, sugar, power, rent, etc.), at which point I'd probably pivot to baking pies instead.

It's interesting how many people can intuitively grasp this area of Econ 101, and yet are flabbergasted by BTC mining economics.
Lots of miners don’t want to sell below cost, so selling can dry up at that level. 

They also have a huge incentive to prop up the price to keep it above their break even point. 

This is my speculation. 
But it takes some time to correct, it isn't instantaneous due to how BTC difficulty is calculated.
Or maybe lower. 
Some will shut down. Some will innovate. The price to mine will go down.
Yes everything you said is correct.  $20K was mostly a sham and a scam anyway...pumped up there with outright manipulation, all the way.
What's current cost of mining? Do you know?
if selling at 7600 makes one a douchebag... what would you call ppl selling now at 6700
yeah, what a douche!
That’s a very fair point. It certainly isn’t a given that the triangle support is going to hold here. Risk management and stop-losses are as important as ever.
That’s called volume profile. It’s an indicator that shows the volume at any given price level.
Same thing every year
hehe
Hey how do you check this stuff
Is this the first time futures have had such a high premium? 
[deleted]
I’m convinced every time you short the price doesn’t just drop, it goes through the earth 
[deleted]
That is quite possibly the most stupid thing I have heard regarding personal finances. 
I hope it's a (bad) joke.
Im not invested in this ICO but today you just cant distribute coins without KYC. Its either that, or get shut down by the SEC. Some legal teams have been asking for participants KYC even for airdrop distribution. And airdrops to be taxed as gifts. Lol 
 With the amount XTZ raised and all the drama so far, its not really an option to be in the the spotlight for legal non-compliance 

They are offering a refund for those who cant register. 

Funny though lol  
what is your re\-entry point? mine is 4750
4hr chart. I edited my post to reflect this. it has never been even close to this low.
Lower in the thread someone posted the weekly RSI has been a lot lower for a lot longer before as well
He is looking for a scalping opportunity and not a long term position. Usually after such a drop a bounce is expected when RSI levels get very low. But it's also possible this keeps dropping for a while before bouncing.
I think RSI is a relative indicator, which may be interpreted as lagging? Not really sure. 
He's not really showing the rest of the chart but I would assume he's saying we're visiting the top line, which would be a lot lower than we are at right now. 

It's a 1/price chart
It's an inverted btc chart
I don't think it's good news as much as it's time--the memory of the pain of the bear has to be more distant and the price has to be low enough to be attractive to accumulate
Fair point
People like to find reasons outside of "it went 35657% up in x years". If you want... Pretty sure Batman has something to do with it, too.
?? I don't understand. Why?
https://www.investopedia.com/terms/d/divergence.asp

TLDR: Lower low on price, higher low on RSI.

Though you rarely have to zoom into the indicator to tell whether it diverged, that was *ridiculously close*.
You look at two bottoms, you want to see a lower price but a higher RSI. In this case 5/28 and 6/10 on the daily chart. If the second bottom closed at a lower price, but has a higher RSI it is considered a bull div. Bull div didnt really happen (it was close though). You can look at other timeframes too, for instance the 1 hr chart is showing some bullish divergence over the last few hours in this consolidation: https://imgur.com/a/XGRY54n (look at green lines i drew, price trending down, but rsi trending up). Hourly bull div is not enough for me to buy right now, I personally would wait for a 4 hr at minimum in these conditions.
Yes, but you should give this some time. It seems people are taking positions in alts, to outperform btc
Yes, I think that's what is happening. I took positions in alts when BTC began moving sideways for a while. I think if the market moves good alts will gain significantly, and BTC price action is downgraded to that of a shitcoin right now. 
Yes, but predictable. People are fed up with BTC movement and are taking positions in alts that may outperform btc to gain Satoshi value
 That's my explanation anyway
Huh? Check top 10 alts, 1hr chart
Yeah its been really down the dumpster ever since all those shitty forks

Something must change for Monero and fast... 
This is good for monero...somehow...
Check the hourly chart, they are gaining
SATs bro SATs.. Look at the hourly
It tell us that some people are bullish
best day foran  evening in the pub with some friends!
I don't look on the order for the # of coins people want to buy...I look on the order books for the # of buyers there are with orders at that level. 

i find it to be a much more reliable indicator of buyer sentiment 
not my first rodeo. 

but its a bit different when its one whale with a 1000 BTC buy order vs 800 little fishies each wanting to buy half a BTC. The whale will pull his order or will use it to spoof a sell off. 

The fishes actually want to buy the coins and if you want to go below that level, you have to sell them your coins 
Big green dildo
Dildo=Candle
wrong. it means exactly that it is a post\-only order. (but you don't want that on a Stop\-Limit, or it will get canceled)  
You are not initiating a trade, your order is on the books. But when someone else marketbuys/sells into you, you will participate.
I’m a holder and plan to hold through this bloodbath. Harvesting some losses is the best way to save some money to offset early gains. I’m still 40% fiat but sitting on my hands. I’m definitely not on tilt since when I bought back in at 7600 last week the potential of this happening was a risk I was willing to take. Next step ladder buys in when the dust settles or not buy at all. I always have a strategy. 
I don’t necessary have to find bottom bottom since I’m already down over 10% so selling now and immediately buying back will harvest some decent losses. I’m still on the hook for over 300% realized gains from earlier this year which I have tax money set aside but wouldn’t mind lowering my bill a bit. Otherwise it’s a no trade zone for me and buying more BTC or putting in fiat is not in play for me. 
yup
He thinks it will go to 5k.. or lower..  similar to 2014. I follow this guys steem account he puts up a few peoples TA analysis’ everyday.   https://steemit.com/@famunger  tones’ is always the first summary
At least for a little bounce and see how it plays out. 
No i didnt hit her! No! I didnt! Oh hi dump.
Why 6k?
It's a Wall Street saying that is used incorrectly by a bunch of noobs in here to lose more of their money.
"Every time"...as in twice this year.

You see 0% chance of this being any different.  Some of us believe it is well over 0%...over 50%, in fact.
Yes, of course I'm looking at the wider picture as well. But since we broke last support lines one after the other, I feel the one minute chart was useful in that specific situation.
https://preview.ibb.co/hWHD7o/7_EEE7_D66_4_D7_E_4_EA0_99_F3_BB88_B6430_BB2.jpg

The blue circle is where I'm currently zooming at. The actual and next support levels are in red.
Why is the 1 min chart irrelevant in that specific case ?
Thanks Mr Wizard.
Remindme! 1 year
Not much momentum left in this drop. We have been trading at the 7k-8k range for a while now. I expect this sideways action to continue until the charts show a sign of a breakout on either side.
?
The only thing Tesla did was making eco friendly cooler. It fails at everything else, horribly.

Solar is pretty bad for the ecosystem and environment, overall. Nuclear is significantly better than solar but Musk hinders that effort at every chance.

Then on top of that, battery electrics aren't the future, hydro fuel cells are. They've always been the future, going back as far as about 20 years ago when research had begun. The problem is that fuel cells were made of mostly platinum up until recently (new materials engineered in the past decade that got applied to fuel cells), and that made the fuel cells (for cars) insanely expensive.

That's changed, and now the automaker execs believe fuel cells are the future. Only Musk is sitting on his stupid battery electrics cause he's driven by his massive ego, not greed.

In our situation, everyone's driven by greed. This is hurting crypto for the shorter term for sure, maybe longer term. It's hard to say, for sure because there are a lot of financial problems with the US that will come to a head in the next decade and that could send the dollar in many directions.

No other currency is large or stable enough (much less trustworthy) to be used as a general world currency.

Until the US has serious financial issues, however, crypto has but a very small niche use case which makes it worth significantly less than it's listed as of now.
A coin cannot be sold that is not also bought. 
yes but i believe the way it works is for every seller there has to be a buyer on the other end.  And if you were to be a whale than buying when the market is down makes perfect sense, cause then you can pump the market, get other traders buying into the momentum, and then sell
Wait, why is 6500 your target? Once the price goes under 6600, there's no support for a long way down.
As usual, you've got that backward. Two years from now, people will be like, "FUCK! I should have bought Bitcoin at $7K!" like they do now with, "FUCK! I should have bought Bitcoin at $25!" (like I did, by the way... only regret is that I traded 10 BTC for 3.5 grams of a weed that grows everywhere)  Never regretted buying Bitcoin, but dang sure have regretted selling it, just like this current crop of sellers will.

[edit to add: oh, and by the way, there will be a very large buy/"BGD"(as they say around here) pretty soon.  Maybe at around 6.5 if the mentally disabled big bears have the strength to get it there.]
"Long below 7500, short above" has worked for now, but the break-down was accompanied by a significant 2 HR volume, the highest since May 23. Any climb to 7400 could still be a formation of a bear flag, IMHO.
Says someone who doesn't really understand TA that well and makes decisions based on their 'gut'. 

>But for now, a long here is a bit of a no brainer

No offense but you're almost always handing out terrible advice. Maybe you should qualify your comments with a disclaimer noting that you don't know what your talking about but enjoy writing a bunch of garbage anyhow.
[deleted]
Are you sure it's not the Tax Season extension?
Too bullish
Bots are probably working at them times. 
Cool chart, just followed you
Do you feel that the 6k6 support will hold ?
2nd one MFI?
unrelated question, do you use mySQL for your TA?
You can't get liquidated just by holding 
Based on hopes and dreams. 
https://www.investopedia.com/terms/t/triplebottom.asp
sounds like it :-)
Volume should also be dropping off in the dumps to confirm. 

Looks like our volume is *mostly* in these dumps. 
a lot of back and forth selling for sure...
You were downvoted because anybody whose serious went and Googled this: https://coinmarketcap.com/exchanges/coinrail/

Hackers could take their entire cold storage and it probably would still be a drop in the bucket. They are a trivial player.

There's something else that's driving this.
Better add to my short then
My god..  that has been the secret this whole time!
We're heading for the right direction at least.
But it isnt, people will reduce risk during unstable times like now and bitcoin is a high risk investment.
Dno where youre getting sec. Im talking about trump threatening to stop trade with the other g7 members, and going crazy in general. Also not saying its his fault...it was gonna dump regardless
lol
He threatens to stop trade with your closest allies every day?
Ok thanks. That's when I sell if we're still under the support line by then.
Lol
The BTC/USDT UI was also quite shitting itself. 

I know that much talking about september. If they have say 140,000 left they can sell it off via OTC to an institution. 
Nah they all know it is just manipulation
Hey Dvoters.. don't shoot the messenger.

.. ah yes the infamous dvote brigade.  We wouldn't want people googling or ytubing ' flouride in the water really does shrink my testicles"

 later edit.. holy shit google it LMAO then go to bitcoinMarkets main page and scour  through the posts about regulation and oversight and big daddy and ask yourself how many posters have been shrunk?? eh?
I sell at losses time to time if I feel the price will reverse soon but will continue to go a bit lower so I can harvest some losses and rebuy lower. Wash sale being allowed in crypto is great. 
I agree. A real bear market of endless sideways, shakeout fluctuations to steal as many BTCs from investors as possible. At this point, divergence doesn't really mean much, imo

Hasn’t it been a real bear market since January 
Please visit us more frequently. We would love to hear your opinion :D
Sup!

Yeah, my thoughts exactly.
22 upvotes on mikexbts baseless bullish comment. at least i'm commenting a chart pattern, lol 

how is this not a bear flag wow https://imgur.com/a/F8cmI6U

delusion is strong rn

and sure how about pennant is that better
Yes
The future of whales
thanks 
We already had three tests on the support line and this last few days played out exactly as the breakout of a long triangle formation should play out. Weak bounce from support \+ sideways in the 'middle' of the triangle, first sign that something was wrong was that we never got to 8200 \+ high volume and pretty nasty drop. Thinking that it will hold right now is not an assumption you should make. 
[removed]
Not only not admitting it, looking forward for some more monthy in accumulation with a chance to DCA into a nice new long positiion.
It will never go to 5000.  There will be a billion-dollar buy soon.  Good news for the buyers is that they got it at a really good discount.

If it goes to 4000, does that mean Bitcoin ded or just another dumbshit sold their power for a few depreciating dollars?
its all a question of perspective from 7040 to 7786 we have been in an uptrend. 
[https://www.peterlbrandt.com/do\-continuation\-head\-and\-shoulders\-patterns\-really\-exist/](https://www.peterlbrandt.com/do-continuation-head-and-shoulders-patterns-really-exist/)
Lol...i downvoted there and then kept reading to see if I should un-downvote....nope
> best posted before they happen

> Not before what you said has even come to fruition

I'm not following at all what you're trying to say. He should post it before but not before?


RemindMe! 22 hours 
Future promises are not tangible or relevant for technical analysis decisions.  Hodl is what you are looking for which is fine, just don't conflate this with believing you're trading.  It's an investment which is great but you don't need RSI and triangles to tell you to hodl.  Posts like this add no value to trading discussion honestly and can have a really bad influence on staying neutral to the charts.
I’ve got no problem with ‘toldyousoers’ but doing it before your price target has been hit comes across a bit douchey 
I know the original forfeit was piss on my tits but if we break under 7k today I'll piss on yours


Dang, good point....
I've been telling users in this thread about the bear for a while now.

You don't get treated in a pleasant manner when you try to do that.
[deleted]
Everytime I open up the coinbase app and defaults to one year chart it reminds me we re still up 50% so there is a case that we re still in a bull market. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
I mean that entire graph hinges upon us not falling another $100...
!remindme aug 30 is btc 13k?

^^^^^^^^^^^^^https://www.tradingview.com/x/FjWDDhXb/
Thanks. Totally not asspulled at this point.
The person who made this chart is delusional, so is everyone who believes in it or even hashope in it. What a useless chart.
Keep buying. The devs will make it all work.
4 sentences, do we really need a TLDR?

Also, nobody knows.
I hope people take good, logical advice.  I sure do from other people.
https://www.forbes.com/sites/chuckjones/2018/06/10/bitcoin-bitcoin-cash-ethereum-ripple-other-ccs-fall-5-or-more-as-south-korea-exchange-hacked/#2248e38458a6
And...SFYL.
50% of EOS is owned by one person. Decentralized crypto currency? Lol. 
Proof that the lightning network is a technical farce promoted by charlatans? Just read their white papers. They can't describe a viable routing solution. They can't describe a scaling solution.
It's a no brainer!
Personally I think you're full of BS (going off your other comments over time) and wouldn't believe anything you say.

You probably bought at $19k
>I sold it all and bought back... And I can tell you.... This is never going back to 2k.... ever.

Prepare for years then.

>Because an army of people will buy at 3k. 


There is no guarantee this will happen. Wishful thinking. 


But it is literally a bubble. Just look at the chart, textbook bubble.
You still don't get it, do you? This is going sub 4k$. But  you still aren't listening. I'm giving you a tip right now but you refuse to acknowledge it.
Ad hominem. A dick is someone with delusional thinking who thinks once price for magic internet beans goes from 1000$ to 20k it won't correct all the way back and tells other people to buy and become new bagholders.
I really don't understand why people think the mining cost is the floor. It makes 0 sense.

If the cost to mine exceeds the cost of bitcoin, less efficient miners drop out. 

Some people can mine for $600/btc some can mine for $6000/btc. The latter will stop mining and difficulty subsequently adjusts. It's that simple. Please end this myth of the mining cost being the floor 
I never found the cost-of-mining argument very convincing. Miners hedge their price risk by contract like any corn farmer does. Those who manage big investments into mining hardware are not in the business of "having real confidence" in anything, they need a proper risk/reward setup. There's a good chance they forward sell the lower estimate of their yearly BTC production before the hardware is even unwrapped. And if they don't hedge and the price falls below production cost, they shut down and get rekt on their long-term bet like anyone else. It's hard to follow why miners would establish a price floor, they cannot magically cancel out a lack of demand.
How much is the cost to mine btc currently? 
10x in 20 days with no news or fundamentals....yeah.
This delusional predictons is why I am 100% sure rekting is not over yet, far from it
I don't think so. He has predicted the drop from $20k to $6k pretty accurately 
Then BTC will also drop very very low.
Truth
I was making them
I use it order drugs still, it will always that value to it. If it wasn't for Ross I doubt crypto would have ever taken off to begin with, or at least taken much longer.
def a joke
Ignoring ICO's entirely you are still wrong IMO. 

Pretending bitcoin is the only worthwhile ledger in a nascent asset class worth hundreds of billions of dollars is a peculiarly outdated viewpoint. 
What is your point? It seems like you're just offering feel-good reasons for bad trading advice.

You seem like a pretty smart person, but your bitcoin maximalism leads you to some strange conclusions.
That's a great attitude to have with trading.  It doesn't ever matter when you buy or sell, because the price could always be different in the future.

What stops you from buying back right now? People always act like you can't buy it back 5 minutes later. If the price drops you have more for the same amount of money. It's always a better option than to keep your loss.
> There is profit in the nuances between extremes

I can't find this indicator on tradingview, are you sure it's spelled "nuances"? Maybe I should look for a "moderate outlook oscilator"?
because the CFTC news came out like 4 days ago?

You guys always come up with a reason for every price drop but when the price meanders up for 4 weeks there's not much good news to be found.

This is all just price discovery. 

Perhaps it's manipulating whales cashing out, idk. I'm sure they would've began cashing out a while ago when the CFTC probe started though. 
How about this:

I’ll set up a big skype session this week and I’ll show everyone how it’s done?

Upvotes if interested... We can try to connect to one another and run a big simnet.

Comment ur skype username maybe?
Ok good to hear. (Not the .5)
shit happens man, there's more important things than money, enjoy life :)
Yeah I know man, I had family visiting this whole week which was nice to be able to take a break with all the chop. And last night I hesitated to open at 7600 waiting for it to climb to 7700 and while I was putting the little one to sleep I could hear the alarms going off. I got all in 10X between 7400 and 7300. And of course that when shit started to hit the fan today I was out with family. So I closed a bit early around 6700 instead of catching the June futures low of 6400. But regardless that was the biggest trade yet so I can't complain.

I got a small long from 6600 now hoping for a technical bounce to 6900 with tight stops though, but I think we might see 6400 before that. 
A miracle?

All kidding aside, breaking down from that triangle is pretty bad news no matter how you look at it. 

I'll be bullish if $6,000 holds and the market recovers above $10,000...but I have no reason to think that will unfold here. Quite the contrary actually, that really shouldn't happen. 
He's been here longer than I can remember...that's PeaceHere/mferslostmymoney
Actually I was here before the big drop, saying that it's better to be short, because more bad news is always right around the corner.  

And that is just what happened.

And I have posted when there is positive price action, but just not many opportunities for that this year.  Look at the chart.
413 days from top to bottom nov 2013 to jan 2015
Yes, historically, as in the past.  

And I didn't say the bear market would last less or more than 300 days.   There can easily be another bull market in six months and then a bear market to take the price even lower than it has been in a couple of years.
make it 2 minutes
Preach it. Crazy days we are seeing.
[deleted]
Maybe he's not a total moron like most people who end up getting hacked
Hey, thanks :) 

Think some of it might be luck but who knows, I'm doin' my best 

Ah, i see.
[deleted]
I mean it depends on the timing, right? He was doing interviews about how bullish he is on Ethereum when it was a week away off its first ATH in summer, for example -- yeah, he was 'right' in the longer term sure, but you know...
I agree.
Dont forget we are at the ground floor of a revolution. 
His idea all along was to claim his account was hacked when he made that statement.... 
You say that like it's BS, but since 16 months ago \*some\* institutional money already came in: the more maverick hedge funds and smaller guys dipping their toes in, which caused the price to 20x (ok and now only 7x).

However there's bigger hurdles to entry for the bigger boys.
I think most people thinking it'll break upwards here are mainly hoping. 

They don't seem to realize that breaking below $7k is like breaking above $10k

Sometimes the market is really obvious with what it does and people want to ignore it because it's not the outcome they were hoping for 

I mean, yes, we're only like 4-5% away from being above that line. So it'd be like $10400-10500

which, if we hit, I would really not expect us to go down again. If we hit $10.4-10.5 I would've expected $11.7k first before $9.8k
I bet a lot of people saying they will buy at $2k won’t buy if we get there. 
We're in a place where you don't have to rush... Might consider rolling into this position with a variation on a market making bot.
Really? Contraian view with gigantic balls. Respect the conviction.

Any new rationale or just solid r/r? 
Good luck: i have some long orders layered down to 7050 (triangle bottom on my chart), only one hit so far (small position), will bail at 6940. 
Those liquids are all probably 10x leverage or higher, but some people do lose millions on massive dildo days like this.
Well max leverage is 100x so at least 100,000 USD. However I think they are liquidated long before loosing everything.
At minimum you'd need to 100x leverage $100,000 for a $10million rekt. likely the leverage is between 10 and 25x, so few hundred thousand to a million dollars to lose $10m
Last bullrun had a top of 1.2K I expect price to stay above but come close. 3K is also what everyone is waiting / expecting to buy at i.e lots of support
None. 
So u r short from here on out? All the way to zero?
It's pretty clear actually. A massive triangle broke to the downside with a target of roughly $3600, with volume confirmation. Go ahead and buy if you have a long-term outlook but you're going to be losing money in the short-medium term.
Where are you surfing? I'm planning a wee trip to Bali next week. 

Trading crypto + surfing = pretty ideal. 
Alright, fair enough :)
>Dad is that you?

no its LADY
added on another pair but already got stopped (had tight stops). Will see what happens now @6800...
It already did.  It actually went farther than it needed to.
It is an interesting revelation actually. Market data (shorts vs longs) only gives you cumulative position sizes / ratio but no indication of "people count". One could argue this is a better indicator of running out of buyers / sellers than just looking at SvL ratio.

I am in no way saying that I'm totally comfortable in my position and that it won't go down more / I won't get rekt (again) but when a directional choice becomes easy money, at some point it becomes too easy. Are we there now? No idea. We'll see though.
What do you suggest now.  
The sheep mentality in this subbredit is astonishing. 44 upvotes and probably dozens who followed your pro trader position (I didnt...)
Yeah price variations on exchanges can make it a bit challenging to get positions just right... this latest drop looks like a near perfect bounce from the line via Bitstamp.  If it holds we should move up a few hundred bucks at min.

I think if $7100 falls, it'll likely run down hill pretty quickly
In Soviet Russia, Putin decide otherwise.  The KGB comes for you!
good looking out
Thanks for that. I should obviously have used stops. 

Do you think it's a bull div on the hourly RSI? Worth also watching what looks like a bear flag on 30 min. Where to place the stops now, in case we go down from here? 
Lesson learnt: The "things are going so well I can let down my guard" fallacy. This must be one of the most anticipated BTC dumps  in recent memory. 
Technology is nowhere near inevitable, in fact it looks very likely that it's the opposite right now 

No good news on adoption. all "good news" is regulation and trading desks. Vast majority of retail will not want to trade an extended bear market. 
It's when people start saying things are inevitable that you know it's time to leave 
In 2014 almost no one cared or even knew what btc was. This collapse had the eyes of the world watching and to many it justified their belief that it was a fad and bubble. So now they are unlikely to jump into it
Yes we broke it a few hundred $ ago.  Breaking the pennant doesn't mean we drop another $1000 right now.  And this is a 24/7 market.  Monday means nothing.
I dont disagree, I was just saying it wasn't liquidations. My theory is that the BGC was orchestrated by big dogs who shorted at higher prices. They got together and decided to close their shorts at the same time squeeing the late shorters. I mean, of course that happened.
yes, and none of those were liquidations. Think about it. The absolute bottom was 6420. At 3.33 leverage.. pump to 8300.
thats a 29.6875% increase.
Assuming max leverage and an absolute bottom short it looks like you might barely get liquidated. But most are less than max leverage and most shorts were opened well above the bottom.
So I gotta say, loved the cliff parable. There is something magical about people wanting to face adversity, to explore the unknown, to break ground and to melt steel. Or maybe I've read too much Ayn Rand once upon a time...

With regards to sharing information, we've all seen the tranformation of the software industry in the past 10\-20 years. Open source, and companies sharing their know\-how made building something today heaps easier than anytime before. The technology, and most importantly, the knowledge, are wide open.

Tech companies aren't all altruistic of course, but participation in open source/etc. helps the technology develop more rapidly and helps them attract the best talent. Even Microsoft changed their ways.

So software dev is now more than a zero sum game.

I'm guessing it's harder in the finance world because you're fundamentally competing with information and when you make money, the fella on the other side of the transaction loses. But there is still relative ease of access to information, compared to before. Not needing to pay for an expensive Bloomberg terminal to get real\-time crypto prices is nice. The barrier to entry is low, statistical software and APIs are easily accessible, open\-source helps a lot here too...

So given that data \+ software are free, the wins will go to the ones who can take this wealth of raw data \+ technologies and synthesize it all into **knowledge**.

And it's not simple because just having all this powerful stuff at your disposal is not enough. I've interviewed hundreds of software engineering candidates\*. Computer science students all learn "this is a hash table" and "this is a linked list" but not everyone can be flexible and use the correct thing at the correct time, or adapt them to some specific problem. That's why I love posts like your VWMA post \-\- I see the art being made here in combining many ideas to attempt to solve a problem, to explore the unknown. And you probably know, that the best student armed with best stats textbooks still won't be able to replicate what you're doing without some creative thinking. Someone can read your formulas and replicate them, sure, but can they derive the solution on their own and understand **why** you chose certain steps?

So I hope you can keep sharing the "art of creative thinking in this field" without divulging the "secret sauce," so to say.

Cheers OPM, whoever and wherever you are :)

PS Appreciate the book recommendation!

---

\* And the difference between students who only did their coursework, and the students who actually attempted building something on their own, is striking.
Thanks a lot! upvoted
Nope I've been saying for some time it will go down médium term. Always said the summer was my bet for the real low and always said I figured end of the bear market in the autumn.

I've been bearish for months. So check your facts first 
Charts & Chill is the new trendy thing to do
I misread your question, apologies.
I guess it does not matter if this is 'consistently' lower right? You buy cheaper and you sell cheaper. The difference is far too small for arbitrage between exchanges.
Is he not your favorite dude?
That's my thoughts but I'm really unsure whether to close around that area or let it ride and see how far we can go into sept. 4.9 broken could create some real panic because a few months ago people where laughing that you will never see a 10K bitcoin again. That attitude is still here to some degree (people saying it wont go under 7K a few days ago). Some people have been arguing we're not even in a downtrend. It's worrying me how long it's taking people to actually become bearish. Knife catchers who play against the trend are going to prolong the pain, I can understand the appeal of catching the bottom but at this point in time I would rather see a reversal, a bullish run then a reasonable pullback to enter a long term long. Time will tell I guess....
Yep. When you overshoot up you tend to compensate by overshooting down. You can avoid overshooting down too much by drawing out the time period of a long consolidation in a range then breaking upwards but I think we'd have to go sideways for months for these levels to be considered the new normal and I think the market structure has decided it wants to go make a lower low IMO. Because it's been drawn out and buyers bought into the short squeeze we're hoping that there's enough money that didn't fomo in and wants to buy at 5K (which is still not really exactly cheap considering the way bitcoin grows).

I would say it's possible to bounce off 4650-5K area and that be the bottom but with the recent price action it hasn't exactly screamed to me that people think it's worth the price right now so that's why I doubt it will hold. It could bounce anywhere between 1.4-4650 but your major supports are 4650, 3K, 1.8K and 1.4K below 5K, below 1.4K is not good. TBH I expect at worst we'll drop below 3K and bounce somewhere in the mid to high 2Ks. 1.4 is a decent possibility but I'm not sure we can retrace that much if any of the interest I've been hearing about for the past year is actually true and not the community convincing itself (which I also somewhat suspect of). I also suspect that some major players have been in since 2013 because you can see some real accumulation on the weekly chart around the time it hits it's lows and started to recover and there was like a consistent 7K long position open for the entire bullrun period(or it seemed) that was likely playing the weekly time frame and they had some insight on NASDAQ/CME and they pumped it to dump it on the news.
Yup, it's a really odd way of thinking- I think it has to do with the hodl mentality. They really can't fathom why *anyone* would sell BTC sometimes, haha. It's simple supply and demand guys! Those mining operations don't run for free!
That’s true. I’m not quite sure of the processes these big mining organisations undertake to sell their coins etc. so it’s too hard to say.
I don't mine but I guess it depends on the country. In the US I believe the average is around $4500 per coin, in some places more, in some places a bit less. People who are involved in mining should be able to give better information.
Really Bad Guys
Search something like "btc futures cme tradingview" on google and you should get a list of interactive charts for each futures product they have
Thanks it was truly painful to hold. Like 8 days of being 1% underwater and it was a pretty large add 
Lmao dude I've been waiting for this movement for months...most patient I've ever been in my entire life I think 
Got limit buys at $5.5 but who knows. I think the bottom for at least a large correction upwards will be $4.5-5.5 
Either you are a long term investor or short term trader.
I find it easy to hold on stocks because I know the products and I use it regularly, but with crypto, it is just so much speculation.
There is no refund option.
Ahh I see. Thanks man.
So I can fill a new short :)

I'm just hoping for a technical bounce since were are oversold on higher time frames. 
You're going to start seeing a lot of people hoping for a bounce so they can short it higher. :P 
Thanks! Another noob question, what period do you use on RSI?
yes, SATS. When dollar value is down more, SATS are also down.
All orders you are looking at maybe just from one person. You never know how many really buyers up there. For example, I may use this kind of manipulation: put the fake large buy wall, and put little and many random sell orders to get filled them with little sheeps or larger sheep. 
A trader can have multiple accounts and that just shows the amount of orders. If I put up 15 orders it shows as 15
ah, thanks.
Alright! Happy trading.
Because a multiple testing of a support often results in a breakthrough. 
The new people think that is the bottom and they will straight up panic when that level is violated.
Probably because that was the lowest low of the year so far
You are doing great, in terms of dedication. This is exactly how I did it aswell. I was awake for 3 days one time in my newbie years. A good succesful trader is never stuck to the charts, but all of them were in their first years. You need to be obsessed and passionate about it at first to be able to make it to the happy few later on.

The reactions on your post are right but it seems like you knew that already. Combine all the timeframes and analyse them all. If you see a drop or rise in price press and watch all the timeframes to get an idea of how it moves. If then you are good enough, you will be able to tell that a certain 1m candle could change the direction of a daily trend. But it takes time, a lot of time! The higher timeframes remain the most important, but to get a feel of the market you need to know how they are made. 

Keep up the hard work!

Edit: My sentiment is outdated, I don't post that much. I'm currently short and bearish. Not sure how to change on mobile.
I was just giving you a hard time, lol. It's a meme. Personally I don't care how others trade, but most people seem to agree that 1min charts are just noise and that larger timeframes (from 15min to 30min) are more useful in looking at short term trades.
it's the truth.
just wait till miners start to get nervous, they have the coins to flud the market. for many miners 5k is critical as they might make loss due to electricity and other fixed costs. 
I don't disagree, was just messing with you on Tesla. Hope you made some money shorting them as well. 
Do you have some good source on this solar vs nuclear comparison ?
And is there the risk of some accidents involved as well ?
Or the storage issues of radionuclides?
Do you believe in reusage of the nuclides and making them harmless in the end  later on ?
True... but its not volume characterised by excessive demand. Its mostly buying the dip volume (which may be encouraging for scalpers but doesnt mean anything long term)  
Glass half full, that's the spirit
I've heard the contrary. I've heard that there is lots of support at 6500.


It doesn't matter anyways, I ended up closing it much earlier than I expected, for a small profit.
*you’re

>your talking about but enjoy writing a bunch of garbage anyhow.

Grammar hard

Didn’t you trade away like 30 BTC? Should we really be taking your advice?

Maybe you should add a disclaimer saying that earlier this year you lost every last satoshi you have owned since 2013 because you have a gambling problem

Also, why are you on my case? What do you care if I make bad trades. What do you care if I comment “garbage”. Get a life


To be fair, anyone that makes trades because of what someone says on reddit deserves what they get. This is not a place to give solid trading advice, why the hell would someone do that???? Each on their own, it's how it works.
I was also speaking to the reasons of the breakdown. The implication of "technical breakdown" is that it wasn't news-driven, but based on the technicals/chart movements.
Aha okay... yes bots work in shifts and need time to rest too ;)
[deleted]
You'll be fine in 2021
Honestly though US economy is doing great. And anyone investing in stock market has most likely been killing it. I think crypto’s collapse has just turned most people off. Safer and easier to make money in traditional investments 
The next court proceeding is currently scheduled for Sep 2018. This may or may not lead to more selling — it could be that claimants are returned fiat from the initial sell and that’s it, or that they are returned a % of Bitcoin or that it’s all sold.

Even if good news will still probably dump as this rate [facepalm]
The remaining coins belong to Karpeles I believe, and he has stated that he will distribute them all to the claimants. After distribution, some portion will obviously be sold whereas some people will keep them in cold storage. There will be some effect on price for a couple of months, but IMO it is unlikely to cause a crash.
Doesn't matter.. eventually those coins will end up being sold on some exchange.
Totally. It's amazing how manipulators have ruined a perfectly natural price growth. They probably want to destroy the bright future promised by bitcoin. F\*ck bankers! I want a bitcoin whale overlord.

Edit: preferably english speaking
In terms of the % move down yes, when we went to $6k you could have called it a bear market. but we've been ranging since then, so it hasn't exactly trended downwards after hitting $6k. A "real" bear market wouldn't be sideways/ranging/consolidation- it's a slow downwards grind with a few bounces along the way
Yeah I think it's a bear pennant.
Your very clearly after the red dildo by an hour
> We already had three tests

Could you show this in a chart? The way I've drawn it (wicks included) we were about $165 shy of the line on Bitfinex ($65 on Bitstamp) on May 29 and we're currently around $200 away from it ($100 on Bitstamp). Are you cutting wicks?
Good bot

I'm looking forward to it as well.. I'll be buying in around 5k, 4k and 2.5k if I get the chance to do it.

If not no problem. Just planning for that scenario should it arise! 
I think it should be classed as a disability to not be able to imagine a 25% drop (which is what 5000 is at this stage) on an asset that has lost 12% of its value in 3 days.
The dollar has gone up significantly these last 2 months so I wouldn't say it's losing value… It's probably one of the reasons why Bitcoin is dropping since it's paired against the dollar.
Yeah sorry that is wrong. I meant to say that he cant say "ive been saying this going to 3k for months" before its even happened. 

edit: actually what I said isn't wrong. My point is that you can make predictions as bold as you like but you can't act like 3k already happened in your post 

>I’ve been saying this is going to 3000 for months. Check my post history

Just because we dropped to the low 7ks. 

Ha - just saw this. 16 hours left... :)
I see your point, and you are right. 

However, I do trade between bitcoin / alts (to increase my holdings of one coin specifically) and have never tethered or shorted. My theory being that I believe BTC will be higher in the future, so if I can grow my Bitcoin value x100 in the meantime then that would be beneficial.

I was replying to the guy above that people panic selling at some fictional low are better off than people who don't panic sell. Panic selling is never a good idea, decide what you would want to do at every price / sentiment point in advance.
Only if you chain me up first; I prefer nipple clamps to have a 4-5 mm gap
Well, if you believe in it going down more open a short and put your money where your mouth is.
[deleted]
Your view that we are in a bull market is the error. 
"there was 0% upside" 

lol when you hindsight trade it's really easy to tell people where they should buy and sell. 
I will be messaging you on [**2018-08-30 12:36:01 UTC**](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=2018-08-30 12:36:01 UTC To Local Time) to remind you of [**this link.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8pyf8i/daily_discussion_sunday_june_10_2018/)

[**CLICK THIS LINK**](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8pyf8i/daily_discussion_sunday_june_10_2018/]%0A%0ARemindMe!  aug 30 is btc 13k?) to send a PM to also be reminded and to reduce spam.

^(Parent commenter can ) [^(delete this message to hide from others.)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Delete Comment&message=Delete! e0fgtc0)

_____

|[^(FAQs)](http://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/24duzp/remindmebot_info/)|[^(Custom)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[LINK INSIDE SQUARE BRACKETS else default to FAQs]%0A%0ANOTE: Don't forget to add the time options after the command.%0A%0ARemindMe!)|[^(Your Reminders)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=List Of Reminders&message=MyReminders!)|[^(Feedback)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBotWrangler&subject=Feedback)|[^(Code)](https://github.com/SIlver--/remindmebot-reddit)|[^(Browser Extensions)](https://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/4kldad/remindmebot_extensions/)
|-|-|-|-|-|-|
The person who made that chart also made this chart in August 17: https://twitter.com/yerbkhan/status/895814188198752256?s=19
It's not really good logical advice though.... Because the same thing could have worked the other way. There could have been some butthole tickling news that sent it rocketing. 

And trust me, I'm saying this as a short term bear. 
Some random exchange was hacked.. cool. Not like that’s the reason for the crash....
Yea, they're called exchanges.
Get your facts straight and check the EOS volume on CMC, on exchanges specifically.
Proof of your short. If you are really short from 15k that's a good trade.
lol... good one.

Got caught with my pants down on that trade
sure thing, tommy

I was posting in this sub at 880
It'd have to go sub $2000 for your 'prediction' to be correct, so aren't you celebrating a little early?
/s
I love your username.
Anyone could have predicted that. 
I don't think you fully understand the markets 
Is you finish or is you done
True dat. He > than all the 1000 shitcoin promoters peddling spam and vapour
> Ignoring ICO's entirely you are still wrong IMO.

Yeah, I'm saying it's a spectrum. The higher risk, nascent coins obviously have more short term upside potential. They're still scams.

>Pretending bitcoin is the only worthwhile ledger in a nascent asset class worth hundreds of billions of dollars is a peculiarly outdated viewpoint.

It's really not. I'd refer you to the linked article.
Did you read the paper I linked? I think we probably have vastly different understandings of how value is appropriated in the space. I'm happy to entertain some suggestions for other coins that have value but unless I hear a compelling reason for why a certain coin should be worth anything, I will assume it isn't. Payment systems and utility protocols don't have large market cap value. Their value is based on their utility and is subject to competition. Rent seeking is not possible long term for these projects. The real value is in the strongest, consensus-based PoW chain. Store of value is the real use case, not paypal 2.0 or crypto kitties. 

At least read the paper before you deride Bitcoin maximalism. 
The fact that you don't know the future? Surely if you sold at $6760 you weren't looking to rebuy at $6720, and if you're panicselling on a drop like this, chances are you're just going to buy too early (or too late) and wind up selling again at another loss, and then do it over and over again. 

I'm not saying HODL ALWAYS or something, but comments like 'anyone who sold before the price became even lower' are ridiculous. Hindsight trading is always easy. 
There is no chart to save you from glomming onto an extreme narrative and eventually losing money from it.

You gotta be vigilant and police yourself.

I do understand that you aren't actually looking for a chart but I figured I'd return the favor with a useless comment.
Exactly. The only possible "bad" impact (if you like) is exchanges going "shit shit we're not allowed to wash trade to keep the price artificially afloat".
What I’m saying is that the news is used to fuel fear even though I don’t consider the news bad.  The CFTC news is being pushed hard in lots of channels today, that’s how they orchestrate these technical textbook breakdowns that you think are natural.
Do we get to see your beautifully sculpted handsome face? 

If so, I’ll be on the other side of the camera ^naked 
What time of day?
very interested, can you record and put on an unlisted YT vid? \- timezones/flights etc will prob wipe out a few of us
Why 10k?   We haven't seen that since like January?  Seems high.
Would you expect 7k to act as resistance for any bounce? I'm waiting to hop into position to - unsure if I should just go for it now with stops at 7/7.2 or be patient and wait for a bounce that may or may not come.
If the trend from 2011 holds then would 4800 be the next bottom?
a.k.a. /u/OracleSeven a.k.a. our favorite resident /r/BitcoinMarkets troll. He's been here longer than most of the moonkids, really.
Thus the charts have spoken! Feel the power of the charts!
I've been trading in some other coins in addition to BTC these last few weeks but I found that despite their greater volatility it was too unpredictable and their price movements are somehow tied to BTC or ETH. You are right, it has been quiet around BTC lately, but I found that it was a good time for me to practice some trading when it was relatively calm and I made a decent profit.
Well, been pretty spot on. So nice work, either way, luck or skill.

I am kinda shooting myself a bit, since now I am bummed that market is what it is, AND I am not benefiting financially since I have refused to short, due to emotional desires. I caught a few nice entries on bounces and sold at decent times, but not that much compared to last year, obviously. 

Maybe I should take a break and reconsider emotionless trading! Either way, good luck man. 
If you think that during a stock market crash people will be pulling money out of 'safe' assets to throw them at the most volatile market on earth, you need your head examining. 
I mean generally yea. Everyone needs to pick their strategy and entry point. But if your not in this space for the long haul it's possible you may not completely understand what your invested in. The doom and gloom sentiment in the subs is staggering, but to each his own.
No of course they won't.  They are either lying or just very confused.
true, but got way too much stuff going on to focus on trading sadly
I just think 5.9k was the bottom.

Like the forever bottom

As in, Bitcoin will never go below 6k ever again.

I know it sounds stupid and irrational, but I’ve got this gut feeling.

7250 is a good as time as ever to go long and I have a very clear “you were wrong” signal if we drop sub 6800.
If are holding a $10 million position max leverage is like 10-15.

100x is only for small positions, if your risk limit goes above 200 BTC every 50 BTC increase requires more margin so by the time you get to 10 mil you can't be that high leverage
We shall see.
It’s L one fourty
>What do you suggest now.  
>The sheep mentality in this subbredit is astonishing. 44 upvotes and probably dozens who followed your pro trader position (I didnt...)

Not every trade can be a winner, which is why my trades always represent 5% or less of my trading stack. My goal is to see a sizeable profit at the end of each quarter, which has been extremely successful. 
I also think support is stamp one, last two big drops hit it perfectly
Look it's a big responsibility to give stops. Hope the bulls defend the weekly. Also look at the macd, let it do it's dance and see if it can get on top of things. This can take a couple of swings do you get me? :)

Good luck. It sucks losing money and we've all been there.  


PS Yes there is a bull div but small and it may complete with another leg down and higher low in rsi.
I disagree. BAT coin for example, has a partnership with DOW Jones which is a huge adoption. There are multiple other coins with partnerships and products that are equally as useful. But was there even any bad news on adoption; the SEC meeting was bullish. Fiat pairs for Alts bullish. What was bad?
Yeah, just like /u/JustARapper said, technology takes time to develop. Think about the dot-com crash. Is internet irrelevant nowadays? Far from it, but in 2000-2002 it was fairly uncommon for a lot of people to even use the internet. Just like right now it's rather uncommon for a lot of people to even own *any* crypto. And now you have even the poorest people in the poorest countries with internet access, and smart phones. And now technology develops super fast, but it still takes years not just a couple months. I could go further into detail, with charts and TA even, but that's the gist of it.

Tl;DR: Dumb money will be back, whether they want to or not because you can't avoid technology. For now trading is rough, sure. But that will inevitably change for the better, in due time.
I don't think crypto will exist very well for front end uses. Current UI is too confusing and for security purposes but I do expect one/several to power payment systems on the backend.

Even if there's never one "end all be all" crypto due to transaction speed limitations, I just don't see smart contract platforms not being used. And that is important adoption.

That said, it is vaguer still that the price level of any of these will sustain.
I think the next bull run will be driven by a coin besides BTC that gains real traction with enterprise usage. I personally think it will be ETH or EOS and that it still may be 2+ years away.
Words are wind. Let’s see them stick to that if and when the price starts to skyrocket again.
Ya can't disagree with that. That was bullshit 😂😅 

Waste of two months for all of us lol 
how do you know?
How does that refute what I said at all? 
I think it shows a slight sentiment bias geographically.. but just a guess.
I think we'll get a mellow up trending year like 2016 before the next major bull run happens. So plenty of time to get long term positions built. I want to catch the bottoms though for the nice bounce plays.
BTC1! is the one I check
Well, that sucks. 

Another ICO Nimiq recently did this, they had the ICO last year , launched an ecr20 till mainnet but wanted KYC to swap the ECR20 to mainnet. Blamed the changing legal environment 
Man.. we really should have shorted more at 7600's.. :(
Pays off to have hope it seems. 

I’m personally hoping it doesn’t rise past 7k
I pretty much only use the default 14.
thats the thing, this isn't just one random large buy wall. When that happens the order number remains similar.

anyways, we'll find out by the end of the day if those orders are real or fake
thats true and if this the order book after a pump it'd be one thing. 

this is the order book after a dump, so chances are the orders are likely real. 

obviously a big enough dump can take those orders out. but it'll have to be a real dump 
Thanks. Good luck to everyone. In the end I’d like to think everybody, including the shorters, want btc to succeed. 
So, theoretically, if we start getting close to breaking 6k, will you put some lowball buys in place?  Or, will you just try to watch and time it?
So, here's my thought on that. There are companies that are spending billions of fiat dollars in building mining farms. I'm sorry, but I don't see it very profitable for them if bitcoin stays under 7k for long. I really don't believe companies with that much capital will go down without a fight. This is just my thoughts on it, I could be wrong, but I don't think so.
They aren't going to make a loss, they shut their machines off. Only thing that does is lower the difficulty. This miner thing is so irrelevant, it doesn't matter one bit at what cost they have. Look at commodities etc, when they produce at loss they just go out of business. Simple as that.
The risk of nuclear accident is insurmountably low. Three Mile Isle, for example didn't kill a single person and it's still in operation today.

Solar, however, kills a ton of people each year. Most from installation accidents such as falling off roofs.
"because you have a gambling problem"

Might I remind you that you yourself only recently said "I used to have a system, but now just kinda wing it"......... Pot, kettle, black? 
Wow, I thought he was just being an asshole to me, I guess it's everyone.

I like your posts.  I don't agree because I'm fearful of 7k breaking which I think is inevitable, but the charts don't lie, this scalping strategy has been the winner for awhile now.  Nice work
>Grammar hard

Great argument.

I don't offer up advice like you do. You make the most ridiculous price calls and are almost always wrong. Trusting your gut is not a strategy and recommending others trust your gut is absurd. 

Maybe you shouldn't parade around like you're some sort of expert. 
> u/jarederaj
>  
> [+11] isn’t this somehow a bannable offense? He’s clearly being hostile towards people in the sub

Lol, pointing out that you're making ridiculous claims is a public service for the sub.

Get over yourself.
Yeah but not everyone understands that and there's still a difference between legitimate analysis (chewtoy, sloppy, joyrider, midnightocean, etc.) and the fake stuff. 

I don't see why labeling unsupported comments as such is a bad thing.
[deleted]
Lol, I'm sure it's not that hard to set timers in order to paint the charts.
Nice setup man, nice and clean. 
the terms are basically interchangeable in bitcoinland
Yes it's a bear pennant. I don't know why you're being downvoted. 
If I'm saying 1+1 = 2 will you guys downvote too ?

This subbreddit really is overrated.
Correct! I'm implying another red dildo is coming because bear flags signal continuation!
Oh well..
Ah you see I would have said yes but I can only get off with 2-3 mm 
I've actually been shorting ETH to the tits since February and it's been pretty amazing. I'll be sure to let the thread know if I go short BTC.

As I said I'm currently somewhat short BTC by being light vs my normal hodling amount and looking to accumulate a big long from $4,300 down to $2k and below.

[it's not like i didn't make my bear ideas explicit](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/82lfv8/daily_discussion_wednesday_march_07_2018/dvbse5m)
[deleted]
Looks like my point stands because that chart is terribly wrong. according to that chart we would be at 14k right now, we are barely at half that, lmao.
> Because the same thing could have worked the other way.

Really?   You are in this sub, yet don't even understand the basic subject of probabilities?
Not a random exchange.  A major exchange and it is almost certainly much of the reason for this crash.

We will agree to disagree on all of that.
No it isn't. After 15k we've had the 6k drop. This dude could close with better profits for a loong time but didn't.
Can happen to anybody.
I love you both
um is that why people kept buying the entire way down...?  this is kind of a silly response...


So why the “long term holder” tag? Why didn’t you sell 20k and buy back anywhere between 19.7k and 5.9k? 
Done, back into stocks. The crypto party is over.
Alright, I skimmed that paper to at least get a sense of its assumptions.

Two key things:

"When thinking about whether a protocol’s token can capture and sustain  economic rent,  what  is  relevant  is whether the  mining  industry  maintaining  the  protocol’s blockchain is competitive, not the stickiness of users.  The mining industry supporting any decentralised protocol must be a competitive market;
otherwise the protocol isn’t decentralised. "

I agree with this, and this is precisely where Bitcoin fails. The mining industry is not competitive; it's controlled by a handful of people in China. Decentralization is only as good as the weakest link, and mining is extremely centralized. Thus, Bitcoin is centralized.

"Cryptocurrency is overwhelmingly  better as  a
monetary store  of  value  than,  say, gold. (I won’t enumerate the reasons why, as it’s pretty intuitive
and has been written about widely.)"

That's a shame he doesn't elaborate, since I strongly disagree with this assertion. I say gold is a better store of value than Bitcoin, because gold has proven itself in a way that Bitcoin has not.

I consider the focus on "store of value" as a fundamental characteristic of Bitcoin as one of the most toxic ideas in cryptocurrency, one that will probably lead to more investor sorrow than any other. As with in the paper you linked, it is an article of faith more than something logically defended.

When someone starts talking about "store of value" as a fundamental of their investment, I immediately assume that all other fundamentals have failed them and they are left with a justification that seems to work just as well in ponzi schemes.
> Exactly. The only possible "bad" impact (if you like) is exchanges going "shit shit we're not allowed to wash trade to keep the price artificially afloat".

Can't the CFTC also seize an entire exchange + funds like they did with BTC-e ? Potentially people are maybe withdrawing funds from US exchanges (Kraken, Coinbase , Itbit  & Stamp) and want to do it in fiat as they don't want to hold BTC in a bear market.

I don't know, you never know with regulators, they can be very quick and stelathy (like they did with BTC-e) or loud and slow, for example if you read the CFTC Press releases they recently fined SocGen north of 450M for manipulating the LIBOR between 2010 and 2012. So you'd think exchanges would be hit with a slap on the wrist for just allowing bitcoin (certanely not LIBOR) manipulation for 4 months or so, but again you never know


How do they orchestrate the technical textbook pumps that you think are natural?

There's no good news when it happens. You're just looking for a reason to understand price movements. These dumps happen and people scour the news for anything bad. If it really affected price, you'd be able to find the news first and then short.

If it's so obviously artificial to you, why didn't you short when the CFTC came out with a probe? 
lol... probs not
We can do a doodle to see what would work best
My advice would be to scale into a short here. Any bounce *should* get rejected by the support we broke down from (about ~7100).

Relatively speaking, we're not that far off from that. Set some laddered sells from here up to 7100, and you should be ok. If we break back into the triangle, you can start to sweat, but that would be very surprising.
Yeah him too, lol. He's been here a very long time he just likes to change usernames. I think he's posting on raaner right now
Well I bought at $7600 betting on breakout and told the sub I will capitulate at $6800 and buy if it goes lower. Neither of which I have done. Im confused. 
Monthly macd soon to print bearish crossover. Even if bulls resist and maintain the price for some time, technically it seems probable that we will see new lows. Correct me if you think I'm wrong. That said, good luck! This may be a very good trade.
Are you basing that on anything other than a gut feeling?
You've been around a long time, so I will respect your gut feeling. Also, stops at $6800 makes sense. 

That said, assuming that you are right, is there any rationale or gut feeling that says we are goings up now long term absent something bullish AF coming out? 

I could picture us range bound in these parts for awhile. But.... Its hard to picture a break up some crazy news coming out, and we all know news is much more likely to be bad, than good. 
[deleted]
https://www.tradingview.com/x/xI9Dd6cV/

Those touches are pretty damn perfect.

I guess I’ll move to stamp to chart. Chart also looks like a lot less fomo leveraged wicks.

You chart on stamp correct? 
Still on your small short from the other day? 
Thanks. I have made more % the last two weeks than I am down since yesterday, so I could potentially jump ship now without any actual loss. I have to assess the risk and potential for further drop now. I will close my position on a one third rebound for sure. 
Primarily talking about bitcoin- but I generally think the majority of alts will fail. I do believe there will be a few that come out strong. I don't think bitcoin is as inevitable as a lot of maximalists believe it is

You're mainly talking about alts, I'm talking about bitcoin 
I mean I hope so, it'd be great to get rich and the potential for digital currencies to explode is a really awesome idea. I just think it might not play out how people expect, at least with current cryptocurrencies.

For example I was mainly saying I don't think *bitcoin* is inevitable. 
Smart contracts are cool but it's a niche thing- there's simply no reason to use crypto over fiat/the traditional banking systems right now for the vast majority of people in the world. 

Targeting 3rd world countries with depreciating fiat/hyperinflation is a very specific use case that isn't even really being used...majority of large crypto holders are probably 20-26 y/o males in 1st world countries. 

The front end stuff is a disaster and with money that stuff is important. Smart contracts, a lack of chargebacks, and a trustless transaction system is a total nightmare to use when it comes to settling disputes. People forget the small, technical details when it comes to payment systems and currencies and just think of the big picture
mathematics bro
Ye you want to catch the daily bounces. I don't think this is the place to do it though. RSI looks pretty exhausted but there are plenty of bearish signs that say we can go down lower. If I was to time a bullish trade in this environment I'm going to wait until more than the indicators bottom or top out. If we go lower than here I can imagine RSI grinding between 50 and the floor for a while on medium timeframes and reaching lows we haven't see for years on the weekly chart. I really want a confluence of factors to come together before exit my long term short  or risk anything more than a short TF long scalp. 

Because the movements are not very big these days I'm sticking to longer term positions with the odd scalp so my strategy it to follow the trend until it turns and play the bounces if I'm around instead of watching charts all the time. Need to save that energy for when the volatility is high and the real money can be made because thats when your going to need your energy otherwise most people will burn themselves out which can end in being rekt. I've protected my value on BFX and have a short in profit and have stops in place(in profit) but also a decent short on sept mex futures which I'll just switch up to 100x and then play bounces on another contract instead of closing that 7700 25x position until I see some real strength. I'm playing longer term because it's summer and I would rather stick with a position that I can easily sleep on or go away for a day or two and not worry too much about.
Yeah and I should’ve closed at 6400 instead of 6700 but hey, it’s a marathon. We got a lot of BTC to win and lose still. 
guess what the orders got yanked 
> this is the order book after a dump, so chances are the orders are likely real.

nope.

many times the orders won't get removed until a 'trigger price', so for example they may have orders at 7000 that only get removed at 7010 or 7020.
Definitely going to watch it. How it breaks will be important imo. I think it could be a day like Jan 16th, ie -30%.
Realistically 6200 is probably the panic point.  The price hasn't stayed before that for a sustained period since the bull run ended
this
they had to pay for the coins they mined already. 
there’s a difference between gambling and having a gambling problem


Pointing out when you're covert shilling isn't exactly being an asshole, in my view.
When did I ever state that I am an expert. 

I post normal comments, and I state my opinion. I am in profit from my trading and now only trade with those profits. I don’t even touch any of my BTC

I sold everything at 13.5k

I called the 7.5k range back at 10k

Why are you on my case?
you’re being hostile... What is so ridiculous about saying we will bart back up?

What is the ridiculous claim?
It is not a good thing, because you are trying to ~~improve~~ protect other traders. This is against you :) If you are in the market to make money, let others get rekt. After all, you might be on the other side of the trade.

Trade safe.
Position closed with success



* Position: long xbtu18

* Opening value: 6,679.50

* Average value: 6,679.50

* Closing value: 7,724.00

* Leverage: 5.00X

* Stack: 30.00%

* PnL: 15.39%



**Price for xbtu18 should be between 0 and 6770.03**

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


Yeah but whatever. I guess you can't please everyone.
I have my own thats connected with a chain, I'll let you tug on; susan.
If you take your start date from years ago then no but that's not it works really is it. You know that.

Why not take it 5 years ago, or 6 or 7.

This current market, from end of December is a bear market whether you like it or not. 
I'm sure his point with posting that chart was to accurately predict the price 10 months later 
It's the truth - You are in the sub saying we COULD go down on bad news. I'm in this sub saying we COULD go up on good news or even just a random whale pumping. All we are both doing is speculating. It's not good advice for anyone to take. 
Do you expect him to make perfect moves?
> I agree with this, and this is precisely where Bitcoin fails.

He's referring specifically to utility tokens; somewhere else in the paper he talks about money being a special case.

> The mining industry is not competitive; it's controlled by a handful of people in China. Decentralization is only as good as the weakest link, and mining is extremely centralized. Thus, Bitcoin is centralized.

I agree that mining centralization is problematic but that doesn't mean Bitcoin isn't protected from these risks in a variety of ways. Furthermore, which coins don't have this problem and/or wouldn't if they were to become popular. ASICs and power arbitrage are inherent to the system. Hopefully with more hardware manufacturing coming online, at least Jihan will lose some of his monopolistic grip.

>That's a shame he doesn't elaborate, since I strongly disagree with this assertion. I say gold is a better store of value than Bitcoin, because gold has proven itself in a way that Bitcoin has not.

Bitcoin has far better scarcity, security, known rate of inflation, lower cost to carry, transportable, etc. etc. than gold is. It's ridiculous to analyze the two, fundamentally, side by side and come out with the conclusion that gold has better SoV properties.

Also, he does expand elsewhere in the paper on some of that.



>I consider the focus on "store of value" as a fundamental characteristic of Bitcoin as one of the most toxic ideas in cryptocurrency, one that will probably lead to more investor sorrow than any other. As with in the paper you linked, it is an article of faith more than something logically defended.

This is idiotic. You didn't even read the paper, you just "skimmed" it. It's amazing that you would be so quick to dismiss the musings of a former partner at KKR and McKinsey. 

>When someone starts talking about "store of value" as a fundamental of their investment, I immediately assume that all other fundamentals have failed them and they are left with a justification that seems to work just as well in ponzi schemes.

What other fundamentals? You think payment is some killer app that won't be competed down to a low value? Focusing on merchant adoption is the toxic and retarded thing. Hard money is the killer app, not gimmicky nonsense that alts push for.

Again, if you read the paper in full, you might come to the same conclusion.
Then you lied to yourself and to everyone here.
no
haha... Naaa
I do and chewy does.

I followed chewy on this at first but after months of following different charts I can confirm that most of the time stamp is the one to watch.
Also moved to stamp for the bigger picture but still chart on kraken for setting stops or profits
Still both ways ;-) I've opened same sized long later hoping this will eventually break up.

Probably gonna close long if this breaks down and go big with short.
Yeah, I meant crypto as a whole but bitcoin is a pretty good store of value in my opinion. People expecting to get rich are dumb, you don’t buy gold and expect to get rich.. I am extremely happy buying btc in 2014 and watching it go up, so for me it is a good store of value but I’m not expecting it to take off in 3 months. So in that case, I think bitcoin will still succeed but we will have to see because your arguments are true
Gonna have to explain more brahski because I think it's entirely possible many gambling highly leveraged shorts got liquidated
6400?? The lowest price at Bitmex is 6610. You mean in a different time period?
Above poster is right. You recently claimed that you "know how to trade" but that you're giving it up because *reasons*. Yet, less than 24 hours later you were back making completely ridiculous price predictions based on nothing.

Sounds just like gambling to me.

Not to mention that you've frustratingly given up countless times, but always show up again very soon after. 

99% of your comments are nothing but theatrics. 
"Covert shilling" translation for actual humans: stating anything he doesn't like.
I don't see how you could possibly be in profit given how often your price calls are completely wrong. Maybe you're just making an entirely different set of trades, but going off of your comments here, you're almost always wrong and always cite your "gut". 

>I sold everything at 13.5k

>I called the 7.5k range back at 10k

Lol, an anecdote or two does not mean you're a good trader or a well-reasoned individual. 

>Why are you on my case?

Because 

1) you keep making piss-poor predictions and encouraging others to follow along 

2) you seem to be a compulsive liar and make an unreasonable number of bold claims about your connections to billionaires using OTC or having insider connections to X, Y and Z 

3) Your masturbatory praise of yourself is obnoxious after a while
OK GUYS STOPPP

Let's not get personal here :( ..

I'm gonna call 911 and call Jared the mod
Because you never have a valid reason for any of your predictions. You're just throwing shit into the wind and hoping something sticks. That's called a gambling mentality and it's spam on this sub. All you ever do is cite your gut. You really think your gut is valuable to other traders? Especially given how often you're plainly wrong?
Depends on if your desire to make profit outweighs ethical considerations. Personally, I'm not fond of outright lying and manipulating in order to increase personal wealth. I'm sure we all act subversively to some degree in order to benefit ourselves, but there are degrees and some degrees are not acceptable, imo.

Also, not everything is zero sum and providing supportive TA could theoretically increase your chances at profit, depending on the scenario.
Very generous of you! 
[deleted]
> You are in the sub saying we COULD go down on bad news.

Your reading comprehension is pathetic and waste of my time to talk to you.  You are hopelessly lost.  Good luck.
He acts like it. There were also loooaaads of way better opportunities to close it.
> Bitcoin has far better scarcity, security, known rate of inflation, lower cost to carry, transportable, etc. etc. than gold is.

Right, but these are properties of most cryptocurrencies rather than something unique to Bitcoin.

So why is Bitcoin a better store of value? Because it has more bagholders? Because it has the most hash power? If it is a better store of value than other cryptocurrencies, how much better, quantitatively, is it?

Bitcoin has the most hash power securing its network because it has the highest market cap. It has the highest market cap mostly because it has the most hype. It has the most hype mostly because it has the highest market cap.

If the hype relationship changes, we could see a very quick downward spiral.

When the world enters a recession in 2019 as some people are predicting, people will not be thinking of Bitcoin as a store of value, they'll be thinking of it as a risky asset.

I could be wrong, but it seems to me that Bitcoin is in a very precarious position here.

> You think payment is some killer app that won't be competed down to a low value?

What do you mean, "competed down"? Is that something from the paper?
Yeah I didn't think it was going to play out like this. So sudden and violent. At $7300 I thought it was the last higher low and next thing I know...
If I've learned anything from Bitcoin it's that gut feelings from people in the game a long time more of less have the same success as well thought out strategies.
You deleted your comment before I got to the read. DM me if you'd prefer. Honestly interested. 
Ended opening a short also on Eth and added up till resistance. So i was short from 602 with 80% stack and 5x leverage. Already took 33% profit yesterday @570 and will take another 33% around 562 or close it to reopen a bit higher. 
3.33 * 29% = <100% therefore under liq price in most shorts as 29% was worst case and 3.33 is max leverage
they couldn't have gotten liquidated. but they could've (and did) gotten stopped out, which is literally the same thing in terms of the effect it has on the market 

he's talking about Bitfinex with 3.3x max leverage. Would require a 33% move to even begin to liquidate the bottom shorters
The wick on june futures flashed to 6420. Check it out.
What do you care if I’m gambling?

I dont get your deal bro...
No, dude. You've been caught so many times suggesting that BCash is the real Bitcoin or some other such nonsense. Calling it out when I see it is a perfectly reasonable thing to do.

I'm not opposed to well-reasoned viewpoints of all types but covert shilling, or just shilling in general, is a different beast. 
[deleted]
Charlatans and sophists should be outed as such.
fair enough

Goodbye, friend
The market has spoken.

PS Agree, no manipulation of others. I actually feel bad I could not help someone today that was underwater. I gave him hopium that he might exit ok.. (which I believed).
The fuck did I just read
That's why I think the bear market will last most of this year. With capitulation occurring once/if we break under 4k. Don't see this ending until autumn 
Lol. Best of luck. 
> So why is Bitcoin a better store of value?

Why are you so averse to reading the paper? I'm not going to dig for excerpts or regurgitate all the points, when you could easily just read the paper. That paper is a gem and should be read by every crypto investor, imo.

>When the world enters a recession in 2019 as some people are predicting, people will not be thinking of Bitcoin as a store of value, they'll be thinking of it as a risky asset.

According to who? You can't really predict things like that, especially when we're potentially talking about a paradigm shift (not in 2019, but eventual)

What do you mean, "competed down"? Is that something from the paper?

Yes

With respect to utility tokens.


>When thinking about whether a protocol’s token can capture and sustain economic
rent, what is relevant is whether the mining industry maintaining the protocol’s
blockchain is competitive, not the stickiness of users. The mining industry supporting
any decentralised protocol must be a competitive market; otherwise the protocol isn’t
decentralised. It is the economic competition amongst miners that will ultimately
drive the cost of using the protocol and therefore the value of the token. No
mechanisms for monopoly rents there.


>Not only must protocols compete against their own potential forks; competition
amongst protocols is also fierce. Witness, for example, recent press reports that Kik
is considering migrating its token network from the Ethereum backbone to another
blockchain because the Ethereum network is becoming too expensive to use.

Again, I'm not going to mine excerpts for you. If you don't want to read it, that's fine, but you should consider *that* more-or-less my answer to questions about Bitcoin maximalism.

edit: Also this

>Analysts often use a working capital analogy in order to assess how much of a given
cryptoasset a user will stock to facilitate actual use of a given blockchain’s utility
function. Fair enough, but digging further into that line of thinking, the way optimal
inventories of a good are set is based on the relationship of the volume and volatility
of demand, optimal order sizes, communication and delivery latency and production
times. Since cryptoassets are generally highly divisible and may circulate very fast
(as fast as processor speed and bandwidth allow), it would seem to me that a user
would, by the same maths as those used to determine optimal inventory quantities,
conclude that he needs to hold very little inventory of a given cryptoasset. Friction
moving among cryptoassets is already low and will quickly disappear entirely with
technologies like atomic swaps. Consequently, one would expect velocity to be very
high at equilibrium. It would make no more sense for users to hoard utility
cryptoassets beyond the minimum they need to carry out their desired operations than
it would be for individuals to hoard petrol or for companies to hoard giant warehouses
full of whatever goods they sell. Companies need inventories of goods to run a
business and those inventories have a value on their balance sheet, but they try to
minimise such holdings, as they are unproductive assets that are costly to finance and
carry. They certainly don’t try to accumulate more inventory than necessary as a way
to store their retained earnings. Similarly, individuals have petrol in the tanks of their
cars, but they don’t stockpile petrol in their basements as a form of savings.
You mean the dox one? I’ll PM you details later
Nice trade
Stops vs liquidated probably is a small detail in the larger picture.
I don't care about that. 

I care that you make unsupported predictions and act like your some sort of authority on the markets, tech or anything else Bitcoin related. It's just strange that you often-times make completely ridiculous claims and yet still expect people to respect your 'wisdom'.

If you're going to gamble, that's up to you, but don't spew nonsense into the daily and expect not to be called out for it.
I think you're so angry at the world that you've actually managed to completely confuse me with someone else.  Or a dozen people, I don't think you would know the difference
It's interesting the extent to which you boast about being connected. 

And to points 1) and 3)?

Also, do you want to list off all the times you were plainly wrong? '9K is definitely the bottom.' 'I can't see why it would go down here, this is definitely going to go up', etc...
Oh, that's fucking *rich*.  I think it's time for a break, kiddo.
Lol, you'll be back in 25 minutes, I'm sure.
I just reread it and I have to agree with you... I feel dirty 
[deleted]
> Why are you so averse to reading the paper?

Because I disagree with the author about basic things, like the legitimacy of "store of value" for crypto.

The author may methodically build up an argument from first principles, but if I disagree with those principles, no matter how rigorous his methodology in building that argument he is, I will remain unconvinced.

Another basic thing I disagree with:
>  The total network value is analogous to the money supply M (i.e., all tokens in issuance), where M = PQ/V
; PQ (Price x Quantity) is the total cost of the computing resources consumed

It is true that mining costs will approach PQ, but is not true that the costs of securing the network through other means (like proof of stake) will be equivalent to PQ.

There are certainly many parts of the paper (that I've read so far) that I agree with, and I've tried to finish it out of respect for you, but I just don't think it's a good use of my time.
Cool, thanks 
Mostly luck, but even a broken watch is right 2 times a day :) 
where is gods name did I ever expect people to respect me? I dont act like some hot shot do I?

I try to be totally normal in here bro. You guys are my internet friends and I dont think Im better than anyone in here... why would you get that idea.

I also never tel people to follow me on my trades ether bro

Look, whatever I did to you... I’m sorry. I have no idea why you’re doing this.
Are you saying you've *never* shilled covertly? Never shilled at all?
Only a crazy person would suggest that false speech go unfettered. If we don't have the ability to criticize, how are we expected to arrive at some sort of convergence point?
Got a little harsh here. The line between gambling and trading is abstract, and sometimes people don't share all their observations. We need to be generous to each other while questioning. Seems like that got away from you here.
Agreed! Either way, the real pain could be on the way
You don't believe it's a better store of value than gold or you don't believe that it's a store of value at all? 

I'm under the impression that Bitcoin is attempting to solve for the hard money case. I'm not even sure how Bitcoin would function at all if it didn't have *some* sort of store of value property. So far it's been a good store of value and at equilibrium it will be a less volatile one. 


On the contrary, I'm not sure how a a payment network is inherently more valuable than the costs of its network. Payment coins (low hashing rate coins & centralized projects) or any token that doesn't serve a purpose beyond value transfer or smart contract execution is going to be subject to market effects that drive down their market caps to equilibrium. The one exception to this is sufficiently difficult PoW chain, i.e. pretty much just Bitcoin.

Bitcoin's network effect and decentralized structure and governance is a good thing. It's erroneous to think that Bitcoin is doomed to fail because first movers usually do. Bitcoin is not a company, it's a coalition of users who see value in PoW. Copycat coins have no reason to overtake Bitcoin because they're almost-always underdeveloped, centralized clones. The one exception at the moment is Monero. A case could also be made for Litecoin. There's also potential value in a MimbleWimble coin, if Bitcoin doesn't itself adopt that model. That remains to be seen.

You may disagree and that's fine, but why would you dismiss a paper from one of the most qualified public investors in crypto as not worth your time to read? This is not a Roger opinion piece, this is an elucidating look at the economics from someone whose job it is/was to do this exact type of work for KKR and McKinsey. I can't really think of a more qualified mind that isn't a developer. This is a much deeper dive than you'll get from the likes of Tom Lee, Mike Novagratz or the musings of some random redditor. Furthermore, you're not really making a compelling case against Bitcoin or its store of value properties. To say that gold has better *anything* is kind of a stretch. It has better liquidity but that's about it.

Read the paper or don't but don't pretend like it would be a waste of your time. I'm sure the hour or so it takes to read would be a better use of your time than browsing reddit, but what do I know?
Looks like I missed the break down...
>  I dont act like some hot shot do I?

Sometimes you definitely do. Maybe it's not your intention but you often give self aggrandizing anecdotes, whose purpose, as far as I can tell, can only be to boost your ego and cred on the sub.

>I also never tel people to follow me on my trades ether bro

*tell. Grammar hard?

You literally just said it's a "no brainer" to go long. Elsewhere you've been much more explicit. 

>Look, whatever I did to you... I’m sorry. I have no idea why you’re doing this.

Doing what? All I'm doing is pointing out sophistry. Don't take it personally. 
I've never said BCH is the real bitcoin.  You're an idiot.
Except you're not really criticizing, you're going off on toxic rants.  Also, your pseudo-intellectual diatribe isn't really doing you any favours.
Is there a better, more efficient way to criticize baseless conjecture? I wasn't trying to be a dick, but it's not the first time I've pointed it out to him and I do think it needs to be called out from time to time. Gut feelings don't have much value to critical discussion. There has to be some sort of standard of reason that we uphold. It's not good to give credence to un-reasoned or poorly-reasoned analysis, here or anywhere.  
I don't know what to think. Only have 33% of my initial position open.
Tried shorting BTC but was stopped already on that position (tight stops so i wouldn't get caught off guard)

Wondering adding to the short, opening a long to hedge my remaining short, closing the rest of the short and re-evaluate later...

So many options. At least i already have the most profitable trade ever so i think i'll enjoy my profits and take some time off to watch.
I mean... ok. I’ll take that as constructive feedback, I guess.

Doesnt really matter anyways. I’ve been posting less and less and basically this entire ordeal has made me decide to give up on this sub.

I dont really trade much anymore anyways. Just the comments I make in here

And since I’m “always wrong”... indeed my profits have been dwindling since the BGC, maybe you’re right... which is why I stopped trading with anythig except my profits

I def don’t have the time or patience to learn TA and I don’t actually believe it works, but that’s debatable 

I guess this is goodbye
You're right, you never said that. You said that it's the superior coin and then cited a bunch of FUD about LN and ridiculous assertions about Bitcoin being controlled by bad actors. You think that Bitcoin is going down because of *bad reasons*. 

You're a shill, dude. Sorry to break it to you. You're not shilling all the time, thankfully, but at the end of the day you will eventually start spouting off the same propaganda that every other alt fanboi and BCasher does.

Sorry if calling you out for it hurts your feelings. Genuinely. Nothing personal.
That's just like your opinion, man. Sorry if you have such distaste for me. Plenty don't.
Just ask a question that's relevant and gets at the heart of the assertion(s).
This drop was big so adding here is risky, triangle break down should put it much lower but there's ATH support somewhere, I don't see the chart now.
I didn't say you should leave the sub or that you're not welcome (who would I even be to decide?), I'm simply pointing out that your record for success is seemingly not that great and your predictions based on your "gut" are completely devoid of value. 

Not sure why you're saying you don't believe in TA. I've seen you make comments that suggest otherwise and really, any prediction based on price data is TA to some degree so it's kind of hard to avoid employing, at least some what.

I don't know why you have to take the criticism personally. I mean nothing against you, but as you've probably seen on many occasions, I'm not one to remain silent on something I disagree with and I disagree with the substance of many of your posts. 


I hate to break it to you because apparently you're not smart enough to see it yourself, but this is crypto.  Everyone is a shill for what they believe in at one point or another.  You're worse than about 95% of the bcore shills out there.

But to imply that every time someone says anything that that's "covert shilling" is also stupid.  You need help dude.
Should be around 6k5 i believe. Just below is the 6k4 low so that area should provide support for a bounce.
it’s cool bro

I was planning on posting less anyways.
I really do know a billionaire bro. I have also not lied about any of the people I stated I’ve met... Except Mark Karpeles, but that was all in good fun. It was part of a joke
> Everyone is a shill for what they believe in at one point or another.

No, there are people acting in *good* faith and people acting in *bad* faith. I'm not so pompous as to categorize myself but you are certainly acting in bad faith a lot of the time. 

>You're worse than about 95% of the bcore shills out there.

What is bcore? Are you literally shilling right now? Lmao, trying to prove my point I guess.

>But to imply that every time someone says anything that that's "covert shilling" is also stupid.

I never said that "every time someone says anything". Straw man me harder.


>You need help dude.

Lol, what a cop-out.
I really need to stop trading on hope. Gut feeling told me to hedge three times in the last 24h but was hoping it'll break up.

Well, at least BTC amount is untouched.
Well I would hope that this criticism is not a contributing factor. 
Oh, you aren't aware?  Sigh, I guess I'll have to educate you.... Bcore is s crypto-currency that is designed around having high fees and slow confirmations.  The design decisions it has made seem deliberately designed to harm the businesses and users that adopted it, in the name of keeping node operational costs low - even though at one point it cost more to send a single transaction than it cost to run a full node for a entire year!

Crazy, right?  Anyway it has its fervent supporters like all crypto currencies, though I can't imagine why anyone would willingly adopt it right now, who knows.  Hope that helps the next time you get confused about what bcore is all about! ;)
I only shorted because ETH chart seemed to be repeating a fractal.
It was really a coin toss. 

I think after this drop volatility will be more "normal" for a while making it easier to trade since volume should pick up and manipulating the market should be harder.


na no worries... maybe you’re right 

Like I said, I have no time to learn TA.
Do you mean Bitcoin Core? Bitcoin Core is a software client. It's not the same thing as Bitcoin. Users control Bitcoin, not software developers. 

:) I would think a veteran like yourself would know as much. I guess everyone has gaps in their understanding though.

It's remarkable that you think the above comment isn't shilling.
But this would be easier if this triangle would break up. Now the problem is that there is a bottom somewhere so hard to set longer term trade.

Honestly was hoping that i won't have to scalp day to day just to make any profit here :-\
Right, bcore.  Everyone knows it's called that.
Now the plan is try to get a good short entry and hope there is another dump so you get comfortable and just set stop losses and wait to see what happens around 6k4, 6k.
What is called that? The software client that Satoshi started? Yeah, that's called Bitcoin Core, formally Bitcoin QT. The blockchain is called Bitcoin though. Core is just one client that runs on top of Bitcoin.
Tbh if this is THE breakdown then entry doesn't really matter.
Right... Bcore
It matters a lot for me. If i enter and get underwater for long i'll probably close @breakeven or so missing the larger move.

I am too new to trading to have confidence to hold a position like that without any pattern visible to.

Unless i enter the position like before, following Chewy.
Sure, BCore is short for Bitcoin Core. But you seem to be referring to the blockchain itself as BCore. That's false and misleading and likely qualifies as covert shilling. 
This is hard market to enter and learn. I've moved my profits to BTC thinking this is start of reversal. Looks like it isn't. Problem in trading BTC/BTC is that you lose money when the price goes down, so if you trade to USD it's better to wait.
Yes, by promoting it like you are, you are shilling.  I'm not promoting anything, so it couldn't be shilling, naturally.

And yes, the system itself is called bcore.  It's a good and fitting name so everyone uses it.
Yes, but when your short goes wrong you don't lose as much...
But i feel safer trading USD for now.
> Yes, by promoting it like you are, you are shilling.

Where? How? What did I say that is shilling? 

> I'm not promoting anything, so it couldn't be shilling, naturally.

Yes you are. It's called *covert* shilling. You're spreading misinformation and FUD to support BCash and Ethereum. You do this regularly.

>And yes, the system itself is called bcore.

It's not.

>It's a good and fitting name so everyone uses it.

Only BCash shills do. It's a joke to everyone else. Bitcoin is the term you're searching for.
I traded USD in a bull run, I trade BTC in bear market. Don't know how this happened ;-)
Nah I'm just talking about bcore the crypto currency.  We already went over this.  Yes, bcore is in the process of turning into a joke for everyone, well said
But you said:

>It's a good and fitting name so everyone uses it.

So you're saying everyone is using it? 

Anyhow, reported for covert shilling.
Right.  Bcore.  I mean if you insist we could call things by their proper names but you seem to think this is more fun and I don't disagree.
Enjoy the ban, shill. :)
No!!!!!!!  Bcoooo^rrrrr^eeeee^eeee!
Boy, you're really throwing a bit of a temper tantrum now, aren't you?

All because I pointed out that you are a shill.

Have I hurt your feelings? :(
Yes *sniffles* bcore
